_	Rohit, however, is hurt as he was under the impression that Nisha and he were boyfriend and girlfriend.
_	Andrew Schulhof, who met him in Budapest said that "he had the impression that what he had done before for his Jewish friends had been lost".
_	The composer was accused by some critics of betraying his role as a tonal, populist composer to curry favor with younger composers and give the impression that his music still held contemporary relevance.
_	Lodge reasoned that since Cẩn would not be killed, protecting him would give the impression that the US backed his activities.
_	Texas gets the impression that Jodie and Theresa are into each other because they get on well during dance rehearsals.
_	He is under the impression that Decade is a hindrance to his own agenda and seeks to take the Decadriver from him.
_	By doing this he hoped to give the impression that Ben Ami had passed the information to the British.
_	It is to be noted that St. Alphonsus treats as a matter of course that one of the requirements of the celebrant is "brevity", which was (in his time) in danger of being overly stressed against other requirements, such as to say it with devotion; he gives the impression that the Church had a long time more trouble to admonish too quick priests for more devotion than to admonish too slow priests for so-to-say "less"; but overlengths are also to be avoided, except perhaps in a private Mass.
_	It was Deane's idea that the count should wear a tuxedo and stand-up collar, and a flowing cape which concealed Dracula while he slipped through a trap-door in the stage floor, giving the impression that he had disappeared.
_	"______ looks like he jumped in at the quarter pole..." is used when a horse comes from far back and is running so fast as to give the impression that he has only just started to run.
_	The fraction 1/11 computation occurs four times and the problems appear right next to one another, leaving the impression that the scribe was practicing the computation procedure.
_	In the work "Shower", Wentworth attached a small propeller to an ordinary table creating the impression that the furniture is about to take flight.
_	However, he soon got the impression that the "Khadi Board Administration" was dominated by Brahmins.
_	He ordered the revocation on 16 February 1944 of policies that arbitrarily set fixed "goals" for completion of combat tours and directed that the impression that no airman would be required to serve more than one tour of combat be "unmistakably corrected."
_	One of his purposes in making these trips was to obtain photographs of himself with the Clintons, which he believed would help him to get business in China by giving people the impression that he had connections and influence in Washington—he used a brochure that included at least ten photographs of himself with Hillary Clinton along with a personal note from her.
_	Diggle claimed in his autobiography that he and Shelley had only granted the BBC use of their name under the impression that it would be a one-off, probably unsuccessful pilot, and that they are now mildly disgruntled that the name is more readily associated in Britain with the TV series than with their band.
_	After Clyde King, a close Steinbrenner advisor, observed Jeter for two days in spring training in 1996, he came away with the impression that Jeter was not yet ready to contribute at the major league level.
_	He does not realize that his wife has remarried, and is still under the impression that she is profoundly grieved by his death.
_	In Act:07, it is revealed that she bears two long scars on her back, giving the impression that she once had wings; hence her name.
_	Carringer wrote that "in his lengthy account of the Victorville interlude, Houseman gives the impression that Mankiewicz started out with a clean slate, and that virtually everything in the Victorville drafts is Mankiewicz's original invention."
_	An online video created by Ryan Steinhardt in 1998 combines clips from "Barney and Friends" with the 2Pac single "Hit 'Em Up", designed to give the viewer the impression that Barney and the other characters from the show are rapping.
_	The caretaker, Shyam (Pran (actor)) explains to the girls that Kumar is mentally unstable and under the impression that he is the owner of the hotel, as Shyam is involved in illegal activities there, for which he had converted the bungalow into a vice den.
_	By the time that happened, the economy would be recovering, giving the impression that tariff cuts caused the crash and the reverse generated the recovery.
_	The film contains a number of primitive special effects, including the use of wires to move objects when the uncle sneezes, and the balancing of the camera on a rocking board to give the impression that the world is swaying in the penultimate shot.
_	Admitting that from the back cover he expected "The Tribe of Witches" to be filled with "wild claims", he was surprised that these claims were "merely hinted at" most of the time; he found it difficult to describe the book as "an ambitious work" due to the fact that while a broad swathe of material is dealt with, most of it is examined only perfunctorily, leaving Rodway with the impression that Yeates "has lost interest in his subject entirely."
_	The station is built at an angle to give the impression that the building is sinking.
_	Samuel's program was far from mastering the game, although one win against a blind checkers master gave the general public the impression that it was very good.
_	However, by the end of 1945 her OSS handlers had the impression that Agent "Gambit" was "underutilized" because she had only very limited opportunities to make appropriate contacts.
_	Initial contacts showed that the Mongols had the impression that the Pope was the leader of the Europeans, and sent him messages insisting that he submit Europe to Mongol authority.
_	When it later emerged that a technical glitch involving the stadium's big screen had mistakenly created the impression that fans were booing at the guests, he apologised.
_	The New York fans in attendance, under the impression that the game was over, ran onto the field to celebrate.
_	Director Nikos Nikolaidis said the following about this film's reception during an interview: "When I was shooting "Singapore Sling", I was under the impression that I was making a comedy with elements taken from Ancient Greek Tragedy...
_	In 1991, he faked his own death to give the impression that he had been killed by a car bomb in Croatia, possibly trying to get out of paying maintenance to his estranged wife at their family home in Hereford, afterwards breaking off all contact with his family to maintain the ruse and relocating to Belgium, living under the assumed name of "Philip Stevenson".
_	successfully gave the impression that FUSAG was to land at the Pas de Calais, convincing the Germans that the real attack at Normandy was a feint.
_	Another shows a man with a microphone (allegedly a reporter for Syrian state TV) placing "bags of vegetables" in the street to give the impression that some of the victims were civilians shopping in the nearby market.
_	The vast majority of the preserved Linear B records deal with administrative issues and give the impression that Mycenaean palatial administration was highly uniform with the use of the same language, terminology, system of taxation and distribution.
_	They return to their house, giving the impression that Henry died after being sent into the air.
_	The game was almost the same as the previous one for Aris, and although a second-halftime wake-up call gave the impression that Aris had won the game, Prokom made an unexpected comeback, and was in the lead, 83–81, after a successful 3-point shot by Tomas Masiulis, with only 6 seconds left in the game.
_	When Larry arrives, stunned to see Anna (whom Dan didn't know would actually be there), he acts under the impression that she is the same person from last night and makes a fool of himself.
_	The script leaves the impression that all the parties concerned don't seem to have enough brains to walk and chew gum at the same time.
_	Her mother, Mrs. Warren (her name changed to hide her identity and give the impression that she is married), arranges for her to meet her friend Mr. Praed, a middle-aged, handsome architect, at the home where Vivie is staying.
_	The film received positive feedback including the impression that Anne Curtis will once again win the Best Actress Award.
_	It also includes in-studio sequences of her in front of a bright screen, giving the impression that she is in front of the actual light of the lighthouse.
_	The number of recessed storeys was reduced to just one on the ground floor which gave the impression that the whole building was supported on the expressed columns.
_	With its Nazi-inspired belief in the central authority of a strong "Führer", as well as its powerful propaganda elements, it gained support from many among the Oslo upper classes, and began to give the impression that "big money" lay behind it.
_	The intention was to create the impression that an invasion was aimed at the Pas de Calais some time in mid-July; once the real invasion had landed, six fictional divisions would keep this threat to Calais alive.
_	Subsequent erosion by glaciers and meltwater has exposed these dykes which give the impression that a giant hand has plastered gobs of lava onto the face.
_	Critic Robert Shelton was under the impression that "Self Portrait" was intended as a serious release.
_	All signage for the ride was removed at the end of 2012 which gave the impression that Thorpe Park weren't planning to open the ride anytime soon.
_	The puppets were intentionally designed as to appear mechanical, which would contrast with the use of living rats, to create the impression that the rats were more alive than the humans.
_	They were hoping to discredit Collins' testimony by establishing his credentials as one of Inspector Collins' mentors, thus giving to the jury the impression that he was more of an expert than Collins in the study of fingerprinting.
_	Although the term pathogenesis-related proteins by itself may give the impression that (all) proteins common to pathological processes in a given plant species can be considered PRs, proteins that are constitutively present in low, yet readily detectable amounts, but which are increased substantially by pathogen infection, such as oxidative and hydrolytic enzymes or general enzymes of aromatic biosynthesis, have been excluded.
_	This gives the opponent the impression that there are two of him for a doppelganger type effect, though the anime gives him the ability to hug and high five his after image, making it slightly unrealistic.
_	Muslims who met with the group later said Akkari's delegation had given them the impression that Danish Prime Minister Anders Fogh Rasmussen somehow controlled or owned "Jyllands-Posten".
_	The cannon then points at the tower leg of a lookout, giving the impression that it will fire at the lookout and destroy it, which is a reference to the opening sequence of the television sitcom "F Troop".
_	Starting with "Weight Gain 4000" onwards, she is animated via computer software, though her appearance is portrayed to give the impression that the show still uses its construction paper technique.
_	To give the impression that this was the main assault, spare aircraft engines mounted on trucks were used to create huge clouds of dust.
_	Title 15, Chapter 8, Section 291 of the United States Code makes it unlawful to stamp goods in the United States with "United States assay" or any similar stamp which gives the impression that the item has been officially assayed by the United States government.
_	The complex contains 407 living units and features distinctive windows that open out giving the impression that the building is an old factory, but the building has always been apartments.
_	Enno tried to give the king the impression that Norwegians were so displeased with the Danish rule that they would rather be willing to succumb to Sweden.
_	In the 2010 miniseries "Pixie Strikes Back"; Pixie finds herself and several of her teenage teammates under a spell, causing them to live under the impression that they are ordinary high school girls.
_	This creates the impression that anything that could provide any shading has been banished.
_	Author Jason Epstein commented that the movie gives the impression that if people were smart enough or lucky enough, they could survive the Holocaust; this was not actually the case.
_	The Allies staged elaborate deceptions for D-Day (see Operation Fortitude), giving the impression that the landings would be at Calais.
_	Under the guise of making a movie, he has his underworld friends try to crack the lottery safe open while all around him are spectators and even police officers, all under the impression that they are watching a film director at work.
_	Other essays, novels and short stories were published between that time and Indian independence and these added to the impression that he was an agitator.
_	Columbia did not service the gospel radio stations like Heart Warming did, leaving the impression that the Oak Ridge Boys were leaving gospel music, which hurt the group's popularity among its core fan demographic.
_	Mr. Garrison is under the impression that he is a "woman trapped in a man's body" and decides to have a sex change, which is performed by Dr. Biber of the Trinidad Medical Center (with a video clip of an actual depiction of a sex change operation being shown).
_	At sixteen, she was goaded into attending a dance audition by some school friends under the impression that she was applying for summer season in Scarborough.
_	Marty Tobin of Quai Baco got the impression that he heard the melody of "Le miracle" dozens of times since Joe Dassin, but the presence of the choir and "Celine's touch" make it work well again.
_	In February 2011, the museum denied a same-sex couple entry to its after hours "Date Night" and refused to reimburse the cost of their tickets (about ), stating it was clear from the advertisements that the event was about Christian marriage, which is between a man and a woman, and that one of the men had made a statement in a blog post a month earlier that gave the museum the impression that the couple was planning to be disruptive.
_	They were maintained like statues by elders and priests under the impression that if Akasha - the host of Amel, the Sacred Core - died, all vampires would die with her.
_	The film makes no mention of the Sharifian Army, and leaves the viewer with the impression that the Hashemite forces were composed exclusively of Bedouin irregulars.
_	Herb tries to convey the impression that he is a hard working, clean-living all-American guy, but as the episode goes on, the TV hosts systematically expose his incompetence as a worker and as a family man.
_	They also chose to have Batman start the game with access to the gadgets unlocked in "Arkham Asylum", to convey the impression that Batman is fully prepared for the inevitability of things going wrong in Arkham City.
_	It begins in 1830 as, in the words of J C Sainty, 'it would be misleading to convey the impression that there was in any precise sense a Leader of the Whig Party in the House of Lords before 1830'.
_	I was very upset at the New York Times obituary, which was very brief and gave the impression that she was merely an opera coach.
_	Crude stories are crudely handled, giving the impression that they are rushed through in a hurry - anything to get a thousand feet of negative ready for the market.
_	George has to give a lecture on risk management (because his résumé gives the impression that he is an expert on the subject), but he finds that he can't study for it because books on tape have spoiled him.
_	The conflict was based in personal animosities between Sunde and Koht, as well as the impression that Koht had been responsible for Norway's failed policy of neutrality before the German attack in April 1940.
_	The replicas of the image are considered to be "sisters" to the original, with the impression that it is the idea of the Virgin which is important, not the physical image.
_	Dohre was under the impression that the person on the line was AIIMS Forensics head Dr. TD Dogra.
_	They were designed to give guests the impression that the trains had been traveling through Africa for a hundred years, collecting grime and rust along the way.
_	While serving time in a juvenile correction facility, Lonnie Machin creates a makeshift hologram projector and two-way communicator, and uses it to leave the impression that he is still held in detention.
_	Much legal and legislative action around CPCs has attempted to rein in deceptive advertising by CPCs seeking to give the impression that they provide abortions or other women's health services.
_	Murs commented: "Sadly she kept giving me the impression that she didn't like me as much, and ultimately it didn't work out, so that's where the idea of me singing 'Please Don't Let Me Go' came from."
_	He also dismissed the writers' ploy to give viewers the impression that Mike had died for almost the entire episode.
_	It is impossible to avoid the impression that this is not an ordinary scientific hypothesis.
_	The book received praise for revealing the nature of Mao's regime and also criticism for giving the impression that cannibalism was systematic and widespread.
_	At the same time, ISIL sympathisers in rebel-held territory took control of the public address systems on village mosques and announced that ISIL was in control, while members of ISIL sleeper cells, which didn't number more than 10 per each village, attacked the rebels from behind and created the impression that the breach of rebel lines had indeed taken place.
_	Etgar is "not much of a stylist - you get the impression that he throws three or four of these stories off on the bus to work every morning," and his "wild, blackly inventive pieces...might have been dreamed up by a mad scientist rather than a writer."
_	Staff remembered him as "polite" but got the impression that Ames had "put up a wall around himself".
_	On April 21, 1992, Jose Andres de Oteyza met with Peter Soderquist representing the City of San Diego Airport Division in Mexico City and on April 22, sent a letter to San Diego Mayor Maureen O'Connor stating that ASA was under the impression that the Mexico-San Diego study group was only considering the TwinPorts proposal and was not aware that the study process was comparing both the ASA and TwinPorts proposals, and could consider a "third" proposal.
_	In a review for "JazzTimes" Mike Shanley notes "A casual listen to "Spacer" could give the impression that all the tracks have a similar approach and that one blends into the next.
_	Raymond Pierrehumbert, an atmospheric scientist at the University of Chicago, said the presentation was "designed to be deceptive by giving people the impression that the article … is a reprint and has passed peer review."
_	In saying this I do not want to give the impression that I did it all by myself.
_	avoid the impression that he was no longer interested in TM.
_	Because all these flood stories deal with events that allegedly happened at the dawn of history, they give the impression that the myths themselves must come from very primitive origins, but the myth of the global flood that destroys all life only begins to appear in the Old Babylonian period (20th–16th centuries BCE).
_	Although many leave the impression that he was present or in command at those actions, it was sometimes the case that he entrusted other officers to engage the enemy, such as at remote locations, and that he could not have attended them all in person.
_	Steve Connor links the terms "hoax" and "conspiracy," saying, "Reading through the technical summary of this draft (IPCC) report, it is clear that no one could go away with the impression that climate change is some conspiratorial hoax by the science establishment, as some would have us believe."
_	Each morning, he would come out carrying a satchel to give the impression that he was going off to court, when, he was in fact, going to teach at the local school.
_	The attack is considered to be a human error on the Israeli side and was conducted as part of a series of deep penetration strikes named Operation Priha, Israel said it was under the impression that the school was an Egyptian military installation.
_	The physically recovered Blacky and company are still in the cellar under the impression that the War is still going on above.
_	Cootes, being a vegan, is angry because he is under the impression that Ted has eaten the spring rolls, nearly coming to blows before Lily steps in and advises Cootes of other possible food options.
_	Given the two failures and the imminence of the French offensive on the Aisne, the term was dropped in favour of "Eingreif division", a term with connotations of "interlocking" and "dovetailing", to avoid the impression that they were replacement divisions standing by, rather than reinforcements fundamental to the defence of the battle zones, by operating support of the local garrisons of the .
_	"The Penultimate Suitor", which received the Iowa Poetry Prize this year, follows through on its predecessor's promise--it soars whimsically around the relationship between love and fine art, dabbles in traditional form, and generally gives the impression that the poet is having a really good time, as is charmingly evident on the first page of the book...
_	First, there is always a chance that the bully boss is labouring under the impression that this is the way to get things done and does not recognize the havoc being wrought on subordinates.
_	However, others, like producer Martin Birch, remember that Kirwan was often seeking reassurance from Green and that he was always in awe of him: "I often got the impression that Danny was looking for Peter's approval."
_	This increased coverage gives the impression that the defense is widely used, but this is not the case.
_	Supported only by a hundred troops and by a cavalry, Aguirre gave the impression that he had been sent out to suppress a minor disturbance.
_	This unsent letter was one of several items which created the impression that Grant routinely drank to excess.
_	Under the impression that Castro's rule would be brief, they agreed to aid the Cuban children by providing funding for Operation Peter Pan.
_	There were also a few papers but I am under the impression that none of them contained my name and residence.
_	Although the large size of shell middens gives the impression that the people associated with them lived primarily on shellfish, careful excavation of middens has revealed large quantities of fish bones, indicating that the people obtained more of their protein and calories from small fish than from shellfish.
_	When the leaves are shed, the tree gives the impression that it had been planted upside down.
_	As the leaves were starting to turn brown and fall from the trees, the production were forced to find as many as possible and paint them green to give the impression that the movie was set in summer.
_	Externally, because the roof was longer than that on the tourer, this gave the impression that the car was a 2+2, but internally it was the same size, and simply replaced the convertibles soft top with a full-length fibreglass roof.
_	Singh was under the impression that he was being taken to play volleyball, and he struggled to play.
_	Ray and Hendricks then learn that Skinny Wang (Glen Chin) is involved with the knock off jeans and they seek him out; which results in the death of Wang and the pursuit of angry workers, who are loyal to Wang and who are under the impression that Ray and Hendricks killed him.
_	Famously, he would emerge from his office when each newly loaded kiln was ready for firing, and scatter in handfuls of brightly coloured crystals over the raw mix, to give the impression that the special properties of his product were the result of an unidentified "magic ingredient".
_	According to Geoff Kitney, a Fairfax journalist who has covered immigration since the 1980s, his explanation of the terms of the agreement left the impression that, at the very least, he knew it would be difficult to show that the deal was not a cave-in.
_	There is a feeling of randomness about "Caverns of Thracia", "Dark Tower" and the others which is not present in the TSR Modules, and one gets the impression that the coherence is incomplete.
_	The "Daily Mirror"s Ian Hyland compared it favourably to the Channel 4 documentary, suggesting it was a "lesson in TV making", while suggesting the footage gave the impression that the party was "a cross between "The League Of Gentlemen" and Maggie the vomiting WI lady from "Little Britain"".
_	CSV gives the impression that only two stakeholders are important - shareholders and consumers.
_	These portrayals may give the impression that poverty and welfare are primarily black issues.
_	I don't know how Steve came to the impression that Ronnie and I would fit in this scenario, but I have to say that the end result, "Le Chat Bleu," is one of my favorite rock albums of all time...
_	The thief is actually the baker, a small man, who used the boots to give the impression that he was larger than he was, thus planting a false trail and allowing him to use escape options such as climbing out a window and down a drainpipe that would have been impossible for a man of the apparent size of the thief.
_	In the ruins there are partially shaped stone blocks which give the impression that the site was aboandoned in a hurry.
_	And in the end, he left the impression that the British were not solving Enigma messages.
_	I had the impression that married life would take up all my time.
_	She said, "I left the impression that the truth is not important."
_	The summer time is the best time of the year to experience PEI traditional music and despite the concerns noted above, if you were to tour the island in the Summer, you would leave with the impression that the traditional Celtic and Acadian cultures brought the island over 300 years ago were remarkably intact.
_	This gave O'Neill's forces the impression that they were acting within the law.
_	She had traveled from her village located at Isondra in Betsileo country to the south which had been destroyed by fire, walking the great distance and traveling only at night in order to deliver to the king what she called "Kelimalaza" ("the Little Famous One"), giving the impression that it was no less than the greatest treasure in the land.
_	Dougherty had trucks drive to and fro to give the impression that the position was being reinforced.
_	Like most professional wrestling "brass knuckle" championships, both wrestlers would heavily tape their fists to give the impression that each participant were wearing brass knuckles; the title was generally defended in no-disqualification matches and it was legal to punch an opponent.
_	Downs testified at trial that he "accepted the money under the impression that it was a belated campaign contribution."
_	"It is dangerous if some EU countries give the impression that they are morally superior to other member states.
_	Nadir's aria "Je crois entendre encore", towards the end of act 1, is written on a barcarole rhythm, with a dominant cor anglais whereby, says Lacombe, "[t]he listener has the impression that the horn is singing".
_	Anyone watching should have the impression that the school is a single body, a continuous row.
_	Their hats were emblazoned with the words "Penny Post" and they were numbered 1, 4, 8 and 16 (giving the impression that the business was bigger than it was).
_	Thus this organisation achieved to shake the impression that people who belonged to the establishment were continuing to support the junta especially when it was revealed to the eyes of the public that generals, lawyers or active judges, who were amongst them, had developed a dynamic form of resistance against the military regime.
_	(The televised version misleadingly gives the impression that everyone in the huge crowds shown is waiting for a chance to perform for the judges.)
_	In January 1867, he applied to the President for reinstatement, stating, "My resignation was tendered while under the impression that the honorable Secretary of War was unfriendly toward me."
_	The other is lovely widow Vivian who was a successful book editor and who is under the impression that Herb is really a doctor, not a dancer.
_	Similar to classic Marvel superheroes, the character is under the impression that her powers make her different from most people, and considers herself to be an outsider as a result of this.
_	Epigraphic evidence attests to large numbers of auxiliary units stationed throughout the Dacian provinces during the Roman period; this has given the impression that Roman Dacia was a strongly militarized province.
_	In his review of "Intrigue" for "The New York Times", Thomas M. Pryor considered the film a "conventional exercise in screen melodramatics " and George Raft's role as "... all so much wasted effort on his part for no one could possibly inject any semblance of verisimilitude into the hopeless botch of incident "[sic]" which Barry Trivers and George Slavin set to paper under the impression that they were writing a screen play."
_	Further, the screenplay also gives the impression that the successful original production of "Show Boat", which Ziegfeld produced, closed because of the Great Depression.
_	The two musicians met up in a hotel bar in Dublin and soon Bonamassa floated the idea, which Hart accepted immediately, although she was at first under the impression that he was asking her to sing backup vocals on his next album.
_	His figure fills the picture plane giving the impression that he is a confident, masculine young man.
_	The green line was then redrawn in blue ink on the southern map to give the impression that a movement in the green line had been made.
_	Jèrriais is often called "Jersey French" or "Jersey Norman French" in English (though this may give the impression that the language is a dialect of French) and "jersiais" or "normand de Jersey" in French.
_	The Palestinian militants moved positions frequently during the more than 4 hours of fighting creating the impression that many more militants were involved.
_	However, none of the statements remotely suggests that the authors were under the impression that Donkey Kong was connected with the company holding the King Kong trademark.
_	And in a May 2011 column in the "Southeast Missourian", Bullard wrote that, "The emphasis on core inflation may give the impression that the FOMC does not take into account some important price changes when making decisions about monetary policy.
_	A hawk beating its wings stands under this panorama, which gives the impression that the panorama lies on the shoulders of the hawk.
_	Lugar said that the foundation could create the impression that foreign donors were giving money to gain access at the State Department: "The core of the problem is that foreign governments and entities may perceive the Clinton Foundation as a means to gain favor with the Secretary of State".
_	The credits give the impression that hosts Anna Wallner and Kristina Matisic are tip-toeing around a store, naked.
_	She refuses but before she leaves, she gives the impression that she and her band will leave town peacefully, possibly to meet Stregobor somewhere else for a final showdown.
_	He knows how to flatter and coax it and send it gracefully from one musical episode to the next ... one had the impression that Mr. Previn had been writing for the musical theater all his life.
_	He was a megalomaniac of much character that when a Time magazine interviewer asked him what Rome's greatest legacy was, he said, : "Its ruins", apparently wanting to give the impression that while the ruins of Rome were all that remained of its greatness, his own greatness will surpass them with his visionary building projects.
_	Gen. Daniel Tyler to look for a fording point across Bull Run Creek and to "keep up the impression that we are moving on Manassas".
_	In the background, Van Gogh used short brushstrokes of light blue and pink, giving the impression that the fruit is sitting in a basket.
_	This gave the impression that the building was only two storeys, rather than its actual three.
_	Others, including the Portland chapter of American Institute of Architects, Vera Katz, Laurie Olin, and Michael Powell (of Powell's Books) were against the plan, with Powell saying "I was sort of under the impression that people came downtown to work and shop, not to gain a rural experience".
_	The "Anglo-Saxon Chronicle" attempts to convey the impression that Alfred held the initiative; it is "a bland chronicle which laconically charts the movements of the Danish victors while at the same time disingenuously striving to convey the impression that Alfred was in control", although it fails.
_	The review on the Elsewhere site gives the impression that the album is more in the MOR vein.
_	On the west side of the church, the road has a steep descent which gives the impression that the church is on a bluff.
_	The implication found in many accounts of burnt mounds gives the impression that they are found in Ireland and Scotland, but they also are found in Wales and in England.
_	They were used primarily to provide messages to the resistance, but also to thank their agents or simply to give the enemy the impression that something was being prepared.
_	The earliest fossils widely accepted as echinoderms appeared at about the same time Because Darwin's contemporaries had insufficient information to establish relative dates of Cambrian rocks, they had the impression that animals appeared instantaneously.
_	As the British column traveled, Lafayette sent small squads that would appear unexpectedly, attacking the rear guard or foraging parties, and giving the impression that his forces were larger than they were.
_	Similarly, other ministers and also members of the Free Democratic Party (FDP) felt that they should at least seriously test Stalin’s proposal so that the world public would not get the impression that reunification fell through because of West Germany.
_	The programme had human voices in sync with the actions of the live animals, to give the impression that the creatures were performing activities.
_	To give the impression that the convoy consisted of the powerful ships of the line that the Indiamen resembled, Farquharson ordered his ships to advance in line of battle.
_	The presentation retained TWW in-vision announcers, giving the impression that little had changed.
_	In the season finale "Lucifer Rising", Sam kills Lilith under the impression that her death will prevent the final seal from breaking, and in doing so inadvertently breaks the final seal, releasing Lucifer.
_	The reason for this stretch of the definition is often for the short-term marketing advantage of the new textbook, because, although first editions are often considered more valuable than later editions to book collectors, being a subsequent edition of a previous textbook gives the impression that the textbook denominated as a subsequent edition is more authoritative.
_	Malathi Rangarajan of "The Hindu" claimed that the film was "the genuine depiction of village life" that "transports you to the era of classics in a rustic ambience, Bharatiraaja style", further citing that "all the same, when graphic pictures of gang rape and killing in cold blood dominate, things becomes too much to stomach" and that Ameer "only creates the impression that village folks as a whole are a belligerent lot."
_	In McRobbie's opinion, postfeminism gave the impression that equality has been achieved and feminists could now focus on something else entirely.
_	"Kirkus Reviews" wrote "some essays work better than others, but in general the collection is marred only by a few too many run-on sentences and the occasional quick ending, giving the impression that the author was writing to hit a certain word-count".
_	Raj grows up into a talented criminal, going in and out of short stays in jail, and working for Jagga's gang, while his mother is under the impression that he is an honest businessman.
_	In an ambivalent review on the website MercatorNet, Francis Phillips wrote "The book leaves one with the impression that it is a somewhat hotchpotch compendium of views and articles already well rehearsed by the author—though nonetheless true for all that.
_	Kirk and Gregory return, angry not only that they can't find Andrews or the $100,000 he embezzled, but that a hotel clerk, Perry, was under the impression that Waring left Andrews' room carrying what appeared to be a lot of money.
_	He hit well in the practice games and accompanied the first squad to Ft. Myers for the two game series with the Colonels, a circumstance that gave rise to the impression that he is regarded in a favorable light by those in command."
_	We're going to try and give the impression that we're rethinking and restarting, because they've ("opening ceremonies") escalated since Los Angeles in 1984.
_	In her review in "The New York Times", Janet Maslin called the film "a flat, lifeless movie . . . about as uneventful and unromantic as a romantic comedy can be" and added, "it never creates the impression that any of the lovers much care about one another, or even that they're people at all."
_	Faulty intelligence gave Napoleon the impression that the main Austrian attack would come north of the Danube.
_	He feared that the embassy would be targeted by organized attacks if any group involved in the clashes got the impression that the US was intervening in the conflict.
_	It has often been illustrated in the popular literature (as a "tiny dinosaur"), leaving the impression that more is known about it than actually is.
_	The Green Line was then redrawn in blue ink on the southern map to give the impression that a shift of the Green Line had been made.
_	Some of the ship's ballast tanks were also flooded to give the impression that she had been sunk.
_	For it gives the impression that a person comes and goes, stands and sits, with the same mind, but the mind is different in each of these activities.
_	Some media headlines, such as "USA Today"'s "X has Cosby kid's film on spot", gave readers the impression that "all 77 million weekly watchers are outraged by the behavior of their little Denise", according to Trustman Senger of "The Washington Post".
_	The members stated that any delay in electing Landis might have been resulted in an unfortunate increase in public pressure, possibly creating the impression that the move was somehow forced rather than voluntary.
_	She feels bad about always wanting to be the best and feels under pressure since she has the impression that no one in her family understands her.
_	Lyttelton replied that it was reasonable for Staunton to decline the match, but that in his opinion Staunton should have done so plainly in his first letter to America, but had instead often given the impression that he would soon be ready to start the match.
_	As the ride continues, the floor starts a separate movement from the rotating drum which gradually gives the impression that the room is rotating backwards and forwards further each time.
_	Filming presented a particular challenge, as the aim was to give the impression that the viewer was in the wardrobe with the characters, and not to "cheat" by giving the impression that the viewer was outside the wardrobe looking in.
_	One has the impression that "Sur Les Femmes" is a mere exercise in rhetoric intended less to persuade, than to impress and entertain."
_	In response to Morphy's complaints Lord Lyttelton, then president of the British Chess Association, said that it was reasonable for Staunton to decline the match, but that in his opinion Staunton should have done so plainly in his first letter to America, but had instead often given the impression that he would soon be ready to start the match.
_	Unfortunately, it may create the impression that we have tried to build realistic sets but have failed for want of skill or money."
_	Although his defenders say he treated both Christians and Buddhists equally, the fact that the top positions of the KNU were filled almost entirely by Christians seemed to confirm the impression that he promoted the minority Christians' interests at the expense of those of the Buddhists and animists.
_	He kicks Leonardo out of his house when he his under the impression that Leonardo raped his wife.
_	Chantry Island is a small patch of land surrounded by a small dyke, giving the impression that it is an Island.
_	Goebbels and Göring ordered their administration to listen to Furtwängler's requests and to give him the impression that they would do what he asked.
_	(The after-action report of "Fliegerkorps XI" contained a passage recounting that the operational area had been so well prepared that it gave the impression that the garrison had known the time of the invasion.)
_	Stella's parents visit one day and come under the impression that she and Albert are dating.
_	She begins dating him under the impression that he is his twin brother, Cameron Robinson (also played by Hunter).
_	Unfortunately, this 'act' also gives more savvy tourists the impression that the Maya are extinct, and their traditions are only being reenacted by local populations, obscuring the reality that there are over a million Maya alive today.
_	She also watches cartoons, such as "Looney Tunes", under the impression that it is a nature show.
_	Britain First's campaign for the by-election drew attention when the party uploaded a photo of Fransen together with local activists from UKIP, who responded by saying that the activists were not aware of the implications of the photograph, while Fransen said that the UKIP activists asked for the photo and that she was under the impression that there were strong similarities between the two parties.
_	LFOs can also be summed and set to different frequencies to create continuously changing slow moving waveforms, and when linked to multiple parameters of a sound, can give the impression that the sound is "alive".
_	Art historians have written of the work's "distinctly stage-managed character: items are arranged as if they are props, while the dramatic lighting increases the impression that a play is being enacted ...
_	Longing to be human, servant and maître d' Lumiere is also of the impression that he is worth nothing unless he serves, singing,"Life is so unnerving/For a servant who's not serving."
_	UEFA and the Spanish Government and Football Federation decided that Spanish football teams due to play matches on 11 March and 12 should do so, lest they give the impression that the militants had disrupted normal life, and the teams complied with this decision.
_	The Mystery Hole is an underground series of rooms where the walls and floors are built at angles to give the impression that there is something wrong with the gravity in the area.
_	Some even started using multiple X's (i.e. XX, XXX, etc.) to give the impression that their film contained more graphic sexual content than the simple X rating.
_	In 2003 in response to Grant Palmer's book in which he gave the impression that at least some of the scholars at the Joseph Fielding Smith Institute supported his views on church history, the Smith Institute issued a statement directly rejecting the views advanced by Palmer.
_	They gave the viewers looking up at the ceiling the impression that they were seeing the sky filled with saints and angels.
_	Steve is ambushed and put on a boat to Nome, giving the impression that he has coldly left Lettie behind.
_	Trevelyan nonetheless argued, "The film gave the impression that it was exploiting violence, and in particular, sadism for commercial reasons."
_	Doctor Browning fakes Myra's medical tests, in order that she might reconcile her relationship with Mercedes, and she becomes under the impression that she is dying.
_	Severus gives the impression that his reign was brief, for he states that "Zacharias did not choose to become king, but occupied himself with the word of God and the salvation of his soul" and appointed as king "a kinsman of his named Simon".
_	The tabloid press and blogosphere feed on each other to create the impression that the two are in fact dating.
_	Only eight RX-78 suits were produced during the One Year War, although continual remodelling and upgrading created the impression that there were more than eight units.
_	Speakers with very wide, or rapidly increasing directivity at high frequencies, can give the impression that there is too much treble (if the listener is on axis) or too little (if the listener is off axis).
_	Anne made the king comfortable confiding in her about political issues by giving the impression that she was indifferent to it and made him ask her advice by supporting his own ideas.
_	In the film, Adèle's parents are seemingly oblivious to her love affair with Emma and politely greet her under the impression that she is Adèle's philosophy tutor.
_	Gladstone had gone to his estate at Hawarden to recover from an illness and thus was not present at the meeting on 18 January where Gordon was given the Sudan command, but he was under the impression that Gordon's mission was advisory whereas the four ministers present at the meeting had given Gordon the impression that his mission was executive in nature.
_	These were followed by the aforementioned turnaround out of the structure over the heads of the queue pen (possibly designed to give the impression that the car has "burst" out of the ride).
_	Dr. John Krystal, editor of the journal "Biological Psychiatry", wrote that these results "[added] to the impression that people with borderline personality disorder are 'set-up' by their brains to have stormy emotional lives, although not necessarily unhappy or unproductive lives".
_	By 2008, BP's branding campaign had succeeded with the culmination of a 2007 Effie Award from by the American Marketing Association, and consumers had the impression that BP was one of the greenest petroleum companies in the world.
_	Brijmohan is under the impression that she dumped him for a richer man; as a result, he decides that he never wants to associate with women again.
_	This required, first to create the impression that Albanians demanded a government brought to life with the support of Italy, and second, an official government body established legally, which would be the best option to avoid any other representatives of Albania (claimants) which might show up and be introduced at the Peace Conference.
_	It is not known whether he really was buried there, but the Mongols took several steps to give the impression that he was.
_	The rests get progressively longer, giving the impression that the piece is over many times in a row, making for an amusing ending.
_	He is still under the impression that he is Wen Shui's real son.
_	Nevertheless, Heuvelmans thought his influence on the story to be more significant, stating that "In going through the two books we [he and Van Melkebeke] really had the impression that it was what we had originally done at the beginning.
_	The men simulate what they are going to do in the exercise, but Godfrey “nips outside” for a few minutes once he had heard Jones say “Trickle, trickle” repeatedly in order to give the impression that he was hiding in the false log being floated down the river to the windmill.
_	Sometimes you get the impression that this is a small, small company but it is the world's biggest automaker so we have a right to make demands."
_	Andy Gill of "The Independent" observed that "Goldfrapp now suddenly effect a complete volte-face on "Head First", heading back to the electronic pop of their three previous releases", which is "a curious, circuitous trajectory which gives the impression that Goldfrapp are in the invidious position of playing catch-up to all the Gagas, and Little Boots upon whom they must surely have been a major influence."
_	Ingeborg seeks out Mads, under the impression that he's bedridden.
_	Tentacles and other repulsive appendages are seen protruding from every organic wall in this area, and numerous areas even resemble body parts, giving the impression that Alice is travelling through the Queen's body.
_	As part of the German plan for the Battle of Verdun (21 February – 18 December 1916), the other German armies on the Western Front were ordered to divert attention from the 5th Army with line straightening operations and giving the impression that reinforcements had arrived.
_	"I got the impression that she did not want to put me in danger".
_	Some groups may reside in one location for years and still give the impression that they are only there temporarily.
_	The "blubbering" about the brilliance of Shakespeare's works is repetitive, and upstages the initial whiff of scandal, giving the impression that the film is "much ado about nothing".
_	The name "Jared Demeter" listed as a second guitarist in the liner notes included in the booklet of the EP is just a made-up name to give the impression that there were two guitarists on the EP.
_	Lazarus also designed and stylized the Toys "R" Us logo, which featured a backwards "R" to give the impression that a child wrote it.
_	However, when Kinoshita saw a production of a Shakespeare play in Japan after returning from England, he got the impression that Japanese performers’ performances did not deliver the greatness of Shakespeare’s speeches to their audience.
_	After listening to the band's approach on the first song "Inori", Namba received the impression that the band were going to make an album with an entirely new form, however found that the album was merely an extension of their previous music.
_	He gave me the impression that he felt that there was no sufficient reason why he should not go and he was going to offer his services freely.
_	Although in years past, Randolph had supported "Negro only" marches, partly to reduce the impression that the civil rights movement was dominated by white communists, organizers in 1963 agreed that whites and blacks marching side by side would create a more powerful image.
_	Kramer finished the race in a time of 12:54.50, under the impression that he had won the gold medal in a new Olympic and track record, but was then told by his coach, Gerard Kemkers, that he had been disqualified.
_	The "Excelsior" bridge was a redress of "Enterprise"s command center, with consoles taken from the battle bridge of the "Enterprise"-D to convey the impression that the "Excelsior" was a more advanced ship.
_	Sakurai received the script without any accompanying visuals, and first arrived for recording under the impression that he would be voicing a different character than the one featured in "Final Fantasy VII".
_	But Barney joins the hug, under the impression that this man is his father.
_	He was a tall, erect, distinguished-looking man, who, with his white hair, blue eyes, ruddy complexion, white mustache, and in his manner and dress, conveyed the impression that he might have come from the English landed aristocracy.
_	They wear hooded cloaks, giving the impression that they still have a head, however under the hood, the skin is tied into a tight knot where the head has been removed.
_	Soviet soldiers entered the war under the impression that their roles were primarily related to organization of Afghan forces and society.
_	Holmes helps the boy in opening a puzzle-box, with Watson giving the boy advice about using his "little grey cells", giving the impression that Poirot first heard about grey cells and their uses from Dr. Watson.
_	Tiffany was under the impression that Chucky planned on proposing to her, after finding a ring on the mantle in their apartment the night he was killed.
_	However, Khan turned down the role, concerned that he did not want to give his audience the impression that the real show was a fraud by playing a fraud host in the movie.
_	Rudkin, who claimed to have seen Hairy Jack herself, formed the impression that black dogs in Lincolnshire were mainly of a gentle nature, and looked upon as a spiritual protector.
_	The two actively fought for ownership of the band; Cadogan, under the impression that the band was made as an equal partnership, was outraged to find that Jenkins had made legal changes to make Jenkins the sole owner of the band.
_	The WPA attempted to confine the problem by presenting it as Falung Gong issue and, at the same time, make the impression that the members of the movement were likely not mentally sound, that it was a sect which likely brainwashed its members, etc.
_	In 1900 the Guardians of Monmouth Workhouse decided there would be no extra treats at Christmas to avoid the impression that the Union was a charitable institution.
_	Rogers was outstanding among Astaire's partners not because she was superior to others as a dancer, but because, as a skilled, intuitive actress, she was cagey enough to realize that acting did not stop when dancing began ... the reason so many women have fantasized about dancing with Fred Astaire is that Ginger Rogers conveyed the impression that dancing with him is the most thrilling experience imaginable.
_	“At one point,” she has said, “I suddenly got the impression that one-third of the opposition movement was made up of not particularly clever people, another one-third of Kremlin agents and the final third of simply crazy folks.”
_	The animated picture of signal 24 is wrongly giving the impression that the yellow light is shown before the green one.
_	For Freda's next film, "Caltiki – The Immortal Monster", he used an English pseudonym of Robert Hampton to give the impression that the film was not Italian.
_	Jackson wrote it was “justice turned bottom-side up” to grant relief to the groups while denying it to an individual, and that the Court “may create the impression that the decision of the case does not raise above the political controversy that engendered it.
_	Wires were attached to the back of each actor, allowing them to lean forwards to give the impression that they were being "sucked back in time" when the final cut was put together.
_	Miró painted these large scale works (as well as "Bleu II") influenced under the impression that he got on his stay in the United States.
_	Crook lied about how many signatures he already had, giving the impression that the signature he was currently asking for would make no difference.
_	In the prequel show "Caprica", the original theme is heard relatively unaltered before the beginning of a professional Pyramid game, giving the impression that it is the National Anthem of either the Colony of Caprica or, given that Caprica is the capital of the Colonies, the Twelve Colonies as a whole.
_	Testimony was offered in court to convey the impression that Helen Kane adopted Baby Esther's boops to further her own popularity as a singer.
_	Ko Yee Hong is a designer at Ka Yan Company and also Yat's neighbour and his appearance and character gives people the impression that he is a homosexual, but Yat is adamant to go against these opinions by saying that Hong is just pretending to be gay so that girls will put their guard down and he can take advantage of them, she vows to break through this false image of his.
_	Making a right turn, guests head for the docks and get the impression that their car will plunge into the river, but quickly make a sharp turn in a different direction and enter a warehouse full of barrels and crates containing explosives.
_	Fitzmaurice continues by saying, "The layers of echo surrounding Legrand's voice during its chorus, as well as the gauzy glow wrapped around everything, give the impression that the airy expansiveness of 2010's Teen Dream has contracted, but somehow the sound is just as "big", if not bigger, than before.
_	He was gloomy about her prospects of recovery, and Sir Francis Laking encouraged the impression that royal health was all well.
_	From statements made by Secretary of State Shultz, the Soviet leadership came under the impression that the US would cease military shipments to the mujahideen immediately after Soviet withdrawal, with the condition that the USSR "front-loaded" its withdrawal (i.e. withdrew the majority of its troops in the beginning of the process, thereby complicating redeployment).
_	Eric would often hold an empty paper bag in one hand, throw an imaginary coin, or other small object, into the air, watch it during its flight and then flick the bag with his finger giving the impression that the item had landed in the bag.
_	Shahumyan was under the impression that the Bolsheviks would soon be sending reinforcements from the Caspian Sea to assist him although the prospects of receiving such relief remained unlikely.
_	His contempt for the AFL was mimicked by other writers who wrote derivatory columns, spreading the impression that the AFL was inferior to the NFL.
_	John Mehegan—is under the impression that Powell was present, adding to the controversy over piano players.
_	Fraser was of the impression that the event was "developed, perceived and presented in English with a French song."
_	The three possible spelling variants of the same name (e.g. Müller / Mueller / Muller) in different documents sometimes lead to confusion, and the use of two different spellings within the same document (like in the passports of German-speaking countries) may give people who are unfamiliar with the foreign orthography the impression that the document is a forgery.
_	The officer gave the impression that he supported the plot and asked to meet this new caliph, upon which Khalid revealed him to be Burhan and even gave the officer the exact address of Burhan's house.
_	Mary Macarthur was also concerned that the result of this action would lead to the impression that having set minimum wages would lead to unemployment increases.
_	Claude was said to have been influenced by the Nottingham painters Henry Dawson and J. M. W. Turner due to the use of light in his paintings, although it has been said that his paintings of the Thames give the impression that "the Thames is in the tropics".
_	"If the remarks on the tape left anyone with the impression that I was disrespectful to either Governor Cuomo or Italian-Americans, then I deeply regret it."
_	March gave the impression that he was running for his life from angry fans and teammates.
_	Foley is largely unconcerned that Dillon cannot tell him who murdered Coyle, leaving the impression that he knows Dillon is involved but remains too useful to pursue for the murder of a petty criminal such as Eddie Coyle.
_	According to Yokota, he was under the impression that Mario was suited for children, causing him to create "cute" music that would appeal to the targeted audience.
_	Ahtahkakoop was under the impression that the previous missionaries under the Roman Catholic Church that visited his people would send somebody to educate his children, and others in his band, which they had stated they would.
_	Its precinct is enclosed by an L-shaped madrasa to the west and south, and a seawall with grill-windows to the north, giving the impression that one is in a picture gallery looking at framed Bosphorus seascapes.
_	There were disagreements about expenses, and he complained that ‘the house is occupied by the [Baker] family, yourselves and relatives; and when I am home the social intercourse and the administration give the impression that 64, Avenue Road is the residence of the Misses [Baker] where Mr. Spencer resides when he is in town.
_	Playford gave the impression that the LCL membership were there solely to raise money and run election campaigns; his grip on the party was such that he frequently ignored LCL convention decisions.
_	I don't believe Jimmy meant to absolve me of all responsibility for my work, but I got the impression that wild intuitive guessing was all I had to do to make art.
_	They want to give the impression that I'm not criticizing Israeli policy, but that what I'm saying is anti-Semitic."
_	Bryant also apologized for giving the impression that race was a factor in the actions of police (Bryant is black and his wife is white) - an allegation initially leveled by his attorney.
_	Nonetheless, the Indian Navy immediately was under the impression that it was militarized and an updated submarine that poses serious threats.
_	An unstated goal was to present to other nations the impression that the NSDAP had the full and enthusiastic backing of the entire population.
_	Although modern and contemporaneous accounts of the battle convey the impression that it marked the end of the regiment as a combat entity, a significant portion of the unit continued to serve actively in the Continental Army throughout most of the remainder of the war.
_	This, when properly performed, gives the impression that the dancer is somewhat sliding on the floor, and the loose movements of the hands create the impression that the dancer is not totally in control of the direction of movement.
_	Furthermore, writes Feldman, the Steinsaltz Talmud gives off the impression that the Talmud is intellectually flabby, inconsistent, and often trivial.
_	Ricky Malone has a new job at a resort and invites his talented friends, who are mistakenly under the impression that Ricky is entertainment director there.
_	This valuation was used to give the court and Hogan the impression that Denton's stock would cover the majority of the money owed by the company.
_	This gives the album a continuous flow, and gives the impression that it all came from one person's "mind."
_	For example, despite the implications of the Special Theory of Relativity on faster than light travel, it "can" be done via wormholes—technobabble provides an "enabling device" to provide the impression that this current understanding was "limited" or "flawed" without actually having to explain how or why.
_	Once retracted, only the upper part of the turret was visible, with the gun barrels positioned vertically, one aft of the other to reduce drag, giving the impression that the aircraft had additional antennae.
_	Dave Bist of "The Montreal Gazette" has written that "These Eyes" and "Laughing" gave its audience the impression that the group only made music for the money.
_	In Mount Kisco, Louis and Adina Werfel focused their attentions on the children and adolescents of the community, with whom they learned and studied, giving over the impression that a life filled with Torah and Mitzvot can be enjoyable.
_	"Gore talked about 2005 and 2004 being very strong seasons, and if you weren't paying attention, you could be left with the impression that there was a direct cause and effect, but he was very careful to not say there's a direct correlation," Schmidt said.
_	The latter claimed that the passage may have been improperly excluded from some manuscripts in order to avoid the impression that Christ had sanctioned adultery:
_	However, he was criticised for being occasionally too cautious and not using all the batting strokes of which he was capable—his good batting technique gave the impression that he could easily score more quickly.
_	Rather, members of MUNSU acting without quorum announced that the union supported the striking bus drivers, picketing alongside and giving the impression that their major service consumers supported them—in effect, prolonging the strike for the remainder of the semester.
_	Her lawyer stated Smith was under the impression that she was being photographed to embody the "all-American look."
_	This would attract Allied reserves from Assam, and also create the impression that the Japanese intended to attack Bengal through Chittagong.
_	Under the impression that Janet has escaped from the asylum, Grace stabs Henry to death, expecting Janet to be blamed.
_	According to McDade, the "only thing new and weird" in the film, is the claim that video footage of Earth was actually filmed through a small hole to give the impression that Apollo 11 was not in low earth orbit.
_	Because federalism was the principal change proposed by the republicans in the 19th century, scholars of the subject give the impression that federalism did not exist under the monarchy.
_	This gives people who meet Special Forces the impression that they know everything.
_	She often uses her telepathy to blend her psychic signature into the background thoughts around her, making her difficult for other psionics to locate or track, or to induce a hypnotic trance in others, during which she slips away at superhuman speed, leaving them with the impression that she simply vanished.
_	We find it hard to avoid the impression that a priest was better liked by the church administration, the less he came into contact with the Secret State Police."
_	Politifact states: "When Assange points out in the context of justifying the title "Collateral Murder" that the word "RPG" was not used until after permission to engage was given, he leaves the impression that the soldiers were given the okay to open fire on a group of unarmed men, or men believed to be unarmed.
_	He always gave the impression that he would be the last man on earth to come to such an end".
_	This is an album which gives the listener the impression that Intercooler are having fun doing their thing and recording their music.
_	The rest of the nation has the impression that Louisiana doesn't want to work ... that Louisiana will tolerate corruption ... that Louisiana is not serious about improving its quality of life.
_	The survivors of the RWR were ordered to "execute a sweeping attack by the lower ground around the enemy's left flank", with tank and artillery support, under the impression that the 43rd Division had reached Verson, although this position could not prevent a counter-attack from the south-east.
_	The cast was praised as well: "Louis Hector, in traditional cape, peaked cap, and double-breasted suit, played Holmes in the approved manner and at all times gave the impression that a manhunt was in progress.
_	Beer used his new status in the Ministry of Defense to his advantage, to create the impression that he had a very close relationship with Ben-Gurion and that he was one of his confidantes and advisers.
_	Nontricyclic antidepressants have improved potency and onset action acceleration in antidepressant response than SSRIs alone, which give the impression that synergism is an efficient property in mediating antidepressant activity.
_	The supply did not equal what was available in developed countries, but it was enough to give the impression that the country was finally emerging from austerity...
_	Dortujla is struck with the impression that the Handlers are Face Dancers, but standard Bene Gesserit detection techniques are unable to confirm her suspicions.
_	As the 50th anniversary of the end of the war approached the Japanese government wanted to collect the bones, and Nishimura was under the impression that they would have them tested and try to return them to their relatives.
_	When one compares Willie's drawings and photographs of his wife, one is left with the impression that Faram incorporated his ideal body type, tall and slender, and she is said to have shared the artist's interest in bondage and high heels.
_	Recruiting Fang after she gets separated from Vanille, Cid has her and his subordinate Rygdea capture Snow and use him to find the other l'Cie under the impression that the Calvary would back them up as he helps the party escapes from Yaag Rosch in Hope's home town, and then stage a rescue mission on the "Palamecia" to save Sazh and Vanille.
_	Adolf von Harnack thought that although the biography cannot have been written immediately after Cyprian's death, the final chapter and others give the impression that Cyprian's martyrdom was very recent and so attributes the work to AD 259.
_	The photograph, taken during the Second Intifada in 2000, as published in "The New York Times", "The Associated Press", "The Wall Street Journal", and other newspapers worldwide, gave the impression that the Israeli police officer had brutally beaten a Palestinian.
_	We get the impression that this is an issue that's really going to test the family."
_	Simon Fraser University professor Doug McArthur has noted that Martin's leadership campaign used aggressive tactics for the 2003 leadership convention, in attempting to end the contest before it could start by giving the impression that his bid was too strong for any other candidate to beat.
_	The Spiess brothers are both under the impression that their twin was killed in the war.
_	The chosen clothes, in both case stylish suits, give the impression that Manet considered himself not only a successful artist but a successful figure in society: the paintings are a record of this success.
_	"The flight is rapid, low and erratic for a Danaid, giving the impression that it may not be protected species.
_	Furthermore, Noah is under the impression that his application to art school was rejected.
_	He was known for his miserly attitude, often giving the impression that he would rather bowl ten consecutive maidens rather than take wickets if it meant conceding runs.
_	However, under the impression that they would not see one another again, Vince returns in the show's final episode and professes his love for Holly, uniting them once again.
_	Detractors claim that these reports gave the impression that HavenCo was registered on Sealand itself, and that the company would issue domain names under the authority of that entity, whereas it had no entitlement to do so.
_	Under the impression that they had been evicted, some of the remaining housemates spoke poorly of Emma and Michelle.
_	The charity removed a photograph of Goody and published a statement on their website and criticised the confrontational format of the Channel 4 show which gave the impression that Goody's behaviour was condoned.
_	Kaufman's 1990s Snapple ad trademark was to appear on camera with her head barely peeking out over the Snapple reception counter, giving the viewer the impression that she was incredibly short in stature (She is tall).
_	It also found that the 25th was not compact enough to be an acceptable replacement because the two Latino communities in the district were more than 300 miles apart, creating the impression that it had been deliberately drawn to pick up as many Latinos as possible without regard to compactness.
_	In that episode his mother and her friends in Chicago are under the impression that he is the leader of The A-Team, which Hannibal and the others go along with.
_	After concerned neighbour Emily Bishop (Eileen Derbyshire) enquired about Minnie's despondence, Minnie showed Emily the letter and broke down in tears, under the impression that Armistead and Ena had had an affair.
_	Although Jean Redpath disparaged Water's tune as "phony", preferring a longer version of Child 113 to another tune, by 1965, Jim Butler had heard Waters' tune sung by a Scottish student at the University of British Columbia, unaccompanied in the traditional style, and under the impression that he had learned it from his grandfather.
_	Pope Clement VII willed his relative Alessandro de' Medici to be the monarchical ruler of Florence, and went about requisitioning that dignity carefully; he wanted to give the impression that the Florentines democratically chose Alessandro to be their monarch.
_	Betts also shows that several other studies excluded cases where pregnancy had occurred amongst women using the ovulation method, which significantly skewed the findings, and gave the impression that the Billings method was more successful in preventing unplanned births than was actually the case.
_	However, perhaps to avoid the impression that he was keeping a rival government to Emperor Suzong, he sent the several chancellors that he had retained or created while on the journey to or after he arrived in Chengdu – Wei, Fang Guan, and Cui Huan – to Lingwu to formally invest imperial power on Emperor Suzong and to serve under Emperor Suzong.
_	At a secret meeting at Joachim von Ribbentrop's house on 24 January 1933 attended by Hermann Göring, Wilhelm Frick, Ribbentrop and Von Papen, they worked out the plan that the best way of overcoming President von Hindenburg's opposition to appointing Hitler Chancellor was by creating a right-wing "government of national concentration" that would ensure the Chancellorship went to Hitler while giving the impression that Hitler's power would be limited by creating a coalition government of all the German right.
_	In a letter sent to Greek King Constantine in January 1915, he wrote that: "I have the impression that the concessions to Greece in Asia Minor ... would be so extensive that another equally large and not less rich Greece will be added to the doubled Greece which emerged from the victorious Balkan wars."
_	However, while this offers the impression that New Jersey is entirely urban or suburban, it is not.
_	Under the impression that Spike means he is looking for puppies, Eliza (and a reluctant Darwin) agree to help him find them.
_	She is under the impression that Webber is living in their old home until the phone rings and the answering machine plays the Gates' message.
_	In a posting on RPG.net he explained that the point of including the three playstyles in "Paranoia XP" was to counteract the impression that "Zap"-styled play was the default for "Paranoia", an impression which had in part been created by the more cartoonish later supplements in the West End Games line (as well as "Fifth Edition").
_	He created the impression that there's a thread running through the whole thing."
_	He wrote that having another artist featured on nine of the thirteen tracks "gives the impression that as a product, having Jennifer Lopez alone is simply not enough".
_	Bluemke at the time was under the impression that the nudity depicted in the film would be condoned as natural and innocent, given the backdrop of the story, and given that the actors involved were prepubescent boys.
_	Pitkin, using at least in part money provided for the purpose by Brerewood, paid off some of his existing creditors early, giving the impression that he was flush with cash in the wake of his profitable marriage.
_	For a time I, at any rate, had the impression that I was the only man left alive.
_	Anand has said of him in 2012: "I don't know exactly how many lines he's established, but you get the impression that for the last 10 years we've only been using his ideas.
_	These are generally exceptionally good impersonators, who are used to give the impression that their "target" is conducting a radio interview, telephone call or other vocal assignment.
_	The company initially was given the impression that it would have access to the original "Micronauts" molds and tooling which would reduce production effort.
_	The Swedish ambassador in Tel Aviv... attacked the article and thereby created the impression that having views about or intervening in individual publications should be a task for the government and its representatives."
_	Police released the McFadyen e-mail but refused to release the following e-mail exchanges, leaving the impression that the McFadyen e-mail was actually intended as a serious threat.
_	This program is a known rogue antispyware program, which fraudulently uses the "search and destroy" logo and a name similar to Spybot to persuade users into downloading it under the impression that it is Spybot Search & Destroy.
_	The World War II cameraman Leonid Kogan wrote in a letter addressed to Leonid Brezhnev that "the film uses material from the Nazi anti-Semitic films" and it forms the impression that "Zionism and Jews are one and the same."
_	If a principal creates the impression that an agent is authorized but there is no actual authority, third parties are protected so long as they have acted reasonably.
_	To give the impression that the convoy consisted of the powerful ships of the line that the Indiamen resembled, Farquharson ordered his ships to advance in line of battle, and the French retreated, convinced they were facing a superior force.
_	The commission was of the impression that Widerøe's transition from an all-Twin Otter airline to also operate the more demanding Dash 7 was not properly carried out, which had resulted shortcomings in the training and operating procedures.
_	Instead, Piercy simply gave the impression that he was going to intervene, trying to attract the attention of "Alliance" and "Pallas".
_	This gives the impression that the project is on schedule when actually some activities are being ignored.
_	Originally the 'birdcage' (so-called because it consists of metal railings on either side giving the pedestrian the impression that they are actually in a 'birdcage') ended in a foot crossing over the railway approximately 100 yards west of the halt.
_	Dallas was under the impression that he was to move back to Sheikh Abbas, from his right on Clay Hill, while Chetwode meant that the two divisions would reconnect north of Mansura and not much over from the 161st (Essex) Brigade, 54th (East Anglian) Division, at Green Hill.
_	The multiplication of the offensive, in contrast to the defensive, fighting equipment (swords type Boiu – Sauerbrunn, battle axes with spiked disc, daggers, spearheads, arm bracers, all made of bronze), the development of settlements with man-made defenses, the existence of distinct warrior graves, gives the impression that the Bronze Age was a warring world.
_	International IDEA conveys the impression that hitherto it has displayed respectful neglect of all "big fish" donations, which tend to go unreported.
_	He made it a rule not to mention military commanders by name, yet the surviving fragments give the impression that Cato's campaigns were highlighted.
_	Possible iridescent or glossy feathers that changed appearance according to angle of light may also have given the impression that it had even more colours.
_	The new term gave the impression that "Spanish Americans" belonged to a true "American" political culture, making the established order appear all the more democratic.
_	He does, however, state, "my analysis of Beijing’s policies and practices has left me with the impression that the Chinese leadership has no reservations about using whatever means necessary to secure Chinese rule over Tibet."
_	Also, when discussing how Johnny would be expelled from the mosque afterwards, Nalluri suggested using the idea where he is thrown to the top of the surveillance van, which would give the audience the impression that the antagonists were on to them.
_	Douglas said he was inaccurately quoted, but the impression that Lewis was aloof and egotistical was firmly planted in the public's perception by the end of the 1984 Olympic Games.
_	That way, you would get the impression that the place was packed...
_	Kate Robinson describes Burns' intention in collecting Irish art as a means "to become involved in the cultural development of his ancestral country and to correct the impression that we were a nation [Ireland] without a visual imagination."
_	Jun Maeda, who worked on the scenario for "Kanon", commented in March 2001 that the Japanese public may have fallen under the impression that Key makes soothing games because of "Kanon"'s influence, but Maeda affirmed that there was not one person who worked on "Kanon" who thought that.
_	In 1951 an editorial in "The Times" opined that while most adults may be under the impression that [the English] Father Christmas is home-bred, and is "a good insular John Bull old gentleman", many children, "led away ... by the false romanticism of sledges and reindeer", post letters to Norway addressed simply to Father Christmas or, "giving him a foreign veneer, Santa Claus".
_	I am under the impression that he was a deputy sheriff engaged on some official errand."
_	First, there is no stylistic break in the "Chronicon" after Florence's death, which gives the impression that a single author was responsible for the entire work.
_	Following a disastrous date with Declan, where Bridget is given the impression that Declan cannot handle her disability, Bridget begins dating Josh.
_	Historians have always emphasised the localism in rural England, with readers gaining the impression that the little villages were self-contained communities.
_	Heller's success prompted fellow magician Harry Kellar to change his name as to avoid the impression that he was copying the greatness of Heller.
_	This report was entirely inaccurate as no submarine had been at that location, but gave the impression that at least one submarine had been safely passed.
_	Until watching the film for the first time, Vowell had been under the impression that "Incredibles 2" would mostly be about Violet's anger at her father until experiencing the film's other storylines and characters.
_	Driving simulators, for example, give the driver on board the impression that he/she is actually driving an actual vehicle by predicting vehicular motion caused by driver input and feeding back corresponding visual, motion, audio and proprioceptive cues to the driver.
_	Pamela's mother, Rebecca, left Digger and her children behind in mysterious circumstances when Pamela was a year old, giving Digger the impression that she was dead.
_	"You could never believe," he wrote to his friend and long-term correspondent Marchesi, "the impression that this book made.
_	Haig again left the politicians with the impression that he thought the Germans would launch small attacks on the scale of Cambrai.
_	Equipped with appendages at both ends of the body, a caterpillar clasps with its front legs and draws up the hind end, then clasps with the hind end (prolegs) and reaches out for a new front attachment - creating the impression that it measures its journey.
_	Also, in many cases, the information provided by state bodies is shaped in the officials' favor, giving the impression that authorities are behaving in compliance with the law, while in fact depriving the requester the information they are seeking.
_	This account of that attack and the impression that the humanitarian actions of Hartenstein made is documented in the book by David Cledlyn Jones, "The Enemy We Killed, My Friend".
_	There are tourists who do not give the impression that cricket is their main consideration".
_	Under the impression that the original work was known to Origen, he is obliged to date it at the end of the 2nd century or the beginning of the third.
_	Alberdina Houtman and colleagues theorize that while the Mishnah was compiled in order to establish an authoritative text on halakhic tradition, a more conservative party opposed the exclusion of the rest of tradition and produced the Tosefta to avoid the impression that the written Mishnah was equivalent to the entire oral Torah.
_	The fans in attendance, under the impression that the game was over, ran onto the field to celebrate.
_	Even before "Order of the Phoenix", Harry repeatedly gets the impression that Snape can read minds.
_	Each filmmaker has his own rhythm, yet I had the impression that he was very surefooted.
_	Bryanchaninov wrote that the book might give a student the impression that "unceasing prayer of the heart," one goal of the practice, can be achieved after only a few weeks of practice, but that the pilgrim's experience and preparation were remarkable.
_	His intention was to create the impression that South Tyrol had originally been an Italian territory, that the German history of South Tyrol was merely a short interruption and that as a consequence the land rightfully belonged to Italy.
_	Anna Schreiber wrote back and replied that she asked his forgiveness if she had ever given him the impression that she believed the accusation against him, and that she wished that she was dead herself.
_	An attractive classmate, Angela, gives Rob the impression that she wants to sleep with him.
_	He gave the impression that Mzali had not been authorized to raise prices.
_	Subsequently it transpires that a soldier has called home discussing the episode with his parents and has given them the impression that wounded Taliban had been liquidated and that the soldiers had laughed about it at the debriefing.
_	The SLD's Bartosz Arłukowicz heavily criticized the report prepared by Sekuła in parliament, saying, "I get the impression that you’re behaving like Howard Webb, you see fouls that aren’t there, goals that aren’t there and ignore the ones that are."
_	Writing in 1891 the biographer Alexander Craufurd states that General Craufurd, and apparently many other officers were "under the impression that Whitelocke was a traitor as well as a time and vacillating fool, but I have failed to find in the account of the court-martial any solid evidence in support of this impression".
_	All through Series 5, the producers gave the impression that Molly and Golly were going to get together - but never did, and agreed just to be friends.
_	Norris initially refused to file the paperwork for the wedding, as he claimed Wedge had lied to him about the marital status of Holloway, creating the impression that she was a widow.
_	Yohe commented on how the Review gives the impression that all climate damages can be avoided through the investment of 1% of world GDP in mitigation.
_	The Pope most certainly did not want to give the impression that he himself wanted the office.
_	Deception could include false statements about using contraception, age, gender, whether one is married, religion or employment, sexually transmitted infections testing status, giving the impression that one is someone’s partner, and falsely making the person think that a sexual activity is some type of medical procedure.
_	Greven suggested that these changes were to create the impression that the wearer was alien in nature and to highlight the difference between that character/actor and the others in the film.
_	After the Wende, documents available from Biermann's file at the Stasi Records Agency revealed that the reviewers were under the impression that he was a regular user of stimulants, leading to the rejection of his application.
_	On 19 March, I Anzac Corps was ordered to advance on Lagnicourt and Noreuil, under the impression that the fires that could be seen foreshadowed a retirement beyond the Hindenburg Line.
_	After a divorce she married Oscar George Daniel Berry in 1901 although she lied about her age presumably to give the impression that he was three and not seven years younger than her.
_	He got the impression that the flying creature was hovering around.
_	As early as 750 BCE, archeological evidence gives the impression that the proto-Germanic population was becoming more uniform in its culture.
_	While held at Barth, Casey was one of a group of prisoners known as "ghosts" who hid from the Germans within the camp for extended periods and did not attend the roll calls to give the impression that they had escaped.
_	This creates the impression that she must adjust it due to the wind veil or even hold it in place.
_	As part of this offer, DeLorean was apparently under the impression that the British government would provide his company with Export Credit financing.
_	The "Illyrian Count" (as Vladislavich liked to style himself) maintained trade contacts with fellow Serbs and was under the impression that they would rise in revolt against the Sultan as soon as the Tsar invaded the Danubian Principalities.
_	Recalling that they shared everything with the sick people and describing Guevara's wave on departure as follows: "I got the impression that Che was saying goodbye to institutional medicine and becoming a doctor of the people."
_	After the Southern Rhodesian electorate voted for self-determination in 1922, this objection ceased, and in 1927 the Conservative Colonial Secretary, Leo Amery gave Southern Rhodesia settlers the impression that he supported their claim to acquire the more productive parts of Northern Rhodesia.
_	"On Water" "created the impression that visitors are walking on water.
_	In sum, the listener gets the impression that, although all the elements are in place for a fine album, excessive control has led to a dilution of the power that could have been".
_	Todd was very much in charge in the studio, however, and I got the impression that everybody was looking to him."
_	This man Saddam who resorted to play-acting and, as reported, forced Israel to bomb his [nuclear] center in order to save himself from the disgrace he himself created by attacking Islamic Iran—his aim in doing this was to camouflage this crime and give the impression that Israel opposes Saddam, ...
_	According to this account, he brought out a coffin and buried it to give onlookers the impression that Qatada died of natural causes, but Hasan had his father secretly buried beforehand.
_	The parliamentary committee noted ""... one can not do away with the impression that in practice closer and closer relations did come to exist"".
_	Littlejohn attacked Ken Livingstone ("throughout his career he has given the impression that he has never met a terrorist he doesn't like") and Cherie Blair ("will [she] extend to him the same sympathy and understanding that she lavishes on Palestinian suicide bombers"), while calling for the Human Rights Act to be scrapped and extremist mosques shut down.
_	She was also under the impression that she and Dylan would star in a mainstream film together.
_	Some DJs create mix-tapes or remixes of songs and then announces their own names over the remixes and unintentionally creating the impression that the songs are their own works.
_	Although his age gives the impression that he is the second-most-experienced member of the team, Ash has stated more than once that he is not interested in leadership, recognising his niche and remaining within that area even when the group votes for a new leader during Mickey's absence.
_	However, Gunjan under the impression that Nupur and Mayank have not patched up, stayed strong to girl power and continued rejecting Samrat’s apologies.
_	In the NES version, for example, if a Z piece is "vertically" aligned and falling touching the left wall, the player cannot rotate the piece, giving the impression that the rotate buttons are locked.
_	The track begins with slow strings, deceptively creating the impression that it is a ballad.
_	The garden was divided into circular areas whereas the building was positioned at the center of these circles, creating the impression that the building was an integral part of the garden.
_	Wright then asserts that this leaves the public with the impression that the group was guilty of the disproven charges.
_	When Thomas began his investigations into the origins of the mound builders, he was under the impression that the mounds were made by a more advanced race that no longer existed.
_	French came away with the impression that he had "only with difficulty persuaded (Roberts and Kitchener) on 29 January to send the Cavalry Division and himself in command of it".
_	A band of thieves gives her the impression that she is an heiress, and she briefly enjoys a time in a mansion.
_	During the trek Ben and Nella harp at each other when the opportunity arises, giving Stark the impression that Ben and Nella dislike each other.
_	In contrast in of "R. v. Gowan" Gowan, a known sex worker, under the impression that exposing the breasts was now legal, solicited clients at an intersection, motioned to her breasts and called out "Do you want to fuck?".
_	By the end of October the Special Commission on Afghanistan, which consisted of Andropov, Gromyko, Ustinov and Ponomarev, wanted to end the impression that the Soviet government supported Amin's leadership and policy.
_	One critic got the impression that the sculpture was the leg bone of some huge prehistoric animal.
_	Derek Birkett, the owner of One Little Indian, was under the impression that 4AD were trying to poach his band and along with label designer Paul White and Einar Örn Benediktsson from The Sugarcubes visited the 4AD offices in Alma Road to confront Watts-Russell.
_	"That, and the way they were pursuing his political allies, arresting them, created the impression that this was not the right way."
_	Laura Prudom of "Variety" also praised the pacing of the episode as well as the season's payoffs, writing "There's a clarity of purpose in Season 6 that certainly gives the impression that we're barreling towards a conclusion instead of just meandering through Dorne or killing time in Qarth."
_	However, as he began to choose his battles and keep a tighter grip on his secrets – from his plans to his very identity – he also presented more serious, contemplative, secretive, wistful, and manipulative sides with undercurrents of mischief and authority (constantly giving the impression that there was more to him than met the eye).
_	Its timetabling announcements had been criticised by the Commissioners as giving the impression that a decision on the line's future had been taken before their enquiry was over.
_	These reviewers characterize the book as containing selective quotes of scientists' disagreements on the details of climate change in order to present the impression that there is no consensus on climate change.
_	Whedon also wanted to quickly establish how much space there was aboard the ship, and how its rooms sat in relation to each other, to avoid the impression that there were "1,400 decks and a holodeck and an all-you-can-eat buffet in the back."
_	The agents had left the Little Rock officers "with the impression that we were proceeding to Joplin, Mo., but at a given point we left the Joplin road and dropped into Fort Smith."
_	Using money she took from James's wallet, Judith travels throughout Europe and seduces various men, giving the impression that she had a wealthier and more cultured background than she actually possesses.
_	This application is useful, especially where "motivated lighting" (lending the impression that it is diegetic) is the goal.
_	A 30-second clip, the second "screamer", was released on 3 February 2018, which showed Sharma watching a cartoon on television with an idyllic smile, giving the impression that she is safe and okay.
_	Initially, he neither cried nor moved, giving the impression that he was stillborn.
_	Bandaranaike joined his Sinhala Maha Sabha in forming the UNP in 1947 having given the impression that Senanayake would soon retire and he would succeed him.
_	Many users of the exchanges are under the impression that they are victims of market manipulation and possibly even insider trading.
_	He believed that when an individual comes in contact with other people, that individual will attempt to control or guide the impression that others might make of him by changing or fixing his or her setting, appearance and manner.
_	Prior to this however, they were under the impression that Violet and Klaus were the two worst students in the history of the school.
_	Galen's rhetoric and prolificity were so powerful as to convey the impression that there was little left to learn.
_	Although they had the advantage in numbers, the French were under the impression that they were facing a superior force.
_	The international media covered the tragedies extensively, giving the outside world the impression that the entire country was amidst a bloody battle, when truly, parts of Kenya were untouched by violence.
_	When the British introduced their system of education in this area, they were under the impression that these districts were part of Maharashtra and started Marathi schools there.
_	His preference for dialogue over conflict with India and his links to India also strengthened the impression that he was anti-Pakistan amongst the more strident anti-India elements in Punjab.
_	However, Dominic's scenes with Adelle in "Epitaph One", in which he was taken out of the attic (which takes place after "The Hollow Men" but before the 2019 timeline established in "Epitaph One"), give the impression that he survived the wounds received in "The Hollow Men" and lived past 2010.
_	The ruins were deliberately built as such from new, using rough stone to create the impression that they had existed for many years.
_	He misrepresented photos of Clinton to give the impression that she had secret medical problems.
_	JoAnne is more concerned with the impression that the guests formed at the party of Sarah as opposed to caring about the welfare of her daughter.
_	Feints are maneuvers designed to distract or mislead, done by giving the impression that a certain maneuver will take place, while in fact another, or even none, will.
_	However, the terminology using "ligands" gave the impression that oxidation number might be something specific to coordination complexes.
_	He also changed the pronouns in several of the sonnets to create the impression that they were written to a woman.
_	Ignatiy Vishnevetsky from "The A.V. Club" gave the film a B−, and said: "Besson creates the impression that "The Family" is set in a world drawn from gangster movies and comic strips—an idea that culminates in De Niro participating, as the town’s token American, in a film club discussion of a certain Martin Scorsese movie."
_	It is for this reason that Chen's works create an open atmosphere which leads, while listening, to the impression that neither composer nor listener can know where the music is leading.
_	After the leak of a French Interior Ministry circular of 5 August 2010, Reding made a public statement that was interpreted as likening the 2010 French deportations of the Roma to those made from France by the occupying German forces during World War II: "I personally have been appalled by a situation which gave the impression that people are being removed from a Member State of the European Union just because they belong to a certain ethnic minority.
_	The name "Zenana" is a misnomer, states George Michell, because it gives the impression that the women of Vijayanagar royalty lived here; its design and location makes that highly unlikely.
_	As with other descriptive names in his legendarium, Tolkien uses this name to create the impression that the text is "'historical', 'real' or 'archaic'".
_	The shorter lines are on an angle to the longer lines, and this angle helps to create the impression that one end of the longer lines is nearer to the viewer than the other end.
_	On November 30, 2007, Louise Story of "The New York Times" blogged that not only had she received the impression that Beacon would be an explicit opt-in program, but that Coca-Cola had also had a similar impression, and as a result, had chosen to withdraw their participation in Beacon.
_	He often gives the impression that his characters have built up a wall around them that moves them into isolation.
_	On the other hand, marketing and advertising may give consumers the impression that the national brand is superior to a local- or private-branded product.
_	Furthermore, signallers from the division maintained wireless traffic to give the Germans the impression that VII Corps also included the notional 80th Division.
_	However, on the morning of the 16th, armed Muslim gangs gathered at the Ochterlony Monument in Calcutta to hear Huseyn Shaheed Suhrawardy, the League's Chief Minister of Bengal, who, in the words of historian Yasmin Khan, "if he did not explicitly incite violence certainly gave the crowd the impression that they could act with impunity, that neither the police nor the military would be called out and that the ministry would turn a blind eye to any action they unleashed in the city."
_	However, the manner of his appointment led to a loss of prestige for the Belgian authorities, and gave both Hutu and Tutsi revolutionaries the impression that violence might further their goals.
_	Alternative explanations are either that the description as red is a poetic metaphor for ill fortune, or that the dramatic scintillations of the star when rising left the viewer with the impression that it was red.
_	From the show's second episode, "Weight Gain 4000" (season one, 1997), Kyle, like all other characters on the show, has been animated using computer software, though he is presented to give the impression that the show still utilizes its original technique.
_	This is why readers often get the impression that the setting of her novels and dynamics between characters are a literary, or even theatrical, reproduction of the world.
_	The interrogators were under the impression that his helpfulness was inspired by the hope of escaping the death penalty".
_	Nevertheless, Cummings' status as Woburn's largest landowner, and landlord at its largest office parks, opened the paper to the impression that its editorials and business coverage were simply mouthpieces for Cummings Properties, a charge Cummings denied.
_	Until then the public was under the impression that Hassel was a real person and that his books were autobiographical.
_	Theroux, who lived in Africa as a Peace Corps Volunteer, added that "the impression that Africa is fatally troubled and can be saved only by outside help—not to mention celebrities and charity concerts—is a destructive and misleading conceit."
_	The aim was to give the victims the impression that they had arrived at a labor camp or a transit camp from where they would be sent to a labor camp.
_	Churchill firmly believed that Baldwin's conciliatory stance toward Hitler gave the German dictator the impression that Britain would not fight if attacked.
_	E. Frederic Morrow, the lone black member of the White House staff, met only occasionally with Eisenhower, and was left with the impression that Eisenhower had little interest in understanding the lives of African Americans.
_	Each ship had a masonry chamber built into the hold, filled with 7,000 pounds (3,175 kilograms) of gunpowder and heaped over with millstones, tombstones and scrap iron; stacks of timber and brushwood on the top deck were set alight to give the impression that it was an ordinary fire ship.
_	The popularity of in current ISA and in car navigation systems may give the impression that is flawless, but this is not the case.
_	This policy is aimed to give the impression that the Muslims of the region are the descendants of Ottoman-era ethnic Greek converts to Islam like the Vallahades of pre-1923 Greek Macedonia and so thereby avoid a possible future situation in which Western Thrace is ceded to Turkey on the basis of the ethnic origin of its Muslim inhabitants.
_	The panel was scheduled to meet concurrently with the 2000 International AIDS Conference in Durban and to convey the impression that Mbeki's doubts about HIV/AIDS science were valid and actively discussed in the scientific community.
_	“These were thrilling interpretations, and one had the impression that he was only warming up.”
_	Another couple who saw him from 7:30 pm to 8 pm, during which time the street lights had come on, recounted that they did not see him move during the half an hour in which he was in view, although they did have the impression that his position had changed.
_	It conveys the impression that this woman, who belonged to the middle or upper levels of Egyptian society, had led a good life.
_	The failure of the film could be due to the film's mature subject of derangement, the impression that it's a remake and also its non-superstar cast."
_	According to the "Vanderbilt Law Review" study, this politicized hiring trend reinforces the impression that the Supreme Court is "a superlegislature responding to ideological arguments rather than a legal institution responding to concerns grounded in the rule of law."
_	During the first few episodes, the series wanted to give the impression that what the spectators were seeing was an individuals´s real life.
_	Kaminski wounded a man and then shot at the altar to create the impression that he had also been shot at.
_	Due to the brain scramble, they come to be under the impression that they are Antonio Bandaras (Skull) and an unnamed German (Bulk), much to the annoyance of their inmates, Jason and Kimberly.
_	They may give the impression that a celebrity who only has a minor part in the film is one of the main cast members, or advertising a film as being more action-packed than it is.
_	One had the impression that they came directly from the heart or soul.
_	An unstated goal was to present to other nations the impression that the Nazi Party had the full and enthusiastic backing of the entire population.
_	A woman counselor Laura (Margaret Klenck) is given the young man's file and she is under the impression that he did not commit the crime.
_	Since Ella is still under the impression that Wesley is Weston, Emerson and Slater also mistake Wesley for Weston.
_	In "Incredible Hulk vs Superman", the Hulk and Superman face each other early in their respective careers (to the point that Banner's identity as the Hulk is still secret), with Lex Luthor attempting to provoke a battle between the Hulk and Superman by using a Hulk Robot to create the impression that the Hulk had abducted Lois Lane and Betty Ross.
_	I get the impression that no one had his heart in this game.
_	The three possible spelling variants of the same name (e.g. Müller / Mueller / Muller) in different documents sometimes lead to confusion, and the use of two different spellings within the same document (like in the passport) may give people who are unfamiliar with the German orthography the impression that the document is a forgery.
_	In 1943, Massigli opposed the visit of the Prime Minister of Iraq, Nuri as-Said, to Algeria after a summit with the Prime Minister of Egypt, Mustafa el-Nahhas, on the grounds that such visit would encourage Arab nationalist sentiment in French North Africa, would give the impression that France was aligning itself with one fraction, centred around as-Said Pasha, and might weaken the electoral chances of pro-French Lebanese nationalists in the upcoming Lebanese elections.
_	Most newspaper coverage thus took the form of Associated Press stories, which were largely anecdotal aggregates of reporting from its various bureaus, giving the impression that panic had indeed been widespread.
_	Creekmore was under the impression that women hindered themselves in society by molding themselves to a standard which women of the time believed men desired.
_	The Generations production team did not attend the ceremony, as Vundla explained he wanted to avoid "creating the impression that Generations in any way supports [the SAFTAs]".
_	The film's music composing duo, Vishal–Shekhar, were under the impression that they were the only musicians working on "Chennai Express".
_	He may have wanted to avoid giving the lay reader the impression that he had written a history just for lawyers like William Blackstone.
_	He gave the impression that he could score fast if he were to take the brake off but in each innings ... he played for the side rather than himself."
_	"The eyes do not focus on any outward object, and they give the impression that they will remain where they are: they see through the filter of an inner state, rather than receive immediate impressions from the outside world.
_	The design of the towers creates the impression that the building was once more of a miniature cathedral than a parish church.
_	Such phenomena can give the impression that bioactivity and gas composition is changing much more radically and rapidly than is actually the case, and any series of isolated time-point measurements is likely to be unreliable due to this variance.
_	Margaret Chan, Director-General of the WHO, replied stating, "Without question, the "BMJ" feature and editorial will leave many readers with the impression that WHO's decision to declare a pandemic was at least partially influenced by a desire to boost the profits of the pharmaceutical industry.
_	He stated that police radio transmissions, as well as the number of police entering the building, gave him the impression that a gunman was on the building's roof.
_	This decision made Collins realise it gave off the impression that the band were aiming to become "a singles band", but maintained the material remained "fundamentally the same".
_	Judges and magistrates then come under public pressure to deal out harsher sentences and politicians pass new laws to increase their popularity by giving the impression that they are dealing with the perceived threat.
_	After the talks Klitschko stated "Not a single step was made to meet the opposition, I have the impression that the authorities today did not listen to a single one of the demands of the opposition".
_	In shogi, Feint Ranging Rook (陽動振り飛車 "yōdōfuribisha") is a Ranging Rook opening in which the player first gives the impression that they are playing a Static Rook position, which subsequently switches to a Ranging Rook position.
_	The company claimed the film tarnished its image, and could give the impression that Harley-Davidson approved the film.
_	Also, I'm glad you brought up the fact that the agency has recently restructured their budget numbers to give the impression that there is nearly equal funding for treatment vs interdiction."
_	The car was then filmed as it was being pulled into the air backwards—the footage was then reverse to give the impression that it was falling.
_	He did not want to give the impression that he was spending taxpayer dollars to enhance the lifestyle of the city's criminals.
_	Maseko directed with "energy and verve," though his "struggles to capture the human drama" led to the impression that "Drum" was "a clunky TV movie, with awkward camera angles, wonky editing and clumsy sound recording."
_	The Minister found these statements to be defamative, as with regards to the "basinful of bombs" quote, it should have been qualified by the fact that he had said this regarding only military targets, and with regards to the "oriental people" quote, the article giving this quote only 3 sentences after the basin of bombs quote, gave the impression that the Minister was saying that Oriental people deserved to be bombed, when in reality, this second quote was only made at the end of the meeting.
_	A failure to state all the material facts in answer to a question may amount to both a negative and a positive misrepresentation, inasmuch as the incomplete answer may create the impression that all the facts have been furnished.
_	In case Luke is watching from a distance, Molly and Duncan begin removing supplies from the hopelessly-mired truck, giving the impression that they are going to stay through the typhoon.
_	Due to sampling manipulation, the research creates the impression that democracies can justifiably fight nondemocracies, snuff out budding democracies, or even impose democracy.
_	A long-running rumour that Sarah Greene had advertised the programme on her Saturday morning children's show "Going Live", including a visit to the location of the "haunting", which gave the impression that she was taking part in a "reality show" was debunked via the "Ghostwatch: Behind the Curtain" blog (which gathered information for a documentary about the show).
_	The managing team of PBC decided to call the company "Pacific" Bearing to give the impression that it was located in the Pacific Coast region of the United States.
_	With most of the readers unaware that these were reprints, this gave the impression that they were brand new.
_	Peggy, who had been romantically interested in him, is forced to give the impression that she knew all along and that she is more liberal than she really is.
_	Yet Hodges seems to be under the impression that he's held in much higher regard by the senior CSIs than he truly is and doesn't note his own character flaws
_	He complained that the hours-long ceremony exhausted him, but continued the practice and consistently gave the impression that he was doing it only out of concern for the well-being of his subjects.
_	At the forum, Falwell told homosexuals in attendance, "I don't agree with your lifestyle, I will never agree with your lifestyle, but I love you" and added, "Anything that leaves the impression that we hate the sinner, we want to change that."
_	Given that air pressure also depends on air density, it would be easy to get the impression that this was circular definition, but it is simply interdependency of different variables.
_	Hyrum received the impression that the assignment could lead to his elevation to be President.
_	Well, Pfc Manning was under the impression that his leaked information was going to really change how the world views the wars in Afghanistan and Iraq, and future wars, actually.
_	"Kindred" scholars have noted that the novel's chapter headings suggest something "elemental, apocalyptic, archetypal about the events in the narrative," thus giving the impression that the main characters are participating in matters greater than their personal experiences.
_	Its background color is silver with small dark spots on every scale giving the impression that they are drawing lines following the scale series.
_	The negotiations nearly broke down on the very first day, and so Peurifoy, who had remained in Guatemala City to give the impression that the US was not heavily involved with the negotiations, traveled to San Salvador.
_	He thought the way Scott was written gave the impression that Scott was dull.
_	Compared to other terms that have been used which give the impression that this stage is just a "last hurrah" of adolescence, "emerging adulthood" recognizes the uniqueness of this period of life.
_	Kim Newman, in "The Penguin Encyclopedia of Horror and the Supernatural", noted that "Inferno" was "a dazzling series of set pieces designed to give the impression that the real world is terrifying, beautiful, erotic and dangerous[...]
_	"Kirkus Reviews" said "Kirkwood's portrait of Shaw as St. Sebastian is overdone to the point of self defeat" and that "the book does clinch the impression that legal grounds for the conspiracy charges were insufficient."
_	Although they themselves would not have objected to that term at that time, today it may wrongly create the impression that they were from the current Netherlands.
_	The building is octagonal, so it gives the impression that it is round, which reflects the circular form of the sun, the moon and the earth.
_	Murray had a reserved manner, at times giving the impression that he was cold in his outlook.
_	Poe probably excised this introduction because it was not particularly relevant, and it also gave the impression that the story was nothing more than a hallucination.
_	They are puzzled by the horrified reactions to their own good-natured and normal behavior, since the family is under the impression that their tastes are shared by most of society.
_	Some types of data described here as "semi-structured", especially XML, suffer from the impression that they are incapable of structural rigor at the same functional level as Relational Tables and Rows.
_	After finding her bandboxes and meeting the Excisemen following the smugglers on the blood trail from Ludovic's injury, Tristram decides to follow them under the impression that Eustacie encountered trouble from the smugglers.
_	The morning, on the other hand, evokes the impression that "all nature had been created just in this very moment," while the evening often acts as a "mysterium mortis" with the persona poderiung on transience and death.
_	The three possible spelling variants of the same name (e.g. Müller / Mueller / Muller) in different documents sometimes lead to confusion, and the use of two different spellings within the same document (like in the passports of German-speaking countries) may give people who are unfamiliar with the foreign orthography the impression that the document is a forgery.
_	Though she forbids Yumeria's otaku quirks on the impression that it would tarnish the Yokoyama name, Yasuko accepts it after seeing it first hand.
_	It is now usually followed by a narrator who talks about the reason behind why such a situation would be serious, giving the impression that the people behind the infamous commercial never intended it to have any humor behind it and didn't want the phrase to be used in any humorous manner.
_	Simcoe ordered a cavalry charge and fired a field cannon to give the impression that a larger force was arriving.
_	She is under the impression that Kamyshev is rich and that with him she will be able to break out of poverty but soon finds out in what lowly conditions her lover lives.
_	As in some of his previous races, Rousillon raced with his head at a high, crooked angle, giving the impression that he was ungenuine and temperamental.
_	They started training together in Christchurch on the Avon River and gained the impression that they had the potential to win a medal as a coxed four.
_	The council, he wrote, often gave the impression that it represented ‘a medical establishment uninfluenced by or accountable to workaday doctors.’
_	Reynolds reports that Lissauer had the impression that the whole Nashville experience, including the 1972 European tour with "The Army" (the touring band that Johnson assembled) had been a bit overwhelming for Cohen:
_	His name is derived from the Ancient Greek word "perthō" (πέρθω - "to sack", "to ravage", "to destroy"), the fact of which may have given scholars the impression that Perses was perhaps the Titan god of destruction.
_	The writings of European archaeologists and tourists illustrate the impression that modern Egyptians were uncivilized, savage, and the antithesis of the splendor of ancient Egypt.
_	The game was delayed several times, creating the impression that the project was struggling, and went through several directors before Kusunoki assumed the role.
_	Wallace said that two-thirds of the film was quite accurate, but he disagreed with the film's portrayal of his role in the events; in particular, he objected to the impression that he would have taken a long time to protest CBS's corporate policies.
_	Schleicher was described by one journalist as having "the gift of giving whoever visits him the impression that he completely shares their opinion.
_	That was surprising"; lawyer said that one gets the impression that Office of the Attorney General "does not respect the justice system, and they still think that they are right, even when the court thinks they are wrong"; Emberland eventually recognised that some of his verbal comments can be interpreted as arrogant, adding that "They really weren't meant that way".
_	Once receiving the planet's message, meeting up with Torin to stage a plan based from it, Dantetsu kills his friend while giving all the impression that the melody sees humans while joining the Deboth Army to protect Earth in return for Torin's death.
_	The works were also known as Palmerston's Follies, partly because the first ones, around Portsmouth, had their main armament facing inland to protect Portsmouth from a land-based attack, which gave the impression that they faced the wrong way to defend from a French attack.
_	McCain had both supporters and detractors within the Navy, but the top commanders had sidetracked him with the U.N. appointment, and U.S. Secretary of Defense Robert McNamara had been given the impression that McCain was not a strong commander.
_	The Egyptian regime designated him as a representative of the RCC abroad, leaving the impression that his informal exile was temporary.
_	Miss Lockwood, though born to be sincere, has the job here of hauling rather substantial red herrings all over the stage to try and give us the impression that she is a sly minx who has either done the deed herself or else is shielding her neurotic little stepdaughter.
_	In February 1841, Ms. Frances Erskine Inglis Calderon de la Barca, as part of a long journey through the countryside and villages in the center of the Mexican Republic, visit the Hacienda San José Cocoyoc and write a short story and excited about the impression that causes this visit.
_	Geithner said at the hearing that he was always under the impression that he was an employee, not a self-employed contractor, while he served as director of the Policy Development and Review Department of IMF.
_	The only weapon we had was to leave the impression that the sky was going to fall."
_	Subsequently, the word brewery was dropped from the company name in 1982 to remove the impression that the company was engaged only in beer making.
_	The main character is almost always seen only from the waist up, to give the impression that he might be soaring.
_	Using Data's device, the team, followed by Guinan and Samuel Clemens are able to follow the alien shapeshifters to the same cavern near San Francisco, where they discover that the aliens have travelled to the 19th century to take advantage of a cholera outbreak, draining the life force from humans in infected areas to give the impression that their deaths were the result of an epidemic.
_	A small spa town tries to give the impression that it is actually a much more important place than it really is.
_	The particularly large tax increases for alcohol and tobacco, coupled with Nordmeyer's strong religious background, created the impression that he was attempting to impose puritan-like reforms.
_	Many aspects of her paintings give the impression that she worked for rich collectors: her works are larger than normal in size; they typically depict expensive objects, coins and jewelry; and many of her works have been found in collections of wealthy individuals.
_	This gave the impression that the coup plotters wanted to roll back the country to a Diệm-era position and punish those who had been involved in Diệm's overthrow and execution.
_	Its prominent feature was its large one-piece front windscreen, with large triangular quarterlights giving the impression that it wrapped around the sides of the body.
_	The music was so sensational that it gave the impression that the Palace was a trampoline in the middle of the Atlantic : Let's All Chant by the Michael Zager Band was a hit in France at the same time as the U.S. Suddenly dancing became a lifestyle.
_	Martin Kitchen also says the impression that Germany was crippled by the reparations is a myth.
_	The police arrive there and are under the impression that Dasan has single-handedly overpowered the goons and seized the ganja shipment.
_	The viewer gets the impression that Marion dreamed of how her family had died while in a coma, and that the hearse not picking her up was her dream telling her that she would live.
_	Under the impression that Psherer had fallen in the river and drowned, river men were dragging the river in an effort to recover his body.
_	Discussing this, author Hobson has suggested that Ken's numerous relationships could give the impression that the character is a lothario or a great romantic; however, Hobson noted that this would be inaccurate as Ken is "neither a great romantic nor someone with whom you would be wise to trust your romantic or emotional future.
_	NotiCen cited reports which gave the public the impression that murder rates were rising, when they actually fell by 3% in 2006.
_	It is at this point that Frasier discovers that Faye was under the impression that he was Jewish, and although this is not a problem for her, she is worried what her mother will think.
_	Therefore, some leaders had the impression that they had "gone too far" and that they had to "back up" a little, which was seen by the more liberal faction as a return to the "Old Order mentality".
_	The first was that the questions posed to the featured guest were never heard during the episode, giving the impression that the guest was relaying a stream of thoughts rather than participating in a typical question-and-answer interview.
_	The MEFO bills amounts were considered a state secret and were an important element in the impression that Hitlerian economics was a success.
_	Additionally, cavers hired for the project were under the impression that their only duties would be to haul diving and filming equipment in and out of the caves; they were surprised to learn that they would also be filmed.
_	The final stage directions note that Esther’s call for her mother "should give the impression that the future could still be hers."
_	Most of the people answering the question will usually play along, giving the impression that they believe that the so-called fake event really happened.
_	Albright turned on Punk, giving the impression that being 'Punk'd' for months had finally gotten into his head to the point to where he was obsessed with returning the favor on Punk.
_	This gave the impression that Germany was building more battleships than publicly admitted, which prompted a naval scare in Britain.
_	It means to eliminate the impression that this school is solely for Europeans.
_	However, some versions of Adobe Photoshop, CorelDRAW and MS Paint provide poor PNG compression, creating the impression that GIF is more efficient.
_	At this time, the Italians were looking for allies to restore order, fight the Partisans, and support their political claims to NDH territory, and were under the impression that the various Serb nationalist groups were far better organised than they actually were.
_	For example, Roatta was under the impression that Jevđević represented the Herzegovinian Chetniks, and that they were aligned with Dangić.
_	As a result, school books, media and curriculum content all give students the impression that females do not create history which contributes to the damaging assumption that females cannot transform the world, whereas men can.
_	The music was so sensational that it gave the impression that the Palace was a trampoline in the middle of the Atlantic : Let's All Chant by the Michael Zager Band was a hit in France at the same time as the U.S. Suddenly dancing became a lifestyle.
_	The interviewee, however, would remain under the impression that the smartly-dressed director would be conducting the interview until short notice prior to cameras rolling: this would grant an advantage of surprise, whereby the interviewee would be less likely to opt out of the Ali interview prior to its start.
_	George writes that it "gives the impression that it is actively speciating to fill the many ecological niches through its range".
_	The parody was mimicking the popular advertising campaigns that Campari, an Italian liqueur, was running at the time that featured brief contrived interviews with various celebrities that always started with a question about their "first time", a double-entendre intended to give the impression that the celebrities were talking about their first sexual encounters before the reveal at the end that the discussion had actually concerned the celebrities' first time tasting Campari.
_	The buyer, however, is often under the impression that the interest is calculated on a reducing balance."
_	Shortly thereafter, the North American Man/Boy Love Association posted an approving review of the study on their website, furthering the impression that the piece was an endorsement of pedophilia.
_	Visibly disturbed, the neighbors end up meeting Kevin, who says he is going out and gives them the impression that all is fine: until he reveals a doll made of a mop with Samantha's face on it, referring to the doll as his girlfriend.
_	He intends to trick the Foamasi into distributing the drugs to the athletes under the impression that they are performance-enhancing; in fact most of them are placebos with the mutagenic tags attached.
_	This mixing of real and fantastic elements in the work reinforces the impression that the city it represents is imaginary.
_	Kelley himself was also under the impression that his character possessed "magic powers", but after he had aged significantly enough for him to look no longer ten years old, the writers' plans were changed, and Walt was written out at the end of season two.
_	Walther you get the impression that he was programmed in school to write golden lines.
_	As Molina recalled, he left the session with the impression that Cincinnati intended to draft him.
_	It was originally going to be story-related, but the team did not want to give the impression that it was a sequel or spin-off.
_	Copeland was already under the impression that he had convinced singer and bassist Sting to join, but despite heavy use of word-of-mouth and advertisements in musical publications, Padovani was the only guitarist he could find who was interested in punk and had actual playing ability.
_	In the Neighborhood of Make-Believe, King Friday gets the impression that a magnifying glass will make Prince Tuesday grow.
_	In 1956, she stated in an interview that, while Nixon had never called her a communist, he had designed his whole campaign to create the impression that she was a communist or "communistic".
_	dk's leader has expressed dissatisfaction with the way that Blu has edited episode 5, arguing that the episode was edited such that it gives the impression that he fires the group's researcher on-screen, when in reality she chose to leave the group and the two had been discussing it for a long time before her exit from the group.
_	A "one-shot feature film" (also called "continuous shot feature film") is a full-length movie filmed in one long take by a single camera, or manufactured to give the impression that it was.
_	The "Autonomous State" title was chosen in order to re-enforce the impression that the secession was not a rejection of Congolese sovereignty, but the creation of a federally-governed region of the Congo.
_	He must deceive the Austrian spies, giving them the impression that there will be no offensive.
_	At this point, Khánh had not spoken up and allowed the impression that the moves had been made without his consultation or against his will, and an attempt on the part of other officers to take power themselves.
_	Throughout the chapter, Lauren Slater gives the impression that she is an investigator trying to solve the mystery of B.F. Skinner and his daughter whom people say had committed suicide.
_	The north and south ends of this three-domed rectangular mosque are each marked by two enormous double-storied corner pavilions; when viewed from the east these give the impression that the mosque has five exterior bays.
_	New Testament scholarship, in his view, "creates scenarios and takes over material from the social sciences to give the impression that Christianity has an authentic historical origin.
_	Equalization is commonly used to increase the 'depth' of a mix, creating the impression that some sounds in a mono or stereo mix are farther or closer than others, relatively.
_	"You get the impression that Chandan is just having fun with language – chasing it around in the hope that it will lead him somewhere significant.
_	Jill occasionally visits her husband in hospital, where he is responding well to cancer treatment, in order to put her own spin on the good news from the doctors to leave Terry with the impression that he is really dying.
_	Robert, under the impression that he is his twin brother,Cameron and is heartbroken to learn of his deception.
_	Cvijić noted the particular striking character of the Šumadinci as "something very strong, bold, with great activeness, and healthy nerves", that many of them are capable, "it seems, they manage to succeed in any enterprise", and that "there is increasingly appearing personalities with great will", "Foreign observers would have the impression that everyone thrives with intractible persistence and tenacity", "Rigid traditionalism has almost completely disappeared.
_	He adopted this presence in reaction to many guitarists whose body histrionics and facial expressions gave the impression that they were playing very difficult parts on their instruments.
_	"A few loose threads leave the impression that this is the first of many adventures for Cassidy and her team, and a refreshing lack of interpersonal and sexual drama will appeal to longtime fans of paranormal mysteries."—
_	Considering the frame narrative of the film, Anna Viola Sborgi, a literary theorist, argues that the fact that Ann begins the film in a sanatorium conveys the impression that the character is mad, resulting in a loss of ambiguity.
_	As the pigeon increased the number of times it performed the action, it gained the impression that it also increased the times it was "rewarded" with a pellet, although the release in fact remained entirely random.
_	The attack was prompted by a desire to give the Ottomans the impression that an attempt was going to be made to break out of the Anzac perimeter to the south, while a landing was planned at Suvla Bay far to the north.
_	Their original function was to create the impression that the PRC was being ruled by a diverse national front, not a one-party dictatorship.
_	These additional holdings in New Utrecht, mentioned in Governor Dongan's Patent of 1686, may have created the impression that the Van Pelts, who were always a prominent family in the neighbourhood, were paving the way for the erection of their possessions to the legal and administrative status of a manor, but if they cherished any such intention it was never consummated."
_	In order to ensure stylistic continuity, they used methods uncommon in 3D rendering to keep the artist's intentions and give the impression that it was hand-drawn.
_	Zaher described the filming process as "pretty intense", recalling that he and JoJo spent much time taking pictures wearing different clothing to give off the impression that they had been a couple for quite some time, in addition to visiting various tourist attractions.
_	Reviewers were generally polite about her novels and gave the impression that she had "ability and vision" and deserved to be read.
_	Upon the conclusion of the election, the Roman mob entered the site of the conclave, under the impression that an aged Roman cardinal Tebaldeschi (who had been left in possession of the papal insignia) had been elected, an impression that the remaining cardinals did not disabuse them of as they fled to their personal quarters.
_	To punish Eagle, sharpened a piece of bone ("paija") obtained from a kangaroo's leg, and, sticking it sharp-end upwards inside a jerboa nest told it to move about when Crow spoke to it, in order to conjure up the impression that many rats lived inside.
_	Some commuters hold the impression that the installation of TVMobile was the reason for increases in bus fares, even after announcements that this was not the cause.
_	Dr Ala Bashir, Saddam Hussein's former personal physician, stated, "The stories about Saddam Hussein having body doubles, to foster the impression that the Iraqi dictator was everywhere, are nonsense."
_	He also gave Major Anderson the impression that no relief would be attempted.
_	An important feature distinguishing news from private information transfers is the impression that when one reads (or hears, or watches) it, one joins a larger public.
_	Truman had previously, just like Hannegan, got the impression that Roosevelt wanted Byrnes.
_	One reason for his lack of popularity in the Netherlands was the impression that Cornelis Vreeswijk was a bit old-fashioned.
_	This is what gives the impression that the frenulums of some previously tongue-tied infants will "stretch" with age and growth.
_	It also states that "Another aspect of the Shaolin story subject to misperception is the impression that martial arts called "Shaolin staff/' "Shaolin boxing," etc., were actually developed at a Shaolin Temple" noting that "Recruiters for organizations such as the Heaven and Earth Society also used stories about Shaolin prowess to recruit members.
_	Some historians have speculated that references to her physical attributes may be over-represented in related historiography, thus giving the impression that this was of greater interest to her contemporaries than was actually the case.
_	She was however critical of the docudrama format of "spicy drama sandwiched between simple slices of narrative" which she compared to "watching a play with someone who insists on explaining the obvious," adding that she "got the impression that the narrator was not talking to me at all."
_	He objected that the preface gave the impression that the main battle fleet under his command had arrived late and had little effect upon the battle.
_	Negotiations continued, with Harper gaining the impression that Beatty's intent was simply to delay publication indefinitely.
_	The fifteen tracks listed for the album give the impression that it is about the same length as the band's previous two albums, but only seven of the tracks are "actual" songs.
_	The other legionnaires are on the impression that the money is being sent by his mother and that the reason for his joining the legion was his desertion from the French Army.
_	Eve is under the impression that she is going to receive a voodoo doll of her father.
_	Eight UConn players would get eleven or more minutes, giving Tennessee the impression that they were seeing fresh players every few minutes.
_	"Compute!" stated in 1989, "If you bought your 128 under the impression that 128-specific software would be plentiful and quick to arrive, you've probably been quite disappointed.
_	The erroneous reporting can be attributed to the fact that the blasts occurred on trains that were between stations, causing wounded passengers to emerge from both stations, giving the impression that there was an incident at each.
_	William McGuire set out to conduct research “on ways of inducing resistance to persuasion, under the impression that while much experimental work was being done on factors that increased persuasive effectiveness, little was being done on ways of producing resistance to persuasion” (McGuire, 1964, p. 192).
_	And in guidelines for confessors in 1997, the Pontifical Council for the Family stated that they should not be led by the law of gradualness to give people the impression that repentance does not require a decisive break with sin.
_	As the story was left incomplete with Kupifam still a child, it gave the impression that it was about "captur[ing] a state of infancy", but Brown insists it was "about more than just childhood."
_	Coughlin quoted a senior Lebanese security official as saying that "Hizbollah is desperate to conceal its casualties because it wants to give the impression that it is winning its war.
_	Lasseter recalled that Katzenberg was under the impression that Disney was "out to get him" and that he realized that he was just cannon fodder in Katzenberg's fight with Disney.
_	Benimadhab (Biswajit Chakraborty), a rich businessman is under the impression that someone is trying to kill him, but is not able to find out who.
_	His right eye was gouged or shot out, severing nerve endings and paralyzing facial muscles and giving the impression that half of his face was smiling.
_	That the Congress of the United States are unwilling, by silence, to leave the nations of the world under the impression that they are indifferent spectators of the deplorable events now transpiring in the Republic of Mexico; and they therefore think fit to declare that it does not accord with the policy of the United States to acknowledge a monarchical government, erected on the ruins of any republican government in America, under the auspices of any European power.
_	This leads to the impression that "nei" is the preposition.
_	In 2011, Dora still said: "Europe has the impression that Turkey is moving towards Islam and that it is a country that is becoming less secular.
_	His House of Commons speeches were often greeted by affectionate Labour Party cries of "Send a gunboat" because of the impression that he gave of steaming into action with all guns blazing on behalf of his constituency and also in loyal protection of any perceived threat to the Services.
_	Its similarity in tone to Clara's "canso" "En greu esmay et en greu pessamen" gives the impression that it may have been written in response.
_	According to Dr. Donald N. Wilber, who was involved in the plot to remove Mossadegh from power, in early August, Iranian CIA operatives pretending to be socialists and nationalists threatened Muslim leaders with "savage punishment if they opposed Mossadegh," thereby giving the impression that Mossadegh was cracking down on dissent earlier than planned, and stirring anti-Mossadegh sentiments within the religious community.
_	Years of steady reliable returns in combination with unscrupulous sales tactics from insurers fostered the impression that a 'low-risk' investor should invest in with-profits.
_	Indira's mother, a past freedom fighter who is on her deathbed, is relieved to see her, and is under the impression that she is free now.
_	He telephoned each of his commanders and "gained the impression that the principles laid down by "OHL" were sound but the whole art of leadership lies in applying them correctly".
_	The ductus flows smoothly, giving the impression that the symbols were not enciphered; there is no delay between characters, as would normally be expected in written encoded text.
_	They were under the impression that they could control him, but they were mistaken.
_	This plan was thwarted when he underestimated his foes, finding himself merely a puppet of the Batman Family and their allies as he serves to create the impression that Bruce Wayne is still alive.
_	Within the context of the strip club, dancers might sometimes give the impression that they are revealing private (or "backstage") information to customers in order to play a confidence game for increased profit.
_	Rhodes also claimed he would obtain a court order declaring a state of emergency that would ban further demonstrations and gave the impression that a situation akin to martial law had been declared; however, he never attempted to obtain such an order.
_	“Because they have been performing together for most of their lives, and because they play from memory, there is a lively interaction between them that creates the impression that they are improvising like a couple of virtuosic, perhaps even telepathic, jazz players” – The New York Times
_	Note "Back Home" seamlessly segues into "Break Yer Bass Drone Again" (with ..."Drone Again" actually being a reprise of "Back Home"), giving the impression that both tracks are different parts of the same recording.
_	There was not enough money for a process screen to create a rear projection effect, which was the method typically used at that time to create the impression that a scene was taking place inside a moving car, by combining footage shot inside a static car with separate footage of a moving background.
_	These employees and some of their "significant" others, were under the impression that Crown College would close and allegedly falsified loan applications and received financial aid though they did not attend Crown.
_	It is very well possible that some poet used the name Jacob – if it wasn't his name, and an often given name to celebrate the apostle Jacobus who lied buried in Santiago de Compostella – to make the impression that it was written by the famous Jacob van Maerlant.
_	The Egyptians also created the impression that they were going to attack several months before the war, making the Israelis announce an emergency draft.
_	Dell was accused on July 22, 2010 of fraudulently reporting its financial earnings to give the impression that it was exceeding analyst earnings projections.
_	Noel is left seriously injured, but recovers and is left under the impression that Mac fought the attacker off.
_	With little in common, Wellesley could not help but give the impression that he found her poor company and although she bore him two sons, Arthur, in 1807, and Charles, in 1808, they lived apart for most of the time and occupied separate rooms in the house when they were together.
_	He gave the impression that he had been Chamberlain's faithful subordinate, omitting to mention his role in changing policy in spring 1939.
_	Kenneth's skills as a lyricist paradoxically resulted in the fact that some of Ted's audiences, in the 1970s and even to the present day, were under the impression that he wrote both the music and all lyrics, which Kenneth has since revealed that he only took as recognition that he had done Ted's music justice and it was the best compliment that he could get.
_	The scholar Barbara Mann has charged that the impression that the councils of the clan mothers was "secondary" to the councils of the chiefs is a misunderstanding caused by Europeans who could not understand the gender equality in Iroquois society, and in fact the councils were equal.
_	This has given the impression that puriri is incapable of growing straight, but early reports of puriri describe naturally clear boles of 15 to 30 feet (4.5 to 9 m) and there are still a few trees like that left.
_	Ukelins were sold to people under the impression that the instrument was easy to play, but this was not the case.
_	In 2000, Laury stated, “I’ve always kind of had the impression that maybe my quilts were never going to be appropriate for a museum…
_	It should be noted that Hamilcar Barca had a subordinate named Gesco conduct the negotiations with Lutatius, in order to create the impression that he had not really been defeated.
_	The flawless recovery of Soyuz 3 left the spacecraft designers with the impression that re-entry and landing systems had been perfected: the crash-landing of the Zond 6 satellite just one month later had been partly attributed to this mistaken sense of security.
_	Gibson said he was surprised that Lightfoot had decided to run because he was under the impression that Lightfood had said he would support his campaign.
_	Dummy buildings and fortifications were built to give the Japanese the impression that the Australian presence on Goodenough was greater than it actually was, and may have deterred them from attempting to retake the island.
_	Wang attended to him, and made sure that whenever meals were served to Meng, that they were completely eaten (presumably, Wang himself ate the remainder), to create the impression that Meng's illness was not as serious as it actually was, to make sure that the soldiers would not panic.
_	Snape, who maintains that he "never had the impression that [he] had been able to teach Potter anything at all", is suspicious of Harry's newfound Potions success.
_	The government was successful in creating the impression that Shinto and Buddhism in Japan are completely independent religions.
_	"The way this has come about gives rise to the impression that something has been going on behind the scenes which should not have been going on behind the scenes and which should have been dealt with transparently".
_	The prospective in-laws dote over Shambu, ignoring Madhavan, who is unaware of the impression that Kurup and wife are under.
_	The west end, facing High Street, has a large Corinthian pillared portico, giving the impression that it is a two storied building.
_	Pinchot Meyer's sister Tony stated that the Enquirer had quoted her out of context to create the impression that she agreed with Truitt's allegations.
_	The inclusion of Beatles material was a "completely unnecessary public humiliation" for Harrison, Huntley continues, giving the impression that Starr and Lennon's solo careers up to the end of 1975 had been more successful than his – "when, in reality, the opposite was the case".
_	This was a strategic move as it gave the British masters the impression that the De Saram family had the backing of a large body of natives.
_	DeJesus was taken under the impression that she was being dropped off, and trusted Castro because she was friends with his teenage daughter.
_	Manson was under the impression that Hinman had considerable stocks and bonds and owned his property.
_	Before the 2010 election, the Labor Party lodged a complaint that Mulder may have breached the Electoral Act when he appeared in a television advertisement wearing a police uniform, giving the impression that he was still a serving police officer.
_	After discovering Emily Sim, Scully is at first under the impression that the young girl is in fact Melissa's daughter, before discovering that she is in fact the child's mother.
_	Some believe that they were taken as part of an elaborate prank, while others are under the impression that their removal was a show of respect after the events of September 11, 2001.
_	Bennett explained, "For some reason fans got the impression that [Nimoy] wanted Spock dead.
_	I got the impression that the sound onstage was good though, because none of the singers appeared to be over-singing."
_	Caldwell, based on his comments to Brace's men, seemed very much under the impression that the affair had occurred exactly as claimed.
_	This gives the impression that these centres sponsored the majority of glass working in Anglo-Saxon Britain, presumably to primarily work on making glass windows for the church buildings.
_	"El Transparente", derives its name from the play of light on the altar, and is several stories high, with fantastic figures of stucco, painting, bronze castings, and multiple colors of marble, a masterpiece of Baroque mixed media by Narciso Tomé enhanced by the daily effect for a few minutes of a shaft of sunlight striking it through an appropriately oriented hole in the roof, giving the impression that the whole altar is rising to heaven.
_	The speakers had been under the impression that the lists were the result of an internal agreement of the parliamentary group, whereas Lindtman had made the decision alone and without informing anyone else.
_	In an interview with writer Ray Sawhill, Hasting’s older brother, Jonathan Hastings, recounts how he had flown to L.A. to help his brother shortly before the accident because he had “got the impression that he was having a manic episode, similar to one he had had 15 years ago…”, at which time “drugs had been involved…”
_	The opening segment at the mall keeps cutting back to an establishing shot of the mall itself (has the show ever done something like this?), which gives off the impression that the mall is some sort of weird, nightmarish, repetitive hellscape, which, well…
_	For me, it gives the impression that “Islam” supports such actions, rather than acknowledging the many Muslim communities and individuals that don’t practice it or that advocate against it."
_	Chief Justice Vinson said that Feiner "gave the impression that he was endeavoring to arouse the Negro people against the whites, urging that they rise up in arms and fight for equal rights."
_	Another shows a man with a microphone (allegedly a reporter for Syrian state TV) placing "bags of vegetables" in the street to give the impression that some of the victims were civilians shopping in the nearby market.
_	In January 2000, the second United Alternative Conference was held, with Manning keeping a low profile so as not to convey the impression that the exercise was really just a Reform “take over” of the federal Progressive Conservatives.
_	The idea of The Mystery Man "came out of a feeling of a man who, whether real or not, gave the impression that he was supernatural", Lynch explained.
_	Oken in 1817 changed this to "Scopus", also under the impression that "Scops" was the older name for the hammerkop, and valid.
_	Press releases for "Tell Me Where It Hurts" gave the impression that "Betcha" was a cover version of the Pussycat Dolls' 2005 worldwide hit single "Don't Cha", however the song at most alluded to it in the lyrics: Thomas Callaway, Anthony Ray and Trever Smith, the writers of "Don't Cha" are not given any songwriting credit for "Betcha".
_	After published photos taken of the remaining members in the wake of Robertson's departure gave the impression that The Vaccines would continue as a three-piece, Cowan stated that Intonti and "English Graffiti" touring keyboardist Timothy Lanham had officially joined the band.
_	The skin is baggy and loose giving the impression that it is too big for the animal.
_	After her revival she acquired an advanced maturity and showed tremendous potential, it gave the impression that she was a highly gifted child.
_	Churchill, so far from pondering whether to save Coventry or safeguard Ultra, was under the impression that the raid was to be on London."
_	Lieutenant von Forstner was sentenced to merely six days of house arrest (and the public was not informed of even this token punishment, which gave the impression that Forstner had gone completely unpunished).
_	He was denied permission, and "got the impression that what [he] had asked was tantamount to treason".
_	The Democrat leaders gave hesitant responses, and according to American historian David P. Chandler, it gave the audience the impression that they were disloyal to the monarchy.
_	Alan attempts to escape the lodge as the shadowy force starts to attack it; while retrieving the manuscript pages in Dr. Hartman's office, Dr. Hartman tries to stop him and gives the impression that he is aware of the supernatural events surrounding the lake.
_	The lack of weapons of bronze, the abundance of weapons of iron, and the type of the pots and the pins gives the impression that the necropolis belongs to the ninth or eighth century B.C.
_	Despite operating in a legal gray area, many employees and pharmacists had the impression that the business was acting legally.
_	Carson's actions rallied the troops and gave the impression that a large number of Union reinforcements were arriving.
_	The Others were under the impression that the station was flooded.
_	Once Khalid was deposed, the Emirates News Agency (WAM) reported the appointment of Sheikh Saud bin Saqr al-Qasimi as crown prince without delay, which gave the impression that Abu Dhabi approved of the appointment.
_	Miles Lewis has noted "The reason why few engineers were active is that the technology was riddled with patents, and that the Monier company in particular tried to give the impression that they had the sole rights to reinforced concrete.
_	Unfortunately, Myshkin's goodness precipitates disaster, leaving the impression that, in a world obsessed with money, power and sexual conquest, a sanatorium may be the only place for a saint.
_	These factors would give one the impression that penalty kicks are converted almost 100% of the time.
_	Fitch the impression that the pair's object in doing all this is purely mercenary – to sell the verdict to highest bidder.
_	Lodge also reported that Khánh wanted to give the impression that he seriously thought that neutralist deal involving de Gaulle was a genuine and ominous prospect, and that de Gaulle had made much progress in influencing the previous administration.
_	The boys are under the impression that the outrage in question is Butters' wound (which has been medically treated by this time), but it soon transpires that the real issue is Cartman's public nudity.
_	The 90-minute program, produced by George Crile III and narrated by Mike Wallace, asserted that in 1967 intelligence officers under General William Westmoreland, the commander of Military Assistance Command, Vietnam (MAC-V), had manipulated intelligence estimates in order to show far fewer communist personnel in South Vietnam than there actually were, thereby creating the impression that the Vietnam War was being won.
_	Brian was immediately enamored with the album, given the impression that it had no filler tracks, a feature that was mostly unheard of at a time when 45 rpm singles were considered more noteworthy than full-length LPs.
_	He holds that when an individual comes in contact with another person, he attempts to control or guide the impression that the other person will form of him, by altering his own setting, appearance and manner.
_	This is similar to the misuse of proxy votes; however, in this case, the voter will be under the impression that they have voted with the assistance of the other person, rather than having the other person voting on their behalf.
_	The view has been expressed that much of this process of recomposition gives the impression that Carpenter has effectively written his own symphony using Mahler's as a basis.
_	Several foreign reports, independent of English sources, such as those of Alexandro Malaspina in 1793 and Louis de Freycinet in 1802 give the impression that the settlers' relations with the Eora who survived the epidemic were generally amenable.
_	Vergennes' successor Montmorin gave the impression that France would support the Patriots in case of Prussian military intervention and that to this end a military camp was being prepared in Givet, on an invasion route through the independent Prince-Bishopric of Liège, obviating the necessity of entering the Austrian Netherlands.
_	The bodyguards accompanying the Commander gave the impression that he was defending himself rather than the nation, Koroi told the Fiji Sun, declaring that Lieutenant Colonel Jone Baledrokadroka had been right to confront him.
_	I used to have the impression that he wrote us, rather than that we wrote him."
_	After a three-hour meeting a provisional agreement was drawn up; the French came away with the impression that the British would not cooperate and that Murray had "“une grande repugnance”" for them, but he did in fact pass the plans along to Sir John.
_	The game is designed so that the battles do not revolve entirely around the player; a complete battle simulation between allied and enemy forces will be going on in the background while the player performs specific objectives, giving the impression that the player's role is only one small part of a much larger conflict.
_	"After each novel, I have the impression that I have cleared it all away," he says.
_	This gives the impression that the first SSF animals, from the late Ediacaran, were basal members of later clades, with the phyla subsequently appearing in a "rapid, but nevertheless resolvable and orderly" fashion, rather than as a "sudden jumble", and thus reveals the true pace of the Cambrian explosion.
_	The reproduced "Athena Parthenos" gives visitors the impression that they truly are inside an ancient place of worship.
_	Her hair color was changed to blonde, her skin was made paler, and her close-fitting outfit – described as a "battle suit" – was designed to give players the impression that she had been experimented on.
_	The babies find out about Shlomo and form the impression that he truly is the Greek king, whom they dub the "Meanie of Chanukah".
_	In 449, however, at the Second Council of Ephesus convened by Dioscorus of Alexandria who was under the impression that Eutyches had renounced Monophysitism, overawed by the presence of a large number of Egyptian monks, not only was Eutyches reinstated to his office, but Eusebius, Domnus and Flavian, his chief opponents, were deposed.
_	Under the impression that psychoanalysis should be further developed with more emphasis on the group, Burrow devised the concept of psychoanalysis as a social science.
_	Authorities attempted to give the impression that Le Roux was still at large in Brazil.
_	Lever's architects used a wide variety of building materials including red and buff sandstone, brick, timber framing, render and pebbledash with roofs made of clay tiles or thick stone slates which creates the impression that the village appears to be older than it is.
_	Use of MS/MS as a means of detection may give the impression that there are no interfering species present, since no chromatographic impurities are detected.
_	Reverberance refers to the impression that spatially and temporally distributes sounds blend due to reverberation.
_	Liveness is the impression that the room contributes more than just repetitions of direct sound.
_	Listener envelopment is the impression that the listener takes a bath in sound, i.e., that sound comes from all over the place.
_	This was contrary to the impression that Teller had received when he had personally asked Oppenheimer about the Szilard petition: that the nation's fate should be left to the sensible politicians in Washington.
_	Its long, recurved crest is typically conspicuous and is often parted, giving the impression that the bird has two crests.
_	Under the impression that the Riveras spoke Spanish at home, Alvarez trains the dog in both English and Spanish commands.
_	Although Varno had a rough idea it would be a low-budget film, he said the Cormans set no specific guidelines for him: "I gave them the impression that I knew pretty much what I was doing, and they sort of got the idea that I wasn't going to use 50,000 extras and things."
_	I received the impression that my character required improvement and discipline; and from him I learned not to be led astray to sophistic emulation, nor to writing on speculative matters, nor to delivering little hortatory orations, nor to showing myself off as a man who practices much discipline, or does benevolent acts in order to make a display.
_	The result of this was that he often gave the Serbian government the impression that they would get more support from Russia than the official line dictated.
_	Braxton, being under the impression that Arista Records treated her pregnancy "like a disease," asked to delay the album until 2003, but the label refused.
_	Matt Jackson of the Children's Literature Association commented that the Living Book software's features gave off the impression that "passivity is bad" and questioned the product's packaging phrasing of "Children don't just read them.
_	Bruce, now Australian High Commissioner to the United Kingdom, and Casey met with British Cabinet ministers on 20 November and left with the impression that, despite the reassurances, the Royal Navy was not strong enough to deal with simultaneous crises in Europe, the Mediterranean and the Far East.
_	Paro the impression that he is loyal and honest, his real intention is to smuggle weapons across the border through their wedding.
_	Zheng's family had no money to hire a lawyer in his defense; they urged him to plead guilty because they were under the impression that it would bring him a more lenient sentence.
_	In association football, diving is an attempt by a player to gain an unfair advantage by falling to the ground and possibly feigning an injury, to give the impression that a foul has been committed.
_	Andy hosts what seems like a traditional sports show, but instead gives off the impression that he has no clue about sports and is very ill-prepared.
_	The name Swannanoa is reported to be "derived from the Cherokee word Suwali-Nunna, meaning 'trail of the Suwali tribe,'" however the name was used in this case under the impression that the translation is actually "the beautiful trail."
_	Confusingly, the first part of the series, "O Continente", was translated as "Time and the Wind", giving the impression that it is the whole work.
_	Bargsten was under the impression that the latter was .
_	The film gives the impression that both Clemmie and the King were able to listen to the 'beaches' speech live from Parliament.
_	He is a minor character in "Sonic Rush", where he accosts protagonist Blaze the Cat under the impression that she has stolen
_	Jay's 'D.O.A. (Death of Auto-Tune)' left the impression that The Blueprint 3 might be a cantankerous grumpy-old-man rap album, but 'Run This Town' totally obliterates that.
_	Crude stories are crudely handled, giving the impression that they are rushed through in a hurry - anything to get a thousand feet of negative ready for the market.
_	Of the bats that have been captured, most have been in the forest, creating the impression that it was totally dependent on forest for necessary habitat.
_	He finished third, beaten a neck and half a length by Sadler's Wells and Procida, giving the impression that he would be suited by a longer distance.
_	During the party hosted by Amster to inaugurate the Yard, Elsie de Wolfe, mentor to Amster, suggested that he put a mirror at one end of the Yard to give the impression that the Yard was bigger.
_	Although these piloti are in a similar plane to the larger columns below a false perspective when viewed from outside the house gives the impression that they are further into the house than they actually are.
_	Kavanaugh's incarceration in Season 6 gave the impression that Aceveda's secret was safe, however, this was not to be.
_	Some are reported to have been left with the impression that prosecutors believed Swartz had to be convicted of a felony carrying at least a short prison sentence in order to justify having filed the case against him in the first place.
_	Even higher levels of bromine (>20 ppm) can result in the secondary conversion of bromophenol red to bromophenol blue with an even lower p"K", erroneously giving the impression that the water has an extremely high pH despite being dangerously low.
_	These media reports created the impression that the entire Alpha Klinik was under accusation, although neither Dr. Hoogland nor Prof.
_	Rupprecht was well pleased with the results of the attack on 25 September and went on leave that evening, under the impression that the British would not be able to attack for a few days.
_	From there, his free black servants brought runaway slaves to awaiting boats on Waukegan Harbour, giving the impression that they were doing business for James Cory.
_	Barrett also expressed concern that, just because some "alternatives" have merit, there is the impression that the rest deserve equal consideration and respect even though most are worthless, since they are all classified under the one heading of alternative medicine.
_	Hutton's preferred tactic of ducking under the ball reinforced the impression that he was afraid.
_	The lines extend all the way to the edges of the canvas, almost giving the impression that the painting is a fragment of a larger work.
_	The report describes a plan intended "to create the impression that the American Anti-communist Alliance has established itself in Colombia and is preparing to take violent action against local communists."
_	An argument ensued, with Lee rejecting the political implications of the first choice and indicating the difficulty of the second, but Gordon left the meeting with the impression that Lee was considering those options.
_	For a period of time, she also needed to keep secret the fact that Süssmayr had anything to do with the composition of the Requiem at all, in order to allow Count Walsegg the impression that Mozart wrote the work entirely himself.
_	The series plays with no written dialogue, apart from the main theme which gives the impression that all the kids share the hosting position.
_	Moore met Henry Kuttner, also a science fiction writer, in 1936 when he wrote her a fan letter under the impression that "C. L. Moore" was a man.
_	When news came that Louis XVI and his family had left Paris on the Flight to Varennes in June, a misunderstanding first caused the impression that the escape had succeeded; at this news, "the whole of Rome shouted with joy; the crowd massed itself under the windows of the Princesses crying out: Long live the King!", and the Mesdames arranged a grand banquet for the nobility of Rome in celebration, which had to be interrupted when it was clarified that the escape had in fact failed.
_	Some refugees chose to return to Europe, whether to find family members, or under the impression that their homes and businesses still remained as they had left them.
_	The ASA said "although the ads were intended to be light hearted and humorous, their depiction of Jesus winking and holding a thumbs up sign, with the text 'miraculous' deals during Easter, the Christian Holy Week which celebrated Christ's resurrection, gave the impression that they were mocking and belittling core Christian beliefs."
_	Françoise Hardy later declared that the release of "Amoureuse" marked the end of the Yé-yé era, as she confessed "When I first heard "Amoureuse", I had the impression that every female singer, including myself, was left far behind".
_	What made his shows distinctive was that he used fake blood and other techniques to give the impression that he really was cutting or maiming his assistants.
_	Obsidian created various fantasy-styled items, armor, and weapons but Parker and Stone told them to "make it crappier" to create the impression that the children had found or made the objects themselves; weapons consisted of golf clubs, hammers, suction cup arrows and wooden swords, while bathrobes, oven mitt gloves, and towels worn as capes served as clothing.
_	In 1866 Sen delivered an address on "Jesus Christ, Europe and Asia", in which he proclaimed that ""India would be for Christ alone who already stalks the land"" and which fostered the impression that he was about to embrace Christianity.
_	In such cases, the winner will tend to be the bidder with the highest estimate, but the results of the auction will show that the remaining bidders' estimates of the item's value are less than that of the winner, giving the winner the impression that they "bid too much".
_	DEA agents have stated that on the wiretaps, Le Roux gave the impression that "he felt like he was not going to get away forever."
_	Ever since the show's third episode, "Weight Gain 4000" (season one, 1997), all characters on "South Park" have been animated with computer software, though they are portrayed to give the impression that the show still utilizes the method of animating construction paper composition cutouts through the use of stop motion, which was the technique used in creating the show's first episode, "Cartman Gets an Anal Probe".
_	The teens said they preferred the term "youth" over "junior", because "junior" gave the impression that the teens were not yet a leader where "youth' just described their age.
_	Pictures on the internet give the impression that the new Haro will be another 1/4 scale (making it the same size as the previous Haros).
_	As a front for his illegal activities he gave people the impression that he was a plumber or a hardware store owner.
_	Icons also differ from Western art in that they use inverse perspective (giving the impression that the icon itself is the source of light), and for this reason make very little use of shadow or highlight.
_	Goldberg left police with the impression that there might be some truth to the rumors that Jews engaged in ritual murder.
_	The Azuma Kagami describes pre-shogunate Kamakura as a remote, forlorn place, but there is reason to believe its writers simply wanted to give the impression that prosperity had been brought there by the new regime.
_	Silver soon finds Adrianna and Maisie and the two have an emotional reunion but Silver's relationship with Greg comes to an end when he learns that Adrianna has met Maisie under the impression that Silver introduced the two of them to each other.
_	Ultimately, the US and UK stuck to their position that there would be no negotiations until Iraq withdrew from Kuwait and that they should not grant Iraq concessions, lest they give the impression that Iraq benefited from its military campaign.
_	This flying technique gives a rather unusual look to its flight and an observer is left with the impression that it is dragging itself through the air with only the assistance of its forewings.
_	One gets the impression that "The Source" was filmed with theatrical distribution in mind but that no sane cinema distributor would touch it with a ten-foot barge pole.
_	Atari initially planned to use a standard joystick, but he wanted a control with more physicality, including adding a rubber pad at the bottom to give players the impression that they could pull harder for a little more thrust.
_	Surrounded by armed police, the community is under the impression that Wally is holding everyone hostage.
_	Allen locates Newby’s original guide who reminisces about Newby and Carliss and the impression that they made.
_	She was under the impression that she was going to be reimbursed for the travel expenses.
_	There were further assessment difficulties because "the actual attacker—Wiens—was holding the blade of the knife, which added to the impression that he was the one being attacked".
_	Instead of an actual invasion, the Allies implemented Operation Solo I, a deception plan designed to draw attention away from the preparations for Operation Torch, the invasion of north Africa, by creating the impression that troops based in Scotland were preparing to invade Norway.
_	By this test, the tactic during World War II of putting fake inflatable tanks in visible locations on the Pacific Islands in order to falsely present the impression that there were larger military forces present would be considered as ethically permissible.
_	He says only that Oswald died fighting for his country at Maserfield, giving the impression that the battle was part of a "just war".
_	Here we are given the impression that Jessica may not be all there.
_	Many felt that the Board’s great work encouraged people who were not suffering persecution to come to England purely for a better standard of living, giving the impression that the Board were encouraging immigration.
_	The fans in attendance, under the impression that the game was over, ran onto the field to celebrate.
_	Adrian Veidt had transported science fiction writers Max Shea and James Trafford March, surreal artist Hira Manish, and an assortment of other writers, artists, and scientists to his private island under the impression that they are being used for a top secret movie production.
_	I "was" under the impression that ejectments were diminishing, but I now find from figures first seen on Saturday [12 June] that they seem rather to increase... the duty of enquiring, where I had not previously known there was urgent cause to inquire".
_	In fluid traveling at subsonic speed, this pressure disturbance can propagate upstream, changing the flow pattern ahead of the object and giving the impression that the fluid "knows" the object is there by seemingly adjusting its movement and is flowing around it.
_	It is likely that, as with Pidgin Delaware, Europeans who learned other local pidgins were under the impression that they were using the actual indigenous language.
_	According to Darcy Ribeiro, the Brazilian racist assimilationism is perverse because it gives the impression that there is a greater social acceptance of people of color.
_	Later analysis suggested that Merkel's support for a flat-tax proposal by Paul Kirchhof, the shadow Finance Minister, further undermined her credibility on economic affairs and gave the impression that the CDU's economic reforms would only benefit the very rich.
_	Just a small, gilded cross above the principal entry gives the impression that there is a church inside.
_	In recent times, Jonathan Hoefler has described his designs as lumpy: "[it] gives the impression that its designer simply began with one letter and worked his way through the alphabet until the project was complete, never stopping to articulate the design’s policies or anticipate any problems.
_	The documentary included a compelling interview with Spector that took place just before his first trial in 2007 and news footage of the trial itself, and Jayanti said he intended it to leave the audience with the impression that the charges against Spector were unproved.
_	As with other descriptive names in his legendarium, Tolkien uses this name to create the impression that the text is "'historical', 'real' or 'archaic'".
_	Unit 3's previous owner, the New York Power Authority, had conducted a more limited analysis in the 1990s than Unit 2's previous owner, Con Edison, leading to the impression that Unit 3 had fewer seismic protections than Unit 2.
_	Hamilton's faction were against any conditional ratification, under the impression that New York would not be accepted into the Union, while Clinton's faction wanted to amend the Constitution, while maintaining the state's right to secede if their attempts failed.
_	Writing about "Sensual Math," Larissa Szporluk asserted that "Fulton's acoustic signals reign, giving the impression that behind their creation lies some kind of unimaginable technology, telepathic jazz, or just plain genius."
_	The name 'Shanker' was used by Robert Shedden to reinforce the impression that Montgomery was mere property.
_	After all available British army troops left the United Kingdom for France, the division was disbanded and re-formed as a deception unit to give Germany the impression that the British army had more divisions than it did.
_	Meantime in the Soviet Union, the Special Commission of the Politburo on Afghanistan which consisted of Yuri Andropov, Andrei Gromyko, Dmitriy Ustinov and Boris Ponomarev wanted to end the impression that the Soviet government supported Amin's leadership and policies.
_	In the view of Shashi Jayakumar, "One receives the impression that Æthelweard played his cards right in Edgar's reign, perhaps by treading warily and displaying the same maddening discretion that one finds in his "Chronicon".
_	Braun was of the impression that a well-written script was replaced by the film's "racial politics".
_	Concealing the major portion in the ravine in up-to-the-minute readiness and eagerness for an attack, he deployed just enough of the boys in plain sight to carry out the impression that the Indian couriers had conveyed to Crazy Horse, that only about a hundred soldiers would be found to oppose his eager and confident large reinforcements.”
_	While there is reasoning which could lead the Tribunal to find that the Appellant was acting in his capacity as a councillor or was giving the impression that he was representing the Authority, there are also contrary arguments, and on balance, the Tribunal has concluded that the Appellant was not, on the particular facts, so doing."
_	The traditional focus on hierarchical order generated the impression that DGs have little to say about linear order, and it has contributed to the view that DGs are particularly well-suited to examine languages with free word order.
_	National Park Service officials testified that the memorial would help restore and enhance the Hemicycle, while United States Army personnel stated that it would help correct the impression that only men had contributed to war-fighting efforts.
_	"A lot of people have gotten the impression that I'm this rude sexual deviant or something," Campbell told journalist Chuck Philips.
_	The notices at the station, however, give the impression that penalty fares are applicable to all destinations.
_	It continued, "The allegations contained in them can not but lead to the impression that the Governorate of Vatican City, instead of being an instrument of responsible government, is an unreliable entity, at the mercy of dark forces.
_	Reports of the sinking were conflated with information about those who jumped or were thrown overboard the day previous to give the impression that the threat of throwing children overboard had been made or carried out, a story that was later proven false but taken up at the time by the Howard government during the lead-up to the 2001 election to support their campaign promises to tighten border controls and immigration.
_	The special lighting effects give the impression that the globe is rotating and displays the five continents of the world.
_	It is worthy of record here in this connection, that while Rev. Burritt was so incarcerated, being sick almost unto death, he was kindly ministered unto by William Irving, father of Washington Irving, and to whom he afterwards gave a quaint certificate vouching for his loyalty and setting forth the facts of the case, he (Irving) evidently being under the impression that his residence in the city during the war might expose him to proscription on the part of the now victorious Patriots.
_	Collins also utilized an array of vocal effects and caricature voices which gave the impression that there were multiple persons at the horn on his recordings, though it was just Collins.
_	Because of the slow-moving mail system, former president Jefferson and Lewis's superiors in Washington got the impression that Lewis did not adequately keep in touch with them.
_	Speaking at the time of the album's announcement, primary songwriter Miller offered the following description of the concept: "The fabled town of Carver City has a history of bad luck and misfortune, all the while giving the impression that it's a pleasant family getaway.
_	Wouter J. Hanegraaff comments that Crowley's works can give the impression that Wicca is little more than a religious and ritual translation of Jungian psychology.
_	Most Englishmen here give the impression that Hitler is just a vulgar fellow but he really seems to feel that he’s a s----.”
_	A misprint in the album credits gives the impression that founding member Alex Greene appeared on only one song.
_	A few elements of the "Afrika Korps" and the Italian XX Motorised Corps participated and during the day the bulk of the "Afrika Korps" moved north, to give the impression that it was the main attack.
_	Mountbatten, Patel and Menon also sought to give princes the impression that if they did not accept the terms put to them then, they might subsequently need to accede on substantially less favourable terms.
_	Jethro Crouch is willing to will away his son’s inheritance to Sly on the promise that he receives Sly’s money after Sly has died; Abner Truckle solicits his wife to Sly under the impression that it will sway Sly to name him as his heir; Lawyer Craven defends the dignity of Sly in court after the Captain discovers him molesting Mrs. Truckle, for the same promise of riches; Merrilee Fancy, the most popular harlot in the bay town, finds herself in the family way and hopes to marry Sly for his wealth.
_	Douthwaite, caught unawares, was then forced to quickly adjust his hypothesis to take into account the new evidence, which gave the impression that he was being inconsistent and speculating on the hoof.
_	However, some players later met with the directors and convinced them to drop Raybould and gave the directors the impression that Raisbeck was in agreement with this decision.
_	Murs commented: "Sadly she kept giving me the impression that she didn't like me as much, and ultimately it didn't work out, so that's where the idea of me singing 'Please Don't Let Me Go' came from."
_	Establishing a fine rapport with the senior members of the team, Pironi arguably exploited this good relationship in the aftermath of the controversial 1982 San Marino race, where Pironi is widely thought to have duped Villeneuve into conceding victory by giving the impression that he would finish behind his teammate, only to unexpectedly power past him into the Tosa hairpin, despite the team having signaled both drivers to slow down.
_	Sorcar's signature trick is the use of light refraction to convey the impression that large scale objects have vanished.
_	Among the many tricks he invented, he is best known for the Hamman Count, a sleight-of-hand in which cards are falsely counted to give the impression that the magician holds more, or less, than he actually does.
_	Helicopter Shark is a composition of two photographs that gives the impression that a great white shark is leaping out of the water attacking military personnel climbing a suspended ladder attached to a Special Forces UH-60 Black Hawk helicopter.
_	Bassist Phil Lesh said "The cover, featuring us in Saturday Night Fever disco suits against a white background, reinforced the impression that we were 'going commercial'.
_	The trial judge charged the jury in such a way as to give the impression that they should not convict on the uncorroborated evidence of an accomplice and, unless they found corroborative evidence, their duty was to acquit; that this was a misdirection in law; and, under the circumstances, probably had a material effect upon the jury’s minds.
_	When a full broadside was fired, "the resulting sheet of flame was big enough to create the impression that a battle cruiser had blown up; it was awe inspiring."
_	Historically, they have been at times thought of as mutts or mongrels to reflect the impression that they were somehow lesser than true Eurasian purebred dogs that have been bred for certain physical features instead of or in addition to simple practical task accomplishment.
_	These texts give the impression that māyā refers to the insubstantial and essence-less nature of things as well as their deceptive, false and vain character.
_	The locals were under the impression that the Aalto’s found all this amusing.
_	It is small, but it covers almost the entire length of the beak in males (less so in females), and may give the impression that they do not actually have a casque.
_	Tiebel also saw a good deal of Gerda Glemens during her visit and formed the impression that she might have been sent in order to persuade her husband, who already had a background in German intelligence, to "work for the Russians and come to Dresden".
_	They become engaged in a struggle and the fact that Blanche is shown as having regressed into a psychotic state gives the impression that Stanley has raped her.
_	Similarly, the episode of the fallen soldiers in "Beau Geste", who were propped up by Sergeant Major Lejaune to create the impression that they were still alive, was probably inspired by a story in Frederic Martyn's memoirs, "Life in the Legion: from a Soldier's Point of View" (1911):
_	The optional extended cut expands on several scenes and includes an excised subplot in which Winger and Ziskey (who takes six hits of Elmo's LSD under the impression that it is Dramamine) go AWOL by stowing away on a special forces paratrooper mission.
_	He gives the impression that it was the Germans doing all the killing, but in fact much of the organization of the genocide had a lot to do with auxiliary and local police forces.
_	Wente wrote: "One has the impression that the viceroy and his Nubian troops were loyalists, for the remarks made by his opponent Piankh in letter No. 301 are quite disparaging of the pharaoh, Ramesses XI."
_	The title of the book might give the impression that Pace deals with physics in the sense commonly understood, as general or particular physics.
_	The artist, Jacques Callot, captures the bull in midair, with its horns lowered, giving the impression that the bull is both charging and pouncing on Marciana.
_	The drawing of the bull attacking Marciana mirrors this concept within bullfighting and gives the impression that the bull not only intends to wound Marciana, but also to forcibly violate Marciana’s highly-prized chastity through the raping of her virginity.
_	She only spoke in favor of people she already knew he liked and would be favorable to such as d'Argensson and Noailles, thereby giving him the impression that she only voiced his own views whenever she spoke of politics, and the king thereby felt comfortable saying that his mistress' opinions was his own.
_	However, in a later interview Coulter recounted that she herself had believed that the case was strong, that Jones was telling the truth, that Clinton should be held publicly accountable for his misconduct, and that a settlement would give the impression that Jones was merely interested in extorting money from the President.
_	At this point, Khánh had not spoken up and allowed the impression that the moves have been against his will, and a move on the part of other officers to take power for themselves.
_	Mao also gave the impression that he might even welcome a nuclear war.
_	The term 'teacher training' (which may give the impression that the activity involves training staff to undertake relatively routine tasks) seems to be losing ground, at least in the U.S., to 'teacher education' (with its connotation of preparing staff for a professional role as a reflective practitioner).
_	As they approached the village to which they were going, he gave the impression that he was going on further.
_	It has a most unusual shape and seems to have been painted deep blue; its thick cover of unmelting snow gives the impression that the mountain is wearing a white jacket over a dress of deep violet.
_	The product code was chosen to give the impression that HP was an established company.
_	Because Nawaz Sharif had been exiled to Saudi Arabia and the military establishment gave the impression that he was gone for good, many of his most prominent party leaders including Chaudhry Shujaat Hussain, Chaudhry Pervaiz Elahi, Ijaz-ul-Haq, Khurshid Mahmud Kasuri, Shaikh Rasheed Ahmad, Mian Azhar and Humayun Akhtar Khan formed a new party called Pakistan Muslim League- Quaid-e-Azam.
_	Bacon returned with the impression that the bombardment had succeeded, but aerial photographs taken the following week revealed that about fifteen shells had landed within a few yards of the lock gates on the western side and four shells had fallen as close on the eastern side.
_	Usually, the universal omniscient perspective reinforces the impression that the narrator is not connected to the events of the story.
_	The evident advantages of a railroad might give the impression that the vote would be easily won.
_	Anspach created "Anti-Monopoly" in part as a response to the lessons taught by the mainstream game, which he believed created the impression that monopolies were something desirable.
_	By placing ten standards far apart along a low ridge, Haakon gave the impression that his army was bigger than it actually was.
_	Noted Marathi writer and music aficionado P.L. Deshpande had once famously written that whenever he listened to Lata’s emotional Dhool Ka Phool title song ‘Too Mere Pyaar Kaa Phool Hai’ (composed by N. Datta), he got the impression that each word, each note was rendered as if a tender flower petal was gently placed in flowing water!
_	The first-person view helped to cement the impression that the player was part of the game's world that they had full control of, and completing the impression of immersion.
_	He also noted that theism, presented as explaining adaptation, "was worse than an open admission of failure, for it created the impression that an ultimate explanation had been reached".
_	In contrast", The Guardian" heavily criticized the book for offering an uneven portrayal of McQueen and Galliano, stating that "to read her brass-tacks account, you’d get the impression that Galliano’s career has been fail after fail.
_	Fabius in his childhood had been named ovicula ("Little Sheep") for his mildness and willingness to follow others about, and in the coming months his activities gave the impression that he was doing his utmost to live up to that nickname.
_	A rapport interruption is designed to display mutuality and generally conveys the impression that the interrupter understands and empathizes with the speaker and/or the content of the speech, and is interpreted as collaborative and cooperative.
_	These were highly critical of landlords and left many commoners with the impression that enclosures were unlawful.
_	It's that the studio wants to further the impression that the movie is full of surprises."
_	In the United Kingdom, the term came to public prominence in 2007 when it was revealed that a BBC programme inserted noddies featuring the senior broadcaster Alan Yentob into interviews that he did not conduct, creating the impression that he had been present.
_	Bancoult brought a second case, arguing that this Order was again "ultra vires" and unreasonable, and that the British government had violated legitimate expectation by passing the second Order after giving the impression that the Chagossians were free to return home.
_	Isabel had been seized by ruffians while walking with her father, who appeared overcome with grief, and under the impression that Earnscliff was the offender; whereas Mr Ratcliffe, who managed his affairs, suggested that Sir Frederick had stronger motives for placing her under restraint.
_	Den the impression that her mother has been up to no good.
_	It is alleged that the Ducey's and Carmichael worked with Joe Furando and Evelyn Katirina Pattison who both led a pair of companies called Caravan Trading Company and CIMA Green to buy RIN-stripped B99 and give the impression that E-Biofuels manufactured the fuel in order to falsely resell it as B100 with RINs coupled with a tax subsidy (acting only as a pass-through establishment).
_	The very large incentives given to pharmaceutical companies to produce orphan drugs have led to the impression that the financial support afforded to make these drugs possible is akin to abuse.
_	"After the June meeting, divestment leaders from Unshackle NU, NU Divest and Fossil Free NU, as well as Associated Student Government were under the impression that the University would drop two major components of the charter.
_	Mogoeng was also criticised for giving the impression that JSC appointments were "preordained" and that male candidates would not be considered.
_	However, 'breaches' sometimes occur because the signal 'drops out' giving the impression that the offender has absconded from the detention address when they haven't.
_	A memo from the Department of State says: "Examination of the Armys reports on the shootings gives the impression that the Armys shooting rule comes close to making death, rather than up to 30 days arrest as provided in Article 54 of the Geneva Convention, the penalty for attempted escape."
_	Here was an insinuation that would recur two years later, when Philipp Jenninger would similarly be accused of holding views he was only describing" (Philipp Jenninger was a German politician forced to resign as the speaker of the "Bundstag" in November 1988 after giving a speech that through meant to condemn Nazi crimes erroneously gave the impression that he shared the Nazi perspective).
_	To coincide with the launch of publishing in 2012, Valiant introduced the "Pullbox Program", which encourages readers to start a pullbox subscription for the title being launched with their comics store in order to obtain an exclusive alternate cover version of the comic, and the "QR Voice Variant", where the reader's smartphone, after scanning a QR code on the cover of the comic, plays a video of the figures mouth, giving the impression that the figure has come to life and is talking to the reader.
_	In many reality television programs, camera shooting and footage editing give the viewer the impression that they are passive observers following people going about their daily personal and professional activities; this style of filming is sometimes referred to as fly on the wall or factual television.
_	Chomsky's response to the film was mixed; in a published conversation with Achbar and several activists, he stated that "the positive impact of it has been astonishing to me" but people mistakenly get the impression that he is the leader of a movement that they should join.
_	Two weeks after the execution, Bowen-Colthurst filed a written report in which he stated he had been under the impression that Dublin was being overrun by rebels who were massacring police and soldiers.
_	As this was the only case involving multiple victims, investigators believe the killer was under the impression that there was only one woman in the store.
_	Galiano was under the impression that the ship was the "Columbia Rediviva" under Robert Gray, but the attack was actually done by the English fur trader William Brown.
_	Nonetheless, Al Wolters has demonstrated that Dooyeweerd's philosophy draws deeply from the wells of Neo-Kantianism, phenomenology, and existentialism, rendering suspect the impression that Van Til and Dooyeweerd have sought to convey regarding the biblical and Christian purity of their philosophical systems.
_	If a third one is partaking in the process the spectra typically intersect at "varying" wavelengths as concentrations change, creating the impression that the isosbestic point is 'out of focus', or that it will shift as conditions change.
_	Additionally, the horse is supposed to be completely submissive in dressage, and a gag bit gives the impression that it is not.
_	The architecture of the small city gives the impression that it once displayed a vibrant downtown; this is perhaps due to the once-booming railroad system that still rumbles through Cohutta.
_	'Back pokers' and 'leg ticklers' surprise riders, giving the impression that the monster is in close proximity.
_	In a statement, Pournouri said "We were under the impression that they were going to sample the original.
_	China initially accepted his opposition, giving the impression that those who challenged the state would not face consequences.
_	While many state bars now allow the use of the title, some prohibit its use where there is any chance of confusing the public about a lawyer's actual qualifications (e.g. if the public might be left with the impression that the lawyer is also a medical doctor).
_	C. Pastia also suspected Cocea of pulling a prank, "leaving the impression that he had dedicated himself to literature" in "Vinul de viață lungă", and then returning to the political stage with novel-lampoons.
_	The treaty didn't contain any provisions for troop and material transfer rights, and Finland's leadership was left with the impression that the Soviet Union would supply the base by sea.
_	This magnifies the impression that Lady Lytton sees Clouseau as amusing and no real threat.
_	In Stockholm on 5 August he ran the mile in 4:08.4 - less than two seconds outside Cunningham's world record - despite halting after 1500 meters under the impression that had been the end of the race.
_	While the Iraqis on the escarpment carried live ammunition, many Iraqi soldiers were under the impression that they were on a training exercise.
_	Watch Tower scholars falsely leave the impression that Lipsius thought that Jesus was put to death in that way.
_	The Canadian Commissioner of Official Languages, Graham Fraser, was of the impression that the event was "developed, perceived and presented in English with a French song."
_	Its supported by a foundation which gives the impression that it is raised out of the sand.
_	The counsel for the appellant objected to the recharge, but the trial judge's response was that he did not feel that he left the jury with the impression that they must accept the appellant's evidence in order to acquit him.
_	In answer to these, the League adopted a policy that any League member who entered a church (to conduct antireligious work by checking on the strength of believers or numbering them) had to first receive local branch approval beforehand in order so that he did not give the impression that he was going to the church to pray.
_	Since most of these were specifically using the Ringbahnhof, it gave the impression that the entire terminus was simply a suburban or commuter station handling exclusively short haul services, yet the main line services, including those to Paris and other French destinations, were definitely still running.
_	Either deliberately or accidentally, the version released for publication omitted the words "of the date", creating the impression that George had agreed to a further plebiscite on the monarchy, even though a retraction was issued.
_	On his way to Rome, he discovered in the cathedral library of Verona the long-lost "Institutes of Gaius", afterwards edited by Savigny, to whom he communicated the discovery under the impression that he had found a portion of Ulpian.
_	However, he "gave the impression that going without was a vital sign of a man's virility"
_	The top of the cabinet then slides across onto the table, giving the impression that the top half of the assistant has been moved sideways and in the process been severed from the legs by the blade.
_	A few months after her first husband's death, Clara met and married Frank Carl on September 14, 1920, with the impression that he was wealthy.
_	In an Interview on Iwata Asks, Nd Cube said that "One of the attractions of Mario Party is that you can play with your favorite character", but they "thought that using Mii characters would strengthen the impression that you yourself are playing together with your friends."
_	Photos were released from Prince giving the impression that Hantuchová, from the start of the 2011 season, will be using the Prince EXO3 Tour 100.
_	Intelligence reports gave Göring the impression that the RAF was almost defeated, and raids would attract British fighters for the Luftwaffe to shoot down.
_	In his introduction to "Tales from the Indian Jungle", Anderson writes: "He [Anderson] appears to be of the jungle himself, and we get the impression that he belongs there.
_	Courtney the impression that he has rejected her.
_	Likewise, the Bugzilla project retired Bazaar in favor of git in March 2014 for multiple reasons, one of them being the impression that Bazaar was almost dead:
_	Both heard the night orders given to the naval officer of the watch; Lucas was afterwards always under the impression that a small grass fire high on the shore at Danger Point misled this officer into thinking it was the lighthouse at Cape Agulha.
_	I had the impression that they really do set unbelievable store by such physical characteristics as long heads and light hair."
_	quite natural; not for an instant does one get the impression that he sought out new paths simply to get away from the well known roads; the affectation which so often characterizes modern
_	Book reviews have also appeared in the Financial Times, which stated "you get the impression that its author, Ken Fisher, does not often find himself short of things to say.
_	However, it's evident that Andy is also trying to prove himself to his parents, who were under the impression that he was CEO of the company until later.
_	Later, however, "marchenismo" gradually gained prestige, and nowadays we have the impression that flamencologist and serious flamenco lovers increasingly value his work.
_	Andy Gill of "The Independent" opined that the songs "Walking on a Dream" and "We Are the People" "rather resemble The Beloved or Air, sharing with those duos the impression that the music just seems to have settled, like snow, around the melody."
_	We were always under the impression that we should feel honoured to be in the employ of the D’Oyly Carte Opera Company; it was patently obvious that the management held firmly to the policy that nobody is indispensable".
_	With the police under the impression that the murders have been solved because Richards is in custody, Burns moves back in with Nancy.
_	The three possible spelling variants of the same name (e.g. Müller / Mueller / Muller) in different documents sometimes lead to confusion, and the use of two different spellings within the same document (like in the passport) may give people who are unfamiliar with the German orthography the impression that the document is a forgery.
_	It is revealed at the end of "Curtain" that he fakes his need for a wheelchair to fool people into believing that he is suffering from arthritis, to give the impression that he is more infirm than he is.
_	One has the impression that in their bulk they are simply meant to undergird the contentions made in the first part of the book", concluding that thus Ye'or has "written a polemical tract, not responsible historical analysis."
_	A leader of a liberal Catholic group, Faith in Public Life, said: "I think some of the alarmist rhetoric that some church leaders are using gives the impression that some bishops are quite happy making this part of a Republican campaign."
_	Hocquart initially became under the impression that Brandeau was desirous of converting to Catholicism and remain in the colony.
_	Banging on the cloister drum, they gave orders in a loud voice, and in doing so, gave the impression that there was a large military detachment present.
_	He gave the impression that he was going to raid the territory of Argos but instead switched directions and attacked Megalopolis.
_	When striking a fishing lure, it fights by pulling backwards, giving the impression that there is a big stone attached to the fishing line.
_	Jessica was made the Reverend's daughter to give the impression that she was good at first and then to show that she was rebelling against the righteousness of her family.
_	"one is left with the impression that Al. Robot and Chișinău were displaying themselves as two communicating vessels."
_	Narinesingh was under the impression that the fillers were silicone and that Oneal had medical training but knew Morris wasn't a licensed doctor; there was a "sisterhood" between the two women since both are transgender so Rajee trusted Duchess to enhance her appearance.
_	Ayrton planned and supervised the building of the "Diamond" dummy pipeline, which ran southwards to help give Rommel the impression that an Armoured Corps was massing in the south.
_	Marcus hides the bodies and the two drive north, hoping to give the impression that they were not in the area of the accident.
_	While reviewers appreciated Activision's efforts to allow the importing of songs from previous games, they felt that the small number of tracks that were available at launch was at odds with the impression that Activision had made of the process before the game's release.
_	In a January 2008 segment of the Discovery Channel's "Most Evil," Barbara Hoyt said that the impression that she had accompanied Ruth Ann Moorehouse to Hawaii just to avoid testifying at Manson's trial was erroneous.
_	In the low-accountability condition, no mention of meeting with a judge is made; instead participants are left with the impression that their responses will be confidential and anonymous.
_	At the Maple Leaf plant behind the "Listeria" outbreak, a single federal inspector was relegated to auditing company paperwork and had to deal with several other plants, the manager and the union official said, contradicting the impression that officials had left last week that full-time watchdogs were on-site.
_	Street users of LSD are often under the impression that blotter paper which is actively hallucinogenic can only be LSD because that is the only chemical with low enough doses to fit on a small square of blotter paper.
_	The feeling of a Wild Mouse coaster is amplified by using cars that are wider than the track itself, giving the impression that the riders are hanging off the side or that they might fly out, thus giving it the name "wild".
_	He praised the works of Dong Yuan (c. 934–c. 962); he noted that although a close-up view of Dong's work would create the impression that his brush techniques were cursory, seen from afar his landscape paintings would give the impression of grand, resplendent, and realistic scenery.
_	If patient asked to carry out a movement on effect side he does so with the corresponding part of the opposite side fully under the impression that he has correctly performed the required movement.
_	The five petals are white, deeply bifid, the cleft extending almost to the base and giving the impression that there are actually ten petals; in length the petals are equal to or slightly longer than the sepals.
_	They used shoot-and-scoot tactics, avoiding counter-battery fire and leaving the Italians with the impression that they were facing multiple consistent points of fire.
_	Acting without orders from the Ottoman government, on 27 September, the German commander of the Dardanelles fortifications ordered the passage closed, adding to the impression that the Ottomans were pro-German.
_	War correspondent Peter W. Alexander wrote that Lee "acted, probably, under the impression that his troops were able to carry any position however formidable.
_	Ralphe Bunche had also given United States Secretary of State Dean Rusk and United States Ambassador to the United Nations Adlai Stevenson II the impression that UN troops were not to undertake further action in Katanga without specific authorisation from Thant.
_	Some news services were not careful to distinguish these points, and some of the public were left with the impression that heavy water is normally radioactive and more severely toxic than it is.
_	Although the parliament of November 1384 had granted the King a subsidy to fund a campaign, the Commons had done so on the impression that this was to be a continental campaign against the French; not a northern one against the Scots.
_	In the videos, O'Keefe included segments in which he wore a fur coat, top hat, sunglasses, and wielded a cane, giving viewers, including the media, the impression that he had dressed that way when he visited the ACORN offices and spoke to its workers.
_	On the cover, an animated cover of lips, which appeared to emulate Khan's, gave the impression that Khan was the dominant member of the group.
_	During the draft, cameras would cut to live shots of McGahee and Rosenhaus talking on their cell phones, giving the impression that they were communicating with teams.
_	Acting NASA Administrator Thomas O. Paine appointed a Committee on Symbolic Activities for the First Lunar Landing on February 25, which he instructed to select symbolic activities that would not jeopardize crew safety or interfere with mission objectives; that would "signalize [sic] the first lunar landing as an historic forward step of all mankind that has been accomplished by the United States" and that would not give the impression that the United States was "taking possession of the moon" in violation of the Outer Space Treaty of 1967.
_	Some days later they met up again and Burns apologised to James for giving the impression that he had not enjoyed his company that evening on the holm, however the miller explained that he had guessed that Burns was engrossed in the composition of a poem.
_	We gain the impression that he is a decent man, as Preston and his friends think he is going to be teaching him this year, and are looking forward to it.
_	Distinctive from the above types of 3D work, Ken Gidge, developed a new form of three-dimensional art: an abstract fine art treatment referred to as "Gidge 3D Spectral Illusions", which gives the viewer the impression that shapes on the flat surface of the painting are projecting outward, floating in space or receding into the surface.
_	Judicious editing techniques also gave the impression that there were more Daleks than were actually available, such as using a split screen in "The Parting of the Ways".
_	At this point, it is difficult to determine the cause of this unusual phenomenon, but a number of dealings with the Negative Zone have given the impression that something inherent within it can lead to emotional distress.
_	One can hardly escape the impression that the peoples of this focus were Plains agriculturalists who pushed southward from one valley to another as far as eastern New Mexico.
_	The three possible spelling variants of the same name (e.g. Müller / Mueller / Muller) in different documents sometimes lead to confusion, and the use of two different spellings within the same document may give persons unfamiliar with German orthography the impression that the document is a forgery.
_	Amarao first appears in the fourth episode of the series to covertly warn Naota of Haruko and her intentions, giving viewers the impression that he is virtually an omniscient character with his dispensing of background information and fairly accurate predictions.
_	Also, owing to the scheduling of the series not reflecting the production order, some episodes featuring departed cast members were not broadcast until late in the series, which can give the impression that no major cast changes occurred.
_	Some of these holes were only a few feet deep and never occupied but the numerous burrows gave the impression that groundhogs live in communities.
_	Jon Lee Anderson, author of "Che Guevara: A Revolutionary Life", notes how among the hospital's nuns, and a number of Vallegrande women, the impression that Guevara bore an extraordinary resemblance to Jesus Christ quickly spread; leading them to surreptitiously clip off clumps of his long hair and keep them for good luck.
_	"The Sun Sentinel" called it "dark, futuristic," and "unforgettable," adding "No one can witness the militaristic precision of Rhythm Nation, which gives the impression that a really angry pep squad has taken over the dance floor, and not see how Janet's style has been sampled, borrowed and stolen over and over ... and over."
_	However, it left the impression that he was impatient to get through the slow parts and back to the flights of virtuosity.
_	To accomplish this illusion, Hendrie switched back and forth between a studio microphone and a conventional telephone while speaking, creating the impression that his "guest" was a random caller.
_	As well as the broadcast of fake radio-traffic, genuine radio messages from 21st Army Group were first routed to Kent via landline and then broadcast, to give the Germans the impression that most of the Allied troops were stationed there.
_	Raff disagreed, having the impression that Liszt wanted him on equal terms as a full collaborator.
_	Terms such as "transformation" can give the impression that theories of transformational generative grammar are intended as a model for the processes through which the human mind constructs and understands sentences.
_	He wore a hump on his back to give the impression that Jason had scoliosis.
_	Marketing speak is a related label for wording styles used to promote a product or service to a wide audience by seeking to create the impression that the vendors of the service possess a high level of sophistication, skill, and technical knowledge.
_	Although initially attempting to publish every two months, readers had the impression that issues were timed around oddball occasions and events like equinoxes, full moons and World Cup Downhill races.
_	The Italians were under the impression that they were facing three Belgian divisions with South African reinforcements.
_	It was critically praised and also noted for its movie-poster cover art, giving the impression that Warner Bros.
_	However, the hastily produced sessions, combined with the sloppy LP packages that were issued under his name, left some with the impression that Musicor was not taking as much time as it should with Jones, who was by far its top country star.
_	Pitts has committed several egregious mistakes in his account of this writer, making him die in 1310, four years before the battle of Bannockburn, which he celebrates in verse; and Bale's vaguer language leaves the impression that he too was labouring under a similar error.
_	In the Báb's early writings, the exalted identity he was claiming was unmistakable, but because of the reception of the people, his writings appear to convey the impression that he is only the gate to the Hidden Twelfth Imam.
_	Genie, 13 years of age upon discovery, was malnourished, insensitive to tactile senses, and silent even upon being evoked; however she had proper social skills and she was able to maintain eye contact with caregivers, giving the impression that she understood instruction.
_	Invitations were first sent to Albanians so as to give the impression that the congress was an Albanian assembly.
_	Patrick has a habit of saying things without thinking that give the impression that he is rather dense.
_	During the battle, misleading information and delays in communication left Herbert Plumer and Field Marshal Douglas Haig under the impression that a substantial advance had taken place towards Passchendaele ridge.
_	Some have even been erased by the use to acid to give the impression that there is no heritage here to save.
_	Reading "set.mm" we may have sometimes the impression that the ambition of its author is essentially to add all the mathematics one theorem after the other.
_	Guitar is under the impression that Milkman has taken the gold and shipped it away, thus he wants revenge.
_	Soon, with the coming of Jatin Banerjee alias Niralamba, Mitter was under the impression that the organisation was taking too much of a military turn, while Banerjee disagreed with Barin Ghose’s untimely terrorist enterprise.
_	The photograph gives the impression that the man is falling straight down; however, a series of photographs taken of his fall showed him to be tumbling through the air.
_	By placing ten standards far apart along a low ridge, he gave the impression that his army was bigger than it actually was.
_	Before arriving, Qa’qa divided his troops into several smaller groups and instructed them to appear on the battlefield one after the other, giving the impression that large reinforcements were arriving.
_	A number of quotations from the great doctors Augustine, Bernard, Bonaventure and Thomas, from Aristotle, Ovid and Seneca do not mar the impression that the whole work is the spontaneous outburst of an intensely glowing soul.
_	The height of Mount Everest was calculated to be exactly high, but was publicly declared to be in order to avoid the impression that an exact height of was nothing more than a rounded estimate.
_	He is also under the impression that Scorpius is his spy and double agent, but in truth, Scorpius turns out to be a triple agent whose true allegiance is to the Peacekeepers.
_	The Arab Legion armored cars opened fire on the Israeli soldiers combing the old city which created the impression that the Jordanians had staged counterattack.
_	He often recalls that the music industry "was under the impression that in order to be alive and to be able to create what I had in mind I had to become successful.
_	Strabo was under the impression that the Calydonian Boar was an offspring of the Crommyonian Sow vanquished by Theseus.
_	Spin approaches used by some political teams include "burying" potentially negative new information by releasing it at the end of the workday on the last day before a long weekend; selectively cherry-picking quotes from previous speeches made by their employer or an opposing politician to give the impression that they advocate a certain position; and purposely leaking misinformation about an opposing politician or candidate that casts them in a negative light.
_	When Gramont was given permission to return to France, however, he left in haste, giving the impression that he would not honour his intention to marry Hamilton.
_	A memory hole is any mechanism for the alteration or disappearance of inconvenient or embarrassing documents, photographs, transcripts, or other records, such as from a website or other archive, particularly as part of an attempt to give the impression that something never happened.
_	Although most people tried to give the impression that they fulfilled their religious duties, many people did not fast during Ramadan.
_	Milner met Montefiore on 16 May, arguing that anti-semitism and emancipation could not be achieved by consideration only of a small state in Palestine: given the impression that Zionism was about to be rewarded with ass.
_	Hiss: I carried away an impression of a rather self-assertive woman, who had no intention of letting Alger "steal the show"... <br>I got the impression that he felt it wiser that his mother and Priscilla should not be too near one another.
_	When people asked Berg what he did for a living, he would slowly draw his finger to his lips as if to silence both the question and answer, giving the impression that he was still involved in spying, which he was not.
_	Although all the songs are listed there, it would give the impression that there are 12 tracks on the CD instead of eleven.
_	The specific word used was “stragglers” which gave the impression that the government did not see these people as any more than falling behind in Canada’s idealized picture of what life of Indigenous people would be.
_	Anime News Network said that Sanosuke's first fight in the series against Kenshin was stereotypical for an action series due to the differences between Sanosuke's and Kenshin's personalities, and to the music used in the anime that gives the impression that Kenshin would win.
_	Mackintosh' status has often been confused, as some historians were under the impression that game-shooting was an archery contest.
_	These attacks gave the impression that there was a much larger royalist force in the vicinity then there actually was.
_	Gildas' use of the word "Patria", when used in relation to the Saxons and Picts, gave the impression that some Saxons could by then be regarded as native to Britannia.
_	His control over the state administration dispelled the impression that he was just a dummy for his mentor, Nijalingappa, then the president of the All India Congress Committee.
_	The name 3-6-3 refers to the impression that bankers had a stable, comfortable existence by paying 3 percent interest on deposits, lending money out at 6 percent, and being able to "tee off at the golf course by 3 p.m."
_	The faux sculptural reliefs are painted in grisaille, and give the impression that the scenes are set within a church.
_	Even though this paper gives the impression that the mystery of where our universe originated is solved, it is not.
_	This included a formulation which gave the impression that DMR was not in use; a closed "Torget" marker beacon was still on the maps; a vertical flight plan from Lekan was not included; the height limitations in the accident area were noted through comments rather than through a graphical presentation; and confusion as to when the timing of final approach should start.
_	I don't want to give the producers the impression that I'm sitting waiting."
_	Though unmasked during his fight with Kouga and Rei, everyone was under the impression that he is Leo save Kouga on the grounds that something is amiss.
_	However, NE:5HT selective ratio gives the impression that the ("S")-enantiomer is 100 times more selective for SERT inhibition than the ("R")-enantiomer.
_	Realizing his precarious position, he apologizes, saying he is under the impression that the position of captain is open to election.
_	A document that accompanied the acetate (which according to Young's archivist Joel Bernstein is a forgery) gave the impression that Young had officially given "Chrome Dreams" as the title, inspired by rumours in the press of a new album with the same title.
_	One does get the impression that an important ingredient is missing in this remake that seems to have lost some of its original magic as the filmmaker tried to tailor it to the Telugu palette".
_	Galleria leaves under the impression that the other Cheetah Girls have taken the deal.
_	Calabrese became a raw foodist with the impression that eating uncooked foods improves health.
_	The name changes led to confusion in later documents, giving the impression that more than one silencer had been found.
_	The real estate agent finds out he has failed to meet a deadline and his son is put on the phone and you get the impression that something bad is going to happen to him.
_	"Considerable space is devoted to examples of evil sorcery in De occulta philosophia, and one might easily come away from the treatise with the impression that Agrippa found witchcraft as intriguing as benevolent magic"
_	During the bail process, Basil Parasiris claimed that he intentionally did fire his revolver at Sergeant Daniel Tesser under the impression that it was a robbery.
_	Chromolithe ("light from stone") is a light art that gives the impression that the buildings have been painted with glowing colours.
_	Prior to the release of the first Macintosh computer, a number of marketing executives at Apple were concerned that including a game in the finished operating system would aggravate the impression that the graphical user interface made the Mac toy-like.
_	On one side, religious philosophy concentrated on piety, and the omniscience and ultimately mysterious nature of God; on the other were ideas such as deism, underpinned by the impression that the world was comprehensible by human reason and that it was governed by universal physical laws.
_	Khan said Hasan often expressed his wish to get married, and the imam said, "I got the impression that he was a committed soldier."
_	A published photograph of her sitting beside Hitler at a reception gave the leaders of the Soviet intelligence service the impression that she had close contacts with Hitler.
_	O’Neill’s play “reinforces the impression that for strength and originality he has no rival among American writers for the stage.
_	Proponents of a new flag argued "[t]he current New Zealand Flag is too colonial and gives the impression that New Zealand is still a British colony and not an independent nation."
_	"In fact Weybright had the impression that he was being brought in to run it."
_	He is depicted in frontal foreshortening, giving the impression that He is emerging from the clouds around Him.
_	Dawson's voice gave the impression that he was several years younger than his actual age, and although he toured nationally with Gene Vincent and appeared on TV, the record gained no more than regional airplay.
_	Herbert follows him to the San Francisco General Hospital emergency room and mistakenly gets the impression that Stevenson has died from his injuries.
_	Ever since the show's second episode, "Weight Gain 4000" (season one, 1997), Cartman, like all other characters on the show, has been animated with computer software, though he is portrayed to give the impression that the show still utilizes its original technique.
_	She eventually engages in phone sex with him, under the alias of "Rosy", while he is under the impression that she is Komal, a young girl who takes lessons from him.
_	Dean P. of the "Courier-Mail" described the violence in the show as "hypocritical" and that "the morality of giving the impression that a hail of bullets does no-one any harm is ignored.
_	Under the impression that Ryan is going to stay only until Sandy is able to contact Child Services, she reluctantly allows him to stay in the pool house.
_	""Octave creates sometimes the impression that he seeks to outline a dream-music, a music that can be taken as a drug, a music that calls image""
_	As darkness fell and being under the impression that all the Australians had retired, New Zealand artillery observers called for the barrage to be brought closer to the observation line, when they feared a German counter-attack.
_	Nicholas's parents had known Alix as a child and formed the impression that she was hysterical and unbalanced, which may have been due to the loss of her mother and youngest sister, Marie, to diphtheria when she was just six.
_	Millar believed at no time did the viewers get the impression that Toyah was doing something "admirable" and proclaimed that Toyah was "the sort of girl who needs care and affection, which explains why the poor soul was coaxed into losing her virginity after a holiday romance convinced her that she was in love."
_	They worry that his theory about technically minded parents may be giving the public wrong ideas, including the impression that autism is linked to being a 'geek'."
_	Because Spain was neutral, their media was free to report on the Flu, giving the impression that it began there.
_	Therefore, the people who had the impression that their preference was taken into account in the decision regarding which side they would support on the 1st issue showed attitude change in favor of the preferred position, while others who are concerned with their freedom lost move toward the intended position held by the communicator.
_	Although the House was still quite small, light pale colours and high camera angles gave the viewer the impression that the House is larger than it actually is.
_	The tied-up curtain in the foreground creates the impression that the viewer is looking at an intensely private, personal scene.
_	Prisoners have the opportunity to request protective custody if they get the impression that the environment they are living in is harmful to their well being.
_	Alice Townshend refused her husband's invitations, and presciently warned him that the impression that he was enjoying his captivity too much would not help his image in Britain.
_	Under the impression that the doom of extinction is suspended over this wretched race, and that the hand of Providence is removing them to give place to a people more worthy of this beautiful and fertile country...
_	He would never gain the impression that human behavior was dictated by intelligence, still less by responsible morality.
_	Kay has been under the impression that her only family is Mother (and Mother is keen on keeping it that way).
_	It argued that this made it an incident which "fuels the impression that, at the most critical moments – such as during the referendum campaign – the Labour leader is absent".
_	To the professional person it is at first a bit misleading in that the spiritual aspect gives the impression that this is another revival movement" and that "it is more impressive to the professional person to watch the technique in action than to read the book."
_	Muslims who met with the group later said Akkari's delegation had given them the impression that Danish Prime Minister Anders Fogh Rasmussen somehow controlled or owned "Jyllands-Posten".
_	According to "The Times", the general elaborated on this question at a 1993 commemoration of the Battle of Iwo Jima, when commenting on Ira Hayes, he said "Were Ira Hayes here today ... I would tell him that although my words on another occasion have given the impression that I believe some Marines ... because of their color ... are not as capable as other Marines ... that those were not the thoughts of my mind ... and that they are not the thoughts of my heart.
_	Yunkin stated that while he was under the impression that Lambert and Buck were going to cut Show's hair with the knife as a prank, he did help provide an alibi and helped to dispose of evidence.
_	This allowed a gradual reconciliation between Labour and the Alliance, a process assisted by the impression that lack of cooperation had cost both parties support.
_	Sen had also mentioned that though positive, Chatwal's contribution are much less compared to other Indian-Americans and the bestowal would not only "demoralise the others who had done much more" but also would create "the impression that India did not regard lack of transparency in financial dealings as a disqualification for its highest honours".
_	Whoever came out second would face the impression that they copied the other."
_	The scale and composition reflects Bayes's pre-war work as a theatre designer and creates the impression that the viewer is passing through the station, and past the cast of characters on the platform, as if on a train.
_	Under the impression that a broken window left unfixed leads to more serious problems, residents begin to change the way they see their community.
_	To save Shaily, she's asked to leave the country; they get rid of Tanmay's body and threaten his father as Mark to create the impression that he has absconded.
_	On 8 August, CNN anchor Anderson Cooper reported about a Hezbollah press tour of a bombed-out area in southern Beirut on 23 July 2006, during which Hezbollah operatives asked a group of empty ambulances to switch on their sirens and flashing lights for the benefit of the waiting press photographers, to give the impression that they were responding to casualties.
_	Gender neutrality (adjective form: gender-neutral), also known as gender-neutralism or the gender neutrality movement, describes the idea that policies, language, and other social institutions should avoid distinguishing roles according to people's sex or gender, in order to avoid discrimination arising from the impression that there are social roles for which one gender is more suited than another.
_	This left the impression that the grand jury investigation had been inconclusive.
_	An expert on men's matters, Mari shamelessly flirts with the boy even when she has the impression that he might be gay.
_	"He tore into my first-born novel with great love, but with such insight that he sometimes left me with the impression that I understood absolutely nothing about poetry".
_	He seldom speaks, but when he does, it is full of grammatical errors, giving the impression that he is not speaking in his native tongue.
_	Talking to Oswin and to other people he meets, either by chance or by design, Flood more and more gets the impression that Roger Colborn is a dangerous man who has something to hide, and that Jenny must be saved from the clutches of the Colborn family before it is too late.
_	An uninformed bystander might get the impression that the dancers are attacking one another.
_	In order to comply with FDA regulations, Mavericks' former owner, Lorillard, had until June 22, 2010 to rebrand tobacco products marketed as "Lights", "Ultra-Lights", "Medium", "Mild", "Full Flavor", or similar designations to belie the impression that some tobacco products are comparatively safe.
_	The divisional commanders were ordered that the Forward Zone must be held and that the Germans must not be given the impression that a withdrawal was in progress.
_	"The spoken intros give the impression that this might have been recorded live in concert, an impression reinforced by the rawness of the sound.
_	The reasons for this complete turnabout are not entirely clear, and several speculative arguments include the grave internal situation and inability for the Afghan government, headed by Amin from 14 September 1979 after a successful coup, to quell the rebellion, the effects of the Iranian Revolution that brought an Islamic theocracy into power, leading to fears that religious fanaticism would spread through Afghanistan and into Soviet Muslim Central Asian republics, and the deteriorating ties with the United States with the failure of Congress to ratify the SALT II treaty and the impression that détente was "already effectively dead."
_	Under the impression that the pair had been hired by the Parsons family, Western Airlines released the body to them.
_	(I have the impression that there is one other.)
_	Jonathan Stevenson argues Trump's strategy may be even less effective than Nixon's because Nixon tried to give the impression that "he'd been pushed too far, implying that he would return to his senses if the Soviets and North Vietnamese gave in."
_	The "choosing" ("bahar") may indicate a permanent choice and firm relationship, and the mention of "nakedness" ("erwa") could be interpreted to convey a negative sexual nuance, giving the impression that Saul saw something indecent in Jonathan and David's relationship.
_	Yet emphasis is often on the effects of substances on the brain creating the impression that dual disorders are a natural consequence of these substances.
_	Russell was under the impression that the rebels from Devon and Cornwall had been defeated already and the news interrupted his plans to send 1,000 men into the South West by ship to cut off his enemy’s retreat.
_	Thus giving the impression that the site is dedicated to their tastes and requirements and avoiding unwanted contact.
_	Johnson added that, for "Contact", the CNN presence "creates the impression that we're manipulated by Time Warner, and it blurs the line."
_	In 1999 the bike was renamed 955i because the T595 model name gave the impression that the bike's engine displaced 595 cc.
_	Harder to brush off was the impression that Eysenck was insensitive, even willfully blind to the way his work played out in a wider political context.
_	Fry groaned whenever he sat down, to give the impression that General Melchett had piles.
_	This was meant to give the Ostrogoth forces the impression that the Perugians had food to spare, and were able to feed a weak lamb with their precious grain.
_	The three possible spelling variants of the same name (e.g. Müller / Mueller / Muller) in different documents sometimes lead to confusion, and the use of two different spellings within the same document may give persons unfamiliar with German orthography the impression that the document is a forgery.
_	Gunnison's letters to his wife throughout the expedition left her with the impression that "the Mormons were the directors of my husband's murder."
_	At times one gets the impression that Mulvey was attempting some sort of jazz-folk hybrid, but he seems to have appropriated only the most self-indulgent and careless qualities of jazz.
_	Hence, the vocational title "brother" is generally not used by seminarians (other than in monastic or mendicant Orders) in order to avoid the impression that being a brother is a developmental phase of clerical formation.
_	After the first attack during Operation "Trident" on the Port of Karachi, Pakistan stepped up aerial surveillance of its coast as the presence of large Indian Navy ships gave the impression that another attack was being planned.
_	Gómez had actually lost the eye due to boxing several years prior and had a glass eye that he popped out after the kick to give the impression that Velázquez caused him to lose an eye.
_	Later, he gave the impression that he had fought for the Spanish Republic and trained to fly a fighter with the Royal Air Force.
_	(But it creates the impression that he died from the poison).
_	The Beatles themselves were perplexed by one analysis by Mann: "...one gets the impression that they think simultaneously of harmony and melody, so firmly are the major tonic sevenths and ninths built into their tunes, and the flat-submediant key-switches, so natural is the Aeolian cadence at the end of "Not a Second Time" (the chord progression which ends Mahler's "Song of the Earth")."
_	Jeff Swindol, of Monsters and Critics said that "the film is crap and that you get the impression that one or the other used the same screenplay and one was with spiders and the other with monkeys since the supporting players are all archetypes."
_	Stephen Thomas Erlewine of AllMusic rated the album three-and-a-half stars out of five, writing that the album's pop-leaning sound "showcases the trio at its best" and that "747" gives the impression that the band has embraced its crossover status.
_	Levanon intentionally downplayed Israel's involvement with the conference so as to leave the impression that other, more powerful countries (particularly the United States) were especially interested in the issue.
_	To reinforce the impression that an Allied invasion was imminent the Special Operations Executive (SOE), in co-operation with the Greek andartes, mounted "Operation Animals", a series of attacks on rail and road networks.
_	President Sherman and some of his followers, who left as a result of the 1906 split, had been associated with the Socialist Party, a member of the Chicago IWW expressed the impression that they had purged the Socialist Party during the 1906 split, and then the Socialist Labor Party during the 1908 split.
_	Built in a of Spanish Baroque architecture style, intricate murals and moldings were an integral part of the design, all meant to give patrons the impression that they were enjoying the shows "al fresco."
_	During the early 18th century the French were under the impression that the English would be able to penetrate westward into the North American continent by way of Oswego and threaten the main stream of the French fur trade in the Northeast.
_	Either the incumbent regime itself, or an extremist reactionary group dissatisfied with its performance, may attempt to postpone or avoid collapse by regenerating popular support; 'At the end of a dynasty there often appears some show of power giving the impression that the dynasty's senility has been made to disappear.
_	His depiction of Friederike, whom he liked most of the parson's three daughters, contains a lot of fantastical additions, but shows the situation vividly and lovingly, mentioning Friederike's slenderness and lightness, her way of walking "as if she did not have to bear anything at herself", the impression that her neck was nearly too tender for her dainty head with its mighty tresses, the clearly brisk glance of her serene blue eyes, and her nice snub-nose "searching as freely in the air as if there could be no sorrow in the world".
_	Saint Anthony had been under the impression that he was the first person to ever dwell in the desert; however, due to the dream, Saint Anthony was called into the desert to find his "better", Saint Paul.
_	The introspective component shows that a patient is unable to appreciate the affected feeling of sidedness alone apart from the simultaneously appreciated feeling of the corresponding opposite side though he can appreciate it when he moves both limbs together under the impression that he is moving only the affected one.
_	The underlying note of seriousness and wisdom is likely to be missed by careless readers, because the general tone is buoyant and optimistic and because the novel leaves us with the impression that the world is a pretty good place in which to live."
_	In early November, France's ambassador to the United States, Pierre Adet, inserted himself into the political debate on behalf of Jefferson, publishing statements designed to arouse anti-British sentiment and to leave the impression that a Jefferson victory would result in improved relations with France.
_	In 2005, Henry described Nonu as "young Tana," underlining the impression that he was being groomed as a potential successor to Umaga.
_	The three possible spelling variants of the same name (e.g. Müller / Mueller / Muller) in different documents sometimes lead to confusion, and the use of two different spellings within the same document may give persons unfamiliar with German orthography the impression that the document is a forgery.
_	The basis for this choice was the impression that these colors represented strength and value.
_	In 1821 Charles Callis Western, visiting Bedford, gained the impression that Hunt was, as the only active local magistrate, the major figure in the town's public life.
_	The promotors of Electronovision (not to be confused with Electronicam) gave the impression that this was a new system created from scratch, using a high-tech name (and avoiding the word kinescope) to distinguish the process from conventional film photography.
_	Unknowingly, he took the two to Megatron under the impression that he and the other Decepticons valued human life, but when Megatron took them as prisoners, Skyfire started to question his allegiance.
_	Before the new Constitution went into effect, the French School of Archaeology under Théophile Homolle was under the impression that it had the right to excavate, based on a previous claim of André Joubin.
_	Finally, Head of Infrastructure Graham Hitchens gives the impression that he knows everything about the London transport and traffic systems, but is completely ignorant, has no clue about deadlines and frequently upsets various officials.
_	Omitting them tends to give the impression that the "Aleinu" teaches that we are both different and better than others.
_	Dave and Sue were raised under the impression that their mother's second husband, Jack, was their natural father.
_	They worked on the car briefly to give the impression that the engine failed when the starting command was given.
_	For western ears, he seems to want to give the impression that it is all a great adventure and he is "pretending"; but he makes many admiring remarks about Islam and Islamic culture that seem to show another side.
_	Both O'Donnell and the NBA have denied the impression that this incident led to O'Donnell being forced out of the league.
_	Barry Lind, representing Americans United for Separation of Church and State, said that the Bibles could give the impression that the military is "promoting a particular evangelical religious viewpoint."
_	Initially, Toback was under the impression that "he" would be the director.
_	He "faulted Mr. Hatoyama for giving Washington the impression that [Hatoyama] valued ties with China more than he did those with the United States.
_	Using long and multiple exposures, he attempts to convey the impression that his figures are elongating or even beginning to dissolve and disappear.
_	However, he also wrote that by "Skimping on theoretical structure in a very long book", Sulloway "heightens the impression that Freud mostly borrowed or took a good deal from others" while failing to clarify why Freud borrowed ideas or how he reshaped them, and maintained that Sulloway's interest in criticizing psychoanalysis sometimes lead him into "unnecessary all-or-nothing formulations", for example concerning the role of Freud's self-analysis.
_	Sammartino has expressed that he was under the impression that the ape would be a monkey and that he only took the match because he was relatively desperate for money at the time as a young newly debuted wrestler.
_	Zoe tells Charlie as he was under the impression that Zoe's birth father was a boy Kat had gone to school with.
_	A number of different atmospheric conditions can be responsible for this effect, all of which divert the sunlight in such a way as to allow it to reach the observer's eye, thereby giving the impression that the light comes directly from the Sun itself.
_	However, when Balthasar, Romeo's servant, sees Juliet being buried under the impression that she is dead, he goes to tell Romeo and reaches him before Friar John.
_	While the film gives the impression that Loyless was no longer active in newspapers at the time of Roosevelt's visits, he was in fact still involved with the "Columbus" (Georgia) "Ledger" (of which Loyless owned a percentage).
_	A letter from Ze'ev Jabotinsky to the Irgun command ordered that the organization must avoid giving the impression that women were being deliberately targeted.
_	The Petsamo crisis had disillusioned Finnish politicians, especially Ryti and Mannerheim, creating the impression that peaceful co-existence with the Soviet Union was impossible, and that Finland would survive in peace only if the Soviet Union was defeated, as Ryti presented it to US ambassador Arthur Schoenfeld on April 28.
_	Alex Navarro of GameSpot believed the game's voice acting, despite involving the actual actors from the films, "[gave] the impression that they had each individually been roused from a bad hangover and thrown in front of a microphone."
_	The change was prompted by the impression that the existing two Opposition MPs had not adequately expressed significant alternative views held outside Parliament, and that the scheme would allow the Government to take advantage of the expertise of Singaporeans who were not able or prepared to take part in elections and look after constituencies.
_	This was a strategic move as it gave the British masters the impression that the De Saram family had the backing of a large body of natives.
_	It has not, however, been shown since, with many believing that the royal family were concerned that they were giving the impression that they were too ordinary.
_	Moore's face that did not come within striking range, allegedly in an attempt to give the impression that Lee had thrown eight successive punches and thereby preserve Lee's superstar image.
_	Unaware of Balfour's behavior while pitching, Cabrera was under the impression that he was the one being yelled at.
_	Its policy direction is not always clear, but gives the impression that it is on the centre left.
_	The commander of the hospital gave Ozarin the impression that he respected neither women nor the field of psychiatry.
_	The raiders ran away, with and On 23 August, the Germans attacked Dinant again, under the impression that the town was full of francs-tireurs and massacred Belgian civilians, while fighting the French dug in along the west bank and on the east end of the bridge.
_	To give the impression that the primates are tame and appropriate pets for children, to protect people from their potentially toxic bite, or to deceive buyers into thinking the animal is a baby, animal dealers either pull the front teeth with pliers or wire cutters or they cut them off with nail cutters.
_	He proposes that when American history textbooks elevate American historical figures to the status of heroes, they unintentionally give students the impression that these figures are superhumans who live in the irretrievable past.
_	Their name reflects the impression that they appear to dance ('choreo' as in choreography).
_	Lily, the only person who has seen the stalker, forces him to confront his "final four", none of whom is the stalker, although the woman from "" started tedmosbyisajerk.com, under the impression that Barney's identity is Ted's.
_	The press had to be warned against creating the impression that spies were everywhere.
_	With the single released just days before the EP, popular magazine ThisIsFakeDIY said of the track '[It gives] the impression that this here EP's going to be a game-changer.
_	The textbook multiplier gives the impression that making society richer is the easiest thing in the world: the government just needs to decide to spend more.
_	Johnny, with a heavy heart, leaves for the prairie, as he is under the impression that even Diana has left him for the pastor.
_	Moments later, Stella returns home, under the impression that she has shot Gar Boni.
_	By acquiescing to this gesture, both the empress dowager and the young emperor gave the public the impression that they were just puppets in the hands of the Hán court.
_	As a young officer and gymnastics teacher, Balck was of the impression that voluntary gymnastics and sports activities in Sweden, i.e., outside the army and the schools, were undeveloped in comparison to the contemporary situation in many other countries.
_	Each carpel is deeply lobed, giving the impression that there are in fact 4 carpels, ostensibly isomerous with the perianth.
_	To strengthen his position, Stieglitz rapidly formed an invitation-only group, which he called the Photo-Secession, to give the impression that his views were backed by many other prominent photographers.
_	These incidents left the supervising physician with the impression that:
_	Maxwell admitted in a report to Asquith in June that the impression that the leaders were killed in cold blood and without a trial had resulted in a "revulsion of feeling" that had emerged in favour of the rebels, and was the result of the confusion between applying DORA as opposed to Martial law (which Maxwell had actually pressed for from the beginning).
_	This would override the impression that St. Olaf had actually been present here.
_	His mother claimed he was depressed because he was unable to find work after he got the impression that his career was failing.
_	One possible reason why the name was chosen was the practice, common at the time of the drink’s creation, of including "Dr." in the names of products to convey the impression that they were healthful.
_	The shallow box adds to the impression that the assistant could not possibly find room to evade the saw blade even if she could release herself from the stocks and try to curl up in one half of the box.
_	The Discovery Institute has created a number of petitions to give the impression that there are widespread doubts about the Theory of Evolution among scientists and scientifically-literate professionals.
_	Career wise, Brooke likes to create the impression that she is a competent, confident and ambitious woman.
_	On one occasion, Feng Yanji, who actually had no part in Li Jing's plan to eventually pass the throne to Li Jingsui and Li Jingda, wanted to nevertheless create the impression that he was involved, to draw gratitude from the two princes.
_	The Perri and Lichtenwald article examined female psychopathic killers, whom as a group were highly motivated to manage the impression that attorneys, judges, mental health professions and ultimately, a jury had of the murderers and the murder they committed.
_	He was not sitting on the bench and was standing up, giving the impression that he wanted to come back onto the ground.
_	Marketers or product managers responsible for branding seek to develop or align the expectations behind the brand experience, creating the impression that a brand associated with a product or service has certain qualities or characteristics that make it special or unique.
_	Modern reproductions of cylinder and disc recordings usually give the impression that the introduction of discs was a quantum leap in audio fidelity, but this is on modern playback equipment; played on equipment from around 1900, the cylinders do not have noticeably more rumble and poorer bass reproduction than the discs.
_	The Chief of the Grand Rapids band put forth a number of new demands because he was under the impression that the negotiations were still ongoing.
_	The company, having moved from Australia and now owned and operated by Dutch company Abbywinters.com BV, and with its servers being located mostly in the Netherlands, still conveys the impression that it is an Australian company based in Fitzroy, Melbourne: "Where possible, we select local suppliers over mega-corps, to keep our vibrant community of Fitzroy alive.".
_	Meanwhile, Westbury Kean was under the impression that his crew was safe on his father's ship, the "Stephano".
_	Foch was also ordered by Joffre to conserve infantry and ammunition to reinforce the simultaneous offensive in Champagne; ammunition expenditure in Artois had been so vast that the offensive was to be reduced but without giving the British the impression that they were being left in the lurch.
_	The people of Natalia were – mistakenly – under the impression that Smellekamp's arrival heralded a full-scale intervention by the Netherlands.
_	The thing is, the revamped, puzzlingly titled "I Wanna Be with You" [Special Edition] (thereby giving the impression that this is an extended EP release or that there's a "regular" edition of "I Wanna Be with You", which there's not) works a lot better than its predecessor.
_	He was of the time belief that any bowling could and should be hit, and gave the impression that the balls were reaching the boundary with a minimum of power.
_	Grebes and many other waterfowl have shorter femur and a more or less narrow pelvis, too, which gives the impression that their legs are attached to the rear as in loons.
_	One of the series' more political moments, Clair refuses to be exploited as "the token black woman" on a morning talk show discussing the Great Depression during the episode "Mrs. Huxtable Goes to Kindergarten", a position she originally accepts under the impression that she would be appreciated for her experience as a lawyer.
_	Nathan Harris was a minuteman (who could literally be ready in one minute) as well as an activist for civil rights and was responsible for "freeing" a nearby slave (who was under the impression that they were in Virginia, where slavery was still legal.
_	Quentin Kalis, writing for Chronicles of Chaos, rated the EP 9.5 out of 10, commenting, “Bits of static noise and various other bits of white noise litter the album at what appears to be seemingly random spots -- but this is Ulver, after all, and one gets the impression that each bit of noise is placed where it is for a reason.
_	According to Polybius, when the envoys of the Arevaci were heard, they came across as not being willing to submit or to accept defeat and gave the impression that they thought that they had fought more brilliantly than the Romans.
_	Furthermore, during the seventh season episode "Threat Level Midnight" was filmed to give the impression that "Threat Level Midnight", an amateur feature directed by Michael Scott, had been filmed and edited during the first seven or so seasons of the show.
_	The ever-evolving band lineup can give the impression that Destroyer is a solo project.
_	"We had the impression that Ernő Gerő especially, but the other comrades as well, are exaggerating the strength of the opponent and underestimating their own strength," he and Suslov wrote.
_	We must at all costs avoid giving the impression that we want to get rid of them, since that would set up precisely the reaction we would want to avoid”."
_	Hudson notes that the existing economic theory (in particular, the Chicago School of economics) is in the service of rentiers and financiers and has developed a special language designed to create the impression that the current status quo has no alternative.
_	When disturbed, adult moths tend to lower the head and abdomen, bringing the forewings forward to expose the large spots on the hind wings, which oscillate from side to side, giving the aggressor the impression that it is being watched by two large eyes (such as an owl), in an attempt to cause the aggressor to refrain from attacking.
_	If they are not full they will give trans people privacy (maybe they have private quarters of some sort), but if full and they are in an overflow shelter situation, as they were Tuesday night, I am under the impression that they will assign people according to their anatomy."
_	It was later reported that when Manning was appointed to cabinet she and Davis were under the impression that Collins would resign his seat in the near future, creating a by-election for her to run in.
_	In the 1820s, one European – Craik – was left with the impression that northern Māori had gone to war with the specific purpose of obtaining heads to trade for gunpowder.
_	The series was met with much criticism; many of those present were indignant, claiming it made the impression that the Second World War was won "by a few spies".
_	The building is cantilevered over the plaza, and toward the sea. and gives the impression that it is floating on the water.
_	By giving the impression that the Czechs would accept a settlement favorable to the Poles without a plebiscite, Beneš got the Poles to sign an agreement that Poland would abide by any Allied decision regarding Teschen.
_	Her swarthy appearance gave onlookers the impression that she was an Indian.
_	This might be achieved through diplomatic maneuvers by creating the impression that one is willing to use extreme methods rather than concede.
_	Investigators also found that "SCOPE obtained the semi-finished product to produce the said components from a German company Bikar Metal and this gives the impression that these items are not controlled items.
_	The wizards, on the other hand, were under the impression that Anne had indeed given "PernMUSH" the privilege of those two locales.
_	Davies was found to have breached BBC rules on due impartiality in coverage of the 2017 French presidential election on Newsnight, giving the impression that he favoured Emmanuel Macron over Marine Le Pen.
_	These factors gave the impression that NBC might cancel the show.
_	The first million units of "Bridges to Babylon" were encased in a special manufactured filigree slipcase, that gave the impression that the lion was embedded into the design.
_	Gossip of alleged leaping and fire-spitting powers, his alleged extraordinary features and his reputed skill in evading apprehension captured the mind of the superstitious public—increasingly so with the passing of time, which gave the impression that Spring-heeled Jack had suffered no effects from ageing.
_	Rather, they are asserting that the present monetary system is already Treasury-based operationally, even when governments choose to impose political restraints that mimic obsolete practices and create the impression that these are operationally necessary.
_	They replied that this was their intention, but asked if they could keep them awhile longer so their women did not get the impression that their unarmed men were prisoners.
_	This shift into formality give the Nahua the impression that she was a noblewoman who knew what she was talking about.
_	"McCain tries to give the impression that he's tough on Iran, but when it came time to stand up to party leaders and Big Oil, John McCain stood down," said senator Frank Lautenberg.
_	In an interview about illegal immigrants hidden in Sweden on 18 March 2013 Billström said that "Sometimes we have the impression that the person who is hidden lives with a nice blonde Swedish lady in around the age of 50 to 60 who wants to help.
_	In "The Secret Gospel of Mark Unveiled" (2007), Peter Jeffery argued that “the letter reflected practices and theories of the twentieth century, not the second”, and that Smith wrote Clement’s letter to Theodore with the purpose of creating “the impression that Jesus practiced homosexuality”.
_	Due to this ability, he falls under the impression that he is a slave to his own future.
_	Obviously derived from Mies's Farnsworth House, the fact that it was finished earlier could easily have made the German architect wonder whether others would get the impression that Johnson had instead done pioneering work for Mies, and it could be seen that "Johnson's vision lacked the intellectual rigor and exquisite detailing that were so critical to Mies's genius", according to Ouroussoff.
_	"BBC News" found that Russian TV coverage of the 2 May 2014 Odessa clashes was misleading, noting that it "either completely ignored or seriously misrepresented the street clashes that preceded the fatal fire, thus giving the impression that the attack by pro-Ukraine activists on Trade Union House was completely unprovoked", made it seem that all the victims were pro-Russians, used manipulated or questionable evidence to support claims that several people had been murdered, and failed to mention that some pro-Ukrainian activists had attempted to help dying people.
_	Within his first month, according to recorded reports from Post Surgeon Charles Page, Grattan received a reputation as being brash and boastful, while also giving off the impression that he was proud to serve in the army.
_	Small construction crews created large clouds of dust, to create the impression that major construction was underway.
_	In the 1997 book "One Hell of a Gamble: Khrushchev, Castro, and Kennedy, 1958-1964", authors Alexander Fursenko and Timothy Naftali wrote that comments by Sagatelyan and KGB resident Alexander Feklisov may have given John F. Kennedy and his brother Robert the impression that Nikita Khrushchev might be prepared to make concessions:
_	The Jockey Club president, August Belmont, Jr., asked Gates to limit his bets to US$10,000, as such large wagers gave the impression that the races were not honest ones.
_	Zoochlorellae, food reserves and waste granules, which are abundant in the cytoplasm, may create the impression that "Vorticella" is an opaque cell.
_	In Amsterdam, in particular, visitors may get the impression that it is possible to live in the Netherlands for a long time without learning Dutch.
_	However, the show gives the impression that all five jurors shoot the scenes together, with jurors often shown engaging in interactive behavior with each other.
_	She only appears in the first episode, but we get the impression that she is draconian.
_	Lucas immediately delivers the impression that he is a good actor, who is both conventionally attractive and believable.
_	These surgeries left Sheena with large scars on her shoulder blades, said to give the impression that an angel's wings had been removed.
_	As there is no established spelling system for AAVE, depicting it in literature is instead often done through spelling changes to indicate its phonological features, or to contribute to the impression that AAVE is being used (eye dialect).
_	Saleem seems to be under the impression that his Hindu friends and their families will be able to protect his family from rioters, but upon trying to get this assurance from them, they say, "What will we say to them?
_	It gave the impression that Syariah Law is extreme and Muslims are extremists.
_	According to B'Tselem, "the overall features of the separation barrier and the considerations that led to determination of the route give the impression that Israel is relying on security arguments to unilaterally establish facts on the ground ..."
_	Although the general term "robotic surgery" is often used to refer to the technology, this term can give the impression that the da Vinci System is performing the surgery autonomously.
_	Raczynski has created a new artist name for each track, to give the impression that it is a compilation album.
_	Abdullah 'reconsidered the promises that he made in November to not be opposed to the partition plan,' but left Meir with the impression that he would make peace with the Jewish state once the civil war had finished.
_	The ride creates the impression that the rider is turning upside down, whereas it is actually the room that is moving around them.
_	Her mother had raised her as a single parent as she was under the impression that Kritika's father Arun Kohli had died in a fire accident in Mumbai where he had earlier gone to work.
_	Although DGC had given the impression that the work on the live part had not progressed very far, and was why it was cancelled early on, Jim Merlis, in a 1997 article for "Goldmine" by Gillian Gaar, insists that it was all complete bar mixing:
_	During a court appearance, Reséndiz accused Carter of lying under oath because his (Reséndiz's) family was under the impression that he would be spared the death penalty; however, Reséndiz's ultimate fate would be decided by a jury, not Carter.
_	[T]he host website can display a third-party merchant’s products, but retain its visitor traffic by displaying this product information from within a generated web page that ‘gives the viewer of the page the impression that she is viewing pages served by the host’ website."
_	The PRC is under the impression that coalition forces moved some 2,700 tons of weaponized CW agent near the Persian Gulf during the Gulf War (1991).
_	TrueOS was originally licensed under the GNU General Public License (GPL) because the developers were under the impression that applications using the Qt, which TrueOS uses for its interface development, must be licensed under the GPL or the Q Public License.
_	Flight testing in Belgium was carried out with a 280 hp (209 kW) Salmson 9ABa engine, to give the impression that the aircraft was a trainer rather than a fighter, with the more powerful engine to be fitted when the aircraft was delivered to Spain.
_	On 23 February 1883, Sir Henry Trueman Wood, Secretary of the Royal Society of Arts, sent a letter to "The Times", complaining that the SSLA was using a title too much like its own, and that it had been asking the RSA's members to sign up to the Society of Science, Letters and Art while giving the impression that the RSA had commissioned this request.
_	Travers wrote that Haig wavered in his thinking about what he wanted but left Gough under the impression that he was to plan a breakthrough attack.
_	Although he is very happy with the way it turned out, he thinks that a lot of people got the impression that they are nothing more than a backing band for Allin.
_	Howard Brenton, who wrote the series two finale, originally killed Tom off by drowning him while trying to escape onto the North Sea, while labouring under the impression that he was not to return.
_	"Ramachandran wanders along intriguing neural pathways, pausing to investigate strange disorders, but he leaves the impression that he is an explorer who has yet to leave the coast.
_	He was offered the opportunity to remain with the Cardinals in another capacity, and didn’t blame the organization for not welcoming him back to his former job as first base coach, as the Cardinals' front office was under the impression that he planned on retiring with LaRussa.
_	Henery, still under the impression that the Dawg is a pheasant, leaves in pursuit.
_	The film leaves one with the impression that Mars is ruled by God."
_	Shortly before the race, the impression that the Remebrancer colt was his owner's favoured entrant was enhanced when he appeared before the crowds ridden by Chifney, while Cwrw was ridden by an unknown stable lad.
_	Students are said to have got the impression that he was creating teaching material on the spot and that they were witnessing the formation of something new.
_	In practice, de Valera, particularly when abroad, called himself "President de Valera", creating the impression that he was head of state.
_	Gollum's CG model was also redesigned during 2001, now using a subdivision surface model instead of the NURBS model for "Fellowship" (a similar rebuild was also done for the digital doubles of the lead actors), when Serkis was cast as Sméagol, Gollum's form before he is cursed by the One Ring, so as to give the impression that Andy Serkis as Sméagol transforms into the CG Gollum.
_	In this publication, which was released while Howell was still incarcerated, he labeled the Roman Catholic Pope as "Satan the Devil" and created the impression that war was being declared against colonialism and white supremacy - which Howell asserted should be replaced with "Black supremacy."
_	Tower was constructed in a diagonal rotation away from Houston's main north-south street grid, which gives the impression that the structure has a larger footprint than it actually does.
_	Now, because of a communication gap, the brides' relatives get the impression that Soham has agreed to marry Rajji.
_	Although acknowledging Paul's innocence, Claudius Lysias gave the impression that he had rescued Paul because of having learned that the apostle was a Roman, whereas in reality he had violated Paul's citizenship rights by having him bound and even ordering that he be examined under scourgings.
_	After the acquittal his lawyer stated that Francis Joseph had gone to the house "under the impression that it was a brothel and that a woman would be waiting for him there.
_	There were no corners, vertical walls, or lines which would create the impression that the "Kronosaurus" was standing on the floor.
_	Similarly, weight-bearing elements are not designed along anthropomorphic lines to present an image of physical strength; cupolas for example often feature muqarnas disguising the transition between the cupola and its supports, creating the impression that the supports, rather than holding up the cupola, have "congealed" from the divine void above.
_	Taven is under the impression that Shinnok is still a force of good, as he rescues Shinnok from an attack by Li Mei and then helps him regain control of a spire from an army of demons that are later revealed to have been apparitions merely serving as a test.
_	The monks drew red ochre lines on the rocks, to give the impression that cut stones were used in the construction.
_	Apparently, though, Millicent doesn't want Emily to know of her sky-high IQ, because Emily is under the impression that Millicent is not only home schooled, but tutored by Stanford.
_	Days before any fighting, Napoleon had been giving the impression that his army was weak and that he desired a negotiated peace.
_	The average Fox viewer was likely left with the impression that the media's criticism of Trump and leftist protestors' toppling of some Confederate statues were far greater threats to America than white supremacism or the president's apparent defense of bigotry."
_	Aside from the Marines, there was a small civilian caretaker presence on the island consisting of Kuwaiti citizens, as well as a few shop owners, which surprised the Marines a little bit as they were under the impression that the island was deserted.
_	A review by "Quill & Quire" was negative, stating that "the reader gets the impression that Coakley himself barely cares about his subject."
_	Actress Lindsay Lohan, who has a history of alcoholism and was noted for having tried in the early 2000s (decade) to date popular young men who were already dating other women, attempted to sue E*TRADE over the advertisement, seeking US$100,000,000 in damages, under the impression that the advertisement defamed her via subliminal messaging and violated her personality rights.
_	This creates the impression that the resurrected Christ is holding a Danish banner.
_	This gave the Loyalist cavalrymen the impression that the Continentals had shot at their commander while asking for mercy.
_	Boutefeu lines up models of pretend soldiers to give the impression that Croquefer still has an army.
_	Western journalists promptly nicknamed it as "The White Book", both for its white cover and its attempts to whitewash the invasion by creating the impression that the Warsaw Pact countries had the right and duty to invade.
_	His friends initially resent him for what he did, but eventually the entire village decides to pull an elaborate ruse designed to give Silvia the impression that the south really is as bad as Alberto had been saying.
_	Other significant supporting characters in Dhruva series include "Jingalu", a yeti; "Kirigi", a ninja fighter with yogic powers; "Lori", a tantric; "Vanputra" who has the ability to communicate with plants and trees in contrast to Dhruva who communicates with animals; "Barf-manava", possessing the power of ice; "Saamri", the keeper of "Jwalok", a secret city located inside a volcano; "Vera Vicet", a French police officer who initially tried to kill Dhruva under the impression that Shyam, Dhruva's biological father, had killed her father but eventually realised the truth and became his ally and "Nakshatra", a mirror image of Dhruva who, like Dhruva, was born and brought up in a circus and has pretty much the same abilities that Dhruva has.
_	Under the impression that incumbent mayor Robert Macalister was not intending to seek a third term as Mayor, Toop applied to gain nomination as the Citizens' mayoral candidate.
_	On the other hand, the "lightning river", the Batiscan Lake and Moïse River (upstream) are enclosed between steep walls of the surrounding mountains, echoing thunder, giving the impression that the storms are stronger in this sector.
_	The comedy includes the amusing characters of Sir Joseph Wittol, a foolish knight, who allows himself to be really married to Silvia, under the impression that she is the wealthy Araminta; and his companion, the cowardly bully, Captain Bluffe, who under the same delusion is married to Silvia's maid.
_	The reason why there were two separate acts of recognition of the independence of Brazil is this: in the wake of the Brazilian victory in the War of Independence, the Portuguese king initially attempted to recognize Brazilian independence unilaterally so as to ignore the fact of the Portuguese defeat and transmit the impression that Portugal was being magnanimous.
_	John VI wanted to "save face" by giving the impression that Portugal was voluntarily conceding independence to Brazil, and not just recognizing a "fait accompli".
_	The exuding blood gave the impression that the corpse had recently been engaging in vampiric activity.
_	Sverker Andréason wrote in the Swedish magazine "": "These people are evasively walking around each other, saying curious things of the type 'we are destruction people' and 'we live like migratory birds' and in the end I get the impression that Roy Andersson has got his whole philosophy of life from some film club that has gone through the dark French pre-war cinema with him, you know the one in which Jean Gabin always got shot right on the final step towards liberation."
_	In his Allmusic review, critic Greg Adams wrote of the CD reissue "Despite the impression that it is a collection of leftovers, the singularity of Owens' stylistic vision prevents the album from seeming like a hodgepodge.
_	It gave other people the impression that her firstborn was a man who was going to carry out his father's ways, to carry on our family's honor.
_	A little horn adorns the axis between the eyes and a rounded frontal outgrowth gives the impression that the profile of its face is concave.
_	Cradock sailed from the Falklands on 20 October, still under the impression that "Defence" would soon arrive and with Admiralty orders to attack German merchant ships and to seek out the East Asiatic Squadron.
_	She warns writers away from trying to base their style on that of masters such as Lord Dunsany and E. R. Eddison, emphasizing that language that is too bland or simplistic creates the impression that the fantasy setting is simply a modern world in disguise, and presents examples of clear, effective fantasy writing in brief excerpts from Tolkien and Evangeline Walton.
_	Situated on a commanding hillside in the desert outside Palm Springs, California, its best-known feature is the large circular "sunburst" concrete canopy which appears to float above the main living area; this area also incorporates a large natural rock outcrop at the edge of the room, creating the impression that the fabric of the building is fused with the rock.
_	The show gave the impression that it was broadcasting live but it was actually a pre-recorded show.
_	Beadle wrote in 1966, that after reading the 1951 Cold Spring Harbor Symposium on Genes and Mutations, he had the impression that supporters of the one gene–one enzyme hypothesis “could be counted on the fingers of one hand with a couple of fingers left over.”
_	On August 21, Switzerland's Federal Department for Foreign Affairs (DFAE) publicly denounced Romney Girl's video, arguing that it gives "the impression that having a bank account in Switzerland is dubious in itself.”
_	In "The New Yorker", Meghan Daum called the piece "self-aggrandizing, disjointed, and, in its most egregious moments, leaves the impression that her editors might have been egging her on—or worse, taking advantage of what sometimes looks like a fairly precarious psychological state—in order to ensure maximum blogospheric outrage."
_	It is illegal for agents to require the seller to use a particular natural hazard disclosure company or to give the impression that the seller may not choose.
_	Referring to Lauridsen's sacred music, the musicologist and conductor Nick Strimple said he was "the only American composer in history who can be called a mystic, (whose) probing, serene work contains an elusive and indefinable ingredient which leaves the impression that all the questions have been answered ...
_	"Even if a film contains no sexually explicit scenes involving minors, it could be treated as child pornography if the title and trailers convey the impression that the scenes would be found in the movie."
_	Professor Aikens also pointed out that cultural constructions were rare in Hogup Cave compared with the total number of deposits found, giving the impression that the occupants had made only the most rudimentary and casual modifications to the cave.
_	He claims that during slavery, black individuals were forced to cling to their black identities in order to build community and have since mistakenly clung to that same rhetoric under the impression that it is still the most valuable tool to excel.
_	He gained the impression that Karaganda was the main camp at the heart of a large network of labour camps covering an area of approximately 33,800 square kilometers.
_	Jean added "What bothers me about all of this, is that now people may get the impression that this "Simpsons" episode is less than good.
_	Critics praised the film's hard-line look at racism and Fuller's use of melodrama and metaphors to present his argument, and its somewhat disheartening ending that leaves the impression that while racism is learned, it cannot be cured.
_	Otis's feelings toward Fibber are never mentioned, giving the impression that Fibber's grudge is one-sided.
_	This gave the impression that the Reich extended over Austria and the German-speaking areas in Poland, Czechoslovakia, and even France.
_	Although the Arab sources give the impression that the Arabs began their conquest of the region in the 650s, in reality most of the early warfare in the area were little more than raids aiming at seizing booty and extracting tribute.
_	For example, people typically underestimate the probability of being involved in a car accident because their everyday interaction with vehicles gives the impression that they are safer than they actually are.
_	As more PBX were installed in offices in Luxembourg compared to areas with almost exclusively residential customers, this led to the impression that numbers in Luxembourg City would be longer than 6 digits.
_	Kincaid does this to give the impression that Lucy is notably intelligent, which turns out to be central to the novel.
_	Adam leads Hiro to a bar under the impression that they can find information there, but it is just a ruse for Adam to escape.
_	"I Never Told Anyone" was criticized in the 1996 book "Worlds of Hurt: Reading the Literatures of Trauma", where it was noted that it "frequently compromises the integrity of the personal narratives, reducing and softening their impact on the reader, while at the same time creating the impression that, within each category, all incest experiences are somehow alike.
_	The book also noted that the framework used by Bass and Thornton for "I Never Told Anyone" classified abused women as within the framework of mental illness and that "By making it clear that child sexual abuse had dramatic effects upon its victims, and by advocating that women seek counseling, advice, and support from professionals and therapy groups, Bass and Thornton create the impression that the survivors are weak, harmless and "sick" - no threat to the status quo."
_	Els van Duin, to give the impression that there was a staff of writers and editors.
_	Some present at the Big Fence meeting sat "silent and appeared ill at ease," giving reporters the impression that they did not hold the same views.
_	Action are closely related techniques which, when applied to animation, can help to render movement more realistically, and help to give the impression that characters follow the laws of physics.
_	Under the impression that Origen was a heretic like Arius, St. Jerome criticizes ideas described in "On First Principles".
_	Such factors reinforce the impression that many similarities between the Illyrian and Thracian lexes resulted from language contact.
_	Not believing the ship would sink, troops were told to leave all of their belongings behind under the impression that they would conduct salvage operations over the next few days.
_	However, when he testifies against his brother, he gives the jury the impression that Ryan is unstable due to his relationship with Maisie and the revelations about their true identities, and that Ryan is jealous of the Wylde's for having the family he never had.
_	Patrick Gibbs of the "Daily Telegraph" said the film "gives the impression that it originated in the strip of some horror comic.
_	The immense waterworks undertaken by the ancient Egyptian pharaohs of the twelfth dynasty to transform the lake into a huge water reservoir gave the impression that the lake itself was an artificial excavation, as reported by classic geographers and travellers.
_	The credits of the film within a film make use of "The Merry-Go-Round Broke Down" (1937), but the familiar tune is simplified, giving the impression that it is played by an amateur.
_	Under the terms of the 1844 arrangement, the British gave the impression that they would protect the coastal areas; thus, an informal protectorate came into being.
_	An alternate version of "Little Darlings" was made for TV which had all the sex-related scenes and dialogue removed, giving the impression that, instead of trying to lose their virginity, Angel and Ferris were merely trying to make a guy fall in love with them.
_	Davis gave the impression that "The Curse of Steptoe" was entirely factual and claimed that Brambell and Corbett loathed each other, whereas the balance of first-hand evidence is that this was by no means the case.
_	This combined with the colonial government's acute reluctance to hand over power to black Rhodesians—the manifestation of racial tensions, Cold War anti-communism and the fear that a dystopian Congo-style situation might result—to create the impression that if the UK did not grant independence, Rhodesia might be justified in taking it unilaterally.
_	Rating the album a 6.5 out of ten for "Blistering Magazine", Justin Donnelly says, ""The Heart of Man" has it moments, but sadly, not enough of them to give the impression that In The Midst of Lions are the kind of band to stand out from the crowd."
_	Josephus' records of Berossus include some of the only extant narrative material, but he is probably dependent on Alexander Polyhistor, even if he did give the impression that he had direct access to Berossus.
_	The balloon caught fire and the Egyptians received the impression that what had been demonstrated was a machine of war for setting fire to the enemy encampments.
_	She tries to create the impression that there is an equal ratio between the supporters and opponents of Theosophists: "But, if the Society has had its enemies and traducers, it has also had its friends and advocates.
_	When the news was broken to Yasuo Yamada, it was not made clear who was responsible for the dismissal, leaving him with the impression that "Lupin III"'s creator Monkey Punch had lobbied the producers for a new voice actor.
_	Under the impression that NASCAR would not be willing to schedule this, the promoter pulled the plug and the 2013 race was canceled, replaced by an event at Mid-Ohio Sports Car Course.
_	When logistics made it impossible to print a copy for several weeks, Birkenhead would resort to including gaps in page numbers and issues to give the impression that the reader had merely missed a specific copy that had no doubt been delivered elsewhere across the country satisfactorily.
_	For some reason they are not trusted in Byston Well, which puts Chris under the impression that an event in the past may have resulted in a grudge between species (quite possibly when Drake Luft's war of aggression got so out of control that the Ferarios exiled "all" of the combatants to Upper Earth—uselessly, as all of them died during the final battle and their souls went right back to Byston Well).
_	This, along with other incidents, and the lack of a firm Norwegian response, led the warring parties to the impression that Norway could or would not effectively protect her neutrality.
_	These contribute to the impression that Laurent and Thérèse are in a state of remorse and are plagued by guilt.
_	I have the impression that Blix will now be more negative than he was before, with regard to the Iraqis’ intentions.
_	On March 30, 2006, Rep. Carolyn Maloney (D-NY) and eleven co-sponsors first introduced a bill called the "Stop Deceptive Advertising for Women's Services Act", which would have required the Federal Trade Commission to "promulgate rules prohibiting...persons from advertising with the intent to deceptively create the impression that such persons provide abortion services" and "enforce violations of such rules as unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices."
_	Often, part of the routine involves the magician giving the impression that he is "passing" the balls through his body, in and out of his mouth, fingertips, and pockets.
_	The fake journal links to the archives of the real one, and gives the impression that the impact factor and inclusion in Scopus and Thomson Reuters databases of the latter also applies to them.
_	During the 2006 Lebanon War, Israeli diplomatic officials boycotted BBC news programmes, refused interviews, and excluded BBC reporters from briefings because Israeli officials believed the BBC's reporting was biased, stating "the reports we see give the impression that the BBC is working on behalf of Hezbollah instead of doing fair journalism".
_	’[39] In the absence of any other record of this conversation, one is left with the impression that the French prime minister played the part of the polite host to the very end even when his Israeli guest was making plans to share the territorial spoils of war.
_	It is officially designated as an escort vessel to avoid giving the impression that Starfleet builds warships, as it is primarily a peacekeeping and exploration force.
_	Mann stated that she was under the impression that all of the people in the photos had signed release forms for photographs to be taken.
_	On the north, south and west sides of the building, hundreds of vertical fins of travertine running the full height of the structure give the impression that the facade is an uninterrupted mass of travertine when viewed from certain angles.
_	Finger than Kane would later be, appears carefully worded to rebut "the impression that "he" [Finger] and not myself [Kane] created the "Batman," as well as Robin[, etc.]" rather than to address Bails' issue of co-creatorship.
_	On "The Daily Show", Jon Stewart remarked, tongue in cheek, "apparently [Colbert] was under the impression that they'd hired him to do what he does every night on television".
_	A LaRouche recruiter from Paris told the meeting that Duggan had been to the Tavistock, apparently giving the impression that he had been there recently.
_	Hideyoshi used pre-constructed sections to put up the fortress and it was finished so quickly that it gave the impression that it was done overnight, although the work took several days to complete.
_	Moss suggested that the idea of persecution is cardinal to the worldview of Christianity, noting that it creates the impression that Christians are a minority that are facing a war - even though they are numerically superior.
_	"Variety" said:"Anyone who's been laboring under the impression that a dash of American folk music and a hymn or two is strictly for farm listeners is apparently off the beam, because here's a series of 48 shorties that two metropolitan stations - Chicago's NBC flagship, WMAQ and Minneapolis' WCCO-CBS have latched on to for a 16 week ride ...
_	Philosopher of science Michael Ruse has written that followers of biodynamic agriculture rather enjoy the scientific marginalisation that comes from its pseudoscientific basis, revelling both in its esoteric aspects and the impression that they were in the vanguard of the wider anti-science sentiment that has grown in opposition to modern methods such as genetic modification.
_	While Scott had been under the impression that it was intended as a memorial, Belgian sculptor Paul Van Hoeydonck had created it as a tribute to humanity's aspirations to expand into space.
_	Kritika's mother, Kamini tried to pull Shraddha and Kunal apart as she doesn't want a divorcee & a single mother women as her daughter in law & she is under the impression that Shraddha is trying to steal Kunal away from her.
_	The majority of the people were under the impression that birth control was against nature because "it engaged in intercourse for pleasure and not for procreation."
_	The rear lights of the Ghia were the same shape and layout as other models, but featured tiny horizontal strakes on the lenses to give the impression that they were smoked.
_	Because of his thick prescription glasses, it gave people the impression that he was always staring.
_	For this style, fast footwork is often utilized in order to give the impression that the performers are drifting lightly across the stage.
_	The intention was to avoid the impression that the decision favoured Karpov.
_	Many were under the impression that this was a claim to a Bachelor of Laws in international law.
_	Although Cher was the lead singer, she did not receive top billing because she wanted to create the impression that all band members were equal.
_	Judy under the impression that the film wasn't related to that type of nature, becomes very apprehensive and defiant, and contemplates leaving.
_	Telling the story in this way was a deliberate choice: there are a number of creation stories in the Bible, but they tend to be told in the first person, by Wisdom, the instrument by which God created the world; the choice of omniscient third-person narrator in the Genesis narrative allows the storyteller to create the impression that everything is being told and nothing held back.
_	She then sent such images to Andersen who was under the impression that he was both receiving these from Dunn herself and that Dunn was not underage.
_	A number of reviewers also praised the attention paid to the game's premise and setting; GameSpot's Greg Kasavin described getting "the impression that "Doom 3" takes place in a fully realized world" while IGN noted that "the UAC base also has a very worn and lived-in feel that adds to the realism."
_	It is said that Nongalaza deceived Dingane's men by creating the impression that the Boers had arrived and were about to take to the field.
_	Albert Rivera made a defense of his pact with the PP but tried to convey the impression that it was a result of convenience—arguing that it was needed to try to unlock the parliamentary deadlock—rather than out of genuine political affinity.
_	The castle authorities and the media were under the impression that the vibrations from the blasting would create irreplaceable damage to the foundations of this ancient landmark and given that the castle had been recently renovated internally at the time believed it would cause damage.
_	Their relationship was well known and attracted attention in diplomatic reports, and she herself alluded to it, possibly to give the impression that she had influence upon affairs of state.
_	In her presence, Professor Sharp was reading with disbelief a review on ""Eoörnis"..." published in "The Quarterly Review of Biology" (Pearl 1930, reprinted in 1976) and was truly under the impression that the reviewer was hoaxed until he reached the end, which made clear that the review was on par with the reviewed article.
_	Sohier explained the difference between murder and manslaughter, which left the impression that he believed a homicide had occurred.
_	Throughout the filming period, Phoenix remained in character for public appearances, giving many the impression that he was genuinely pursuing a new career.
_	X attempted to regain his position in "Littlefoot" by capturing the monster currently attacking New York (the feral version of Marlene that had been separated from her normal self), but the penguins sabotaged this effort by recombining the two Marlenes, leaving Rico behind to give the impression that X's penguin-related "insanity" had prompted him to steal a penguin from the zoo.
_	The obscure allusions and the names in these forgeries were derived from Picquart's private correspondence, which had been looked through, and were intended to produce the impression that Picquart was in some plot to release Dreyfus; the "demigod," it was pretended, referred to Scheurer-Kestner.
_	To give the impression that he was taller, he wore stacked shoes, and stood on a small wooden platform during parades.
_	The JSA said the reason for doing this was due to the increasing strength of shogi software programs and concerns that even a single professional player losing to a computer could give the public the impression that professionals "are weaker than the software".
_	The pitch of the main hip roof is shallow enough to give the passer-by on the sidewalk in front of the house the impression that it is a flat roof.
_	Mowrer dropped the term "Integrity Therapy" in favor of "Integrity Groups," to avoid the impression that it was possible to outgrow the need for Group attendance.
_	The promoters of Electronovision gave the impression that this was a new system created from scratch, using a high-tech name (and avoiding the word kinescope) to distinguish the process from conventional film photography.
_	The program utilized an applause cart (audio tape cartridge) to give the viewers the impression that a studio audience was present during the tapings.
_	The production team also used sandstone to give the impression that the caves may have once been a riverbed, and thus allowing the crew to not have to worry about putting a ceiling on the set.
_	Contrary to a popular legend, de Broglie actually gave the correct rebuttal that the particular technique could not be generalized for Pauli's purpose, although the audience might have been lost in the technical details and de Broglie's mild manner left the impression that Pauli's objection was valid.
_	The influence of the television series has given the general public the impression that Mason is highly ethical.
_	Meyer for ignoring much of the fossil record and instead focusing on a later stages to give the impression that all Cambrian life forms appeared abruptly without predecessors.
_	However, policymakers' statements did not accurately convey the intelligence assessments of the nature of these contacts, and left the impression that the contacts led to substantive Iraqi cooperation or support of al-Qa'ida."
_	For a 2006 Christmas special, along with the re-release of the plush headcrab, fans could buy a headcrab hat, specially designed to give the impression that the wearer is under attack from the parasitic alien.
_	That is why the generality of citizens have the impression that the government colludes with businesses."
_	Stop-timing may create the impression that the tempo has changed, though it has not, as the soloist continues without accompaniment.
_	Catholic Church doctrine asserts that harm reduction protocols treat persons as objects not in control of their own actions and gives the impression that certain types of irresponsible behavior have no moral content.
_	These are always shown in the hands of nurses, confirming the impression that they were mainly used in birth rituals, protecting mother and child.
_	In "The Filter Bubble", Pariser warns that a potential downside to filtered searching is that it "closes us off to new ideas, subjects, and important information", and "creates the impression that our narrow self-interest is all that exists".
_	According to McQuigge, the conversation involved McQuigge alerting Thompson to the fact that that community members were falling ill with potentially fatal "E. coli" infections; according to Thompson, "E. coli" was not mentioned in the conversation and he was left with the impression that the illnesses presented no imminent threat to public health.
_	The general Brazilian population was not directly affected, however, it was left with the impression that all Japanese were nationalist fanatics.
_	Overall, Davis was disappointed by the module, as it gave him "the impression that no developments had taken place in the hobby in the last few years", with its "simple plot, lots of encounters and plenty of action, all firmly rooted in the original tradition of the game".
_	This was a strategic move as it gave the British masters the impression that the De Saram family had the backing of a large body of natives.
_	Despite objecting, group members signed, based in part on the impression that there would be no further financial support from Katz unless they did so.
_	Quintana was to give the impression that he was buying his way into the boxing world in order for King to reveal his criminal associations, however the investigation subsequently collapsed after Quintana failed to follow through with several hundred thousand dollars.
_	Yanow commented on the "Improvisation for Unaccompanied Saxophones", describing it as "...a short but effective two-tenor workout that, through a clever arrangement by Cohn, gives one the impression that both saxophonists are using circular breathing."
_	Although his Caucasian looks gave the impression that his family was well-off, they were, in fact, in debt and were forced to move often.
_	Zara is under the impression that they have been kicked out while Aunn's family thinks that it was Zara's idea to move out.
_	Dancers are aware of this customer desire for increased confidence, and a dancer therefore will give off the impression that a customer is seeing her true self, when in reality it is just part of her act.
_	Perception of time is also reported to change: there is a general experience of time distortion where events take longer to occur and the subject is involved in internal fantasies with the impression that external time has slowed down.
_	Hobie later impersonated Spider-Man at the hero's request - Spider-Man wearing a webbing mask - to convince Peter's friends that Parker was not Spider-Man after Peter 'confessed' the truth while suffering delirium due to the flu, thus creating the impression that Peter had merely been confused.
_	Withdrawing all the large vessels of the blockade squadron, Collingwood kept only the 36-gun frigate HMS "Hydra" and the 18-gun sloop HMS "Moselle" in position to create the impression that the principal blockading force had been driven off.
_	(Lobo gives the impression that he accompanied this expedition, but a letter of Manuel de Almeida states otherwise.)
_	The snout was set at an angle relative to the rest of the skull, which gave the impression that the snout pointed downwards.
_	Much like the 1988 film version, "Onegin" gives the impression that, during the duel sequence, Onegin shoots to kill.
_	Wolstencroft wrote the death scene with the intention of giving the audience the impression that no one in the series is safe.
_	Danila fools the security as latecomers, whilst Viktor distracts the other drivers/guards outside, making the impression that his "boss" i.e.
_	Wilbur gets the impression that the thief is a jealous husband.
_	The add-on was titled "Wipeout 2097" because Psygnosis did not want to give the impression that it was a full sequel.
_	The art critic John Ruskin described the latter as, "the finest [example of a Crucifixion painting] in Europe" and noted its particularly interesting perspective which Ruskin said gave the viewer the impression that they were "lying full length on the grass, or rather among the brambles and luxuriant weeds".
_	Meanwhile the public were under the impression that the Chamber of Commerce still wanted to maintain the status of Hamburg as a free port city.
_	It is difficult to ascertain by the setting and the lighting whether it was the artist's intention to create the impression that the scene was taking place outside a building or in an interior.
_	The nature of the work being done by some of those people that we captured, their inferences to the type of training that they received, all of these things give us the impression that there was terrorist training that was conducted at Salman Pak.
_	The Soviets during the Cold War liked to give the impression that all of their intelligence came from "humint" (human intelligence) rather than "sigint" (signals intelligence) as to fool Western nations about the extent that they collected information via sigint.
_	In the fall of 1767 he warned about a possible insurrection in Boston any day, and his exaggerated report of one disturbance in 1768, "certainly had given Lord Hillsboro the impression that troops were the only way to enforce obedience in the town."
_	It aimed to win over Radio 1 listeners who were frustrated by the fact that the BBC station would remain on mediumwave only in the area until May 1990, despite the fact that in the autumn of 1988 it was regularly plugging its new FM transmitters, sometimes giving the impression that it could already be heard on FM throughout the UK.
_	The services were, however, 24 hours a day and overnights were a single programme with the DJ not identifying the service and separate jingles playing to the correct transmitter to give the impression that the listener was still tuned to the service for that frequency.
_	This inaction gave the impression that the French were willing to concede control of Northern Chad to Gaddafi.
_	Toyah confronts Maria, who gives her the impression that John forced himself on her.
_	Mabel leaves Mark, under the impression that Mark has fathered Effie's baby.
_	Nevertheless, most women, in agreeing to marriage, are under the impression that they will be able to find work in Taiwan and send money back to their families in Vietnam.
_	Randewig believed that the Allies' radio operations during the campaign in the west gave the impression that these rules had not been taken seriously.
_	"The country’s transformation from predominantly rural to urban, the expansion of national industries, the emergence of a mixed economy with a high profile, and the expansion of educational institutions all fostered the impression that Mexico had finally emerged from the blight of underdevelopment and was on the road to peace and prosperity".
_	It wasn't a "Police Academy" clone movie, (but) people got the impression that it was.
_	Black Kettle's Cheyennes were not unarmed innocents living under the impression that they were not at war.
_	Although still listed as a "Tropical Storm" by the weather service at the time, many laypeople in New Orleans were under the impression that Cindy was a hurricane, and referred to it as "Hurricane Cindy" before it was officially upgraded.
_	One gets the impression that this little lady is trying hard to look chaste.
_	In addition, the employer must have created the impression that such an expectation was justified.
_	A fictitious technical warning of a problem with the automatic landing system was used to create the impression that the attack was an accident.
_	In various episodes, he gives out the impression that he is a lot smarter than he may first appear.
_	It was this one in particular that gave the impression that beanies would be permanently discontinued at the start of the new millennium .
_	After that, minimal fines were imposed, with Coyne quoted as saying, "...because the worst thing you can do is give the impression that you're socking them for taxation."
_	Samuel Saxton, a retired captain, explained that the American veterans and witnesses may have intentionally kept the rape a secret, largely out of shame: "It would be unfair for the public to get the impression that we were all a bunch of rapists after we worked so hard to serve our country."
_	Based on a letter from Tolstoy, Kenworthy was under the impression that he had exclusive rights over some of Tolstoy's texts.
_	According to Giraldus, nothing that he ever saw was at all comparable to the book, every page of which was gorgeously illuminated, and the interlaced work and the harmony of the colours left the impression that "all this is the work of angelic, and not human skill".
_	In addition, critics also pointed out that the use of the term, often capitalised, "Long Term Economic Value" which was popular in the press around the time of the establishment of NAMA, often as the acronym "LTEV", gave the impression that it was a well-known or accepted term in economics.
_	Lopes told the "New York Daily News", "A lot of people are under the impression that I'm leaving the group.
_	Upon observing "N. spectabilis" on Mount Pangulubao in 1995, botanist Charles Clarke wrote that he "got the impression that collectors had taken a bit of a toll on the population, partly because very few immature plants were visible".
_	The Mafeking Mooch was an affected style of walking performed by some British men during the first decade of the 20th century to give the impression that they had been injured during the celebrated siege and/or relief of Mafeking.
_	Frank Kogan of the "Village Voice" noted that while "Cry" and another song from "Invincible" ("Speechless") are "very pretty", they give the impression that Jackson's "standing sideways, so as to let the beauty slide off him."
_	Bettelheim had the impression that he was in the process of witnessing just such a process of transformation.
_	typically reserved with the ability to become passionate in their interests with the impression that they are literary geniuses.
_	During the tiki culture fad of the 1950s, white women frequently donned the qipao to give the impression that they had visited Hong Kong, although the dresses were frequently made by seamstresses in America using rayon rather than genuine silk.
_	Stöver claimed that the picture was to give the impression that the planned invasion was prevented by building the wall.
_	Palin compared herself to Harry Truman, the vice-president who succeeded Franklin D. Roosevelt, contributing to the impression that for a time the race was between Palin and Obama.
_	In graphic design, a drop shadow is a visual effect consisting of a drawing element which looks like the shadow of an object, giving the impression that the object is raised above the objects behind it.
_	The failure of </nowiki>"Scoops" gave British publishers the impression that Britain could not support a science fiction publication.
_	This auspicious beginning led to the impression that the Bourbons were winning the war, but in reality, the occupation of these strongholds would prove to be not only useless, but also harmful to the invaders, as pointed by historian George P. James:
_	Wente wrote: "One has the impression that the viceroy and his Nubian troops were loyalists, for the remarks made by his opponent Piankh in letter No. 301 are quite disparaging of the pharaoh, Ramesses XI."
_	Godwin's autobiography creates the impression that much of her own writing was intended to accomplish the things her mother could not.
_	Berlin's performance at the song's debut softened the impression that his initial press conference had given, and it settled some of the doubts about his musical talent.
_	In "The Guardian", Mark Lawson began his review by noting that, "Some newspaper coverage ahead of the BBC2 screening of "King Charles III" – a drama imagining a brief and catastrophic reign for the current Prince of Wales – gave the impression that […] the BBC director-general, should be held in the Tower of London awaiting execution for treason", but judged instead that "the summons he seems more likely to get is to next year's Bafta TV awards, where the BBC will surely be honoured for one of its boldest drama commissions".
_	"A dark skinned man, dark-eyed, dark-haired, thin in the flank, vigilant, self-contained, quiet; giving you the impression that he would wake up quick and in strength.
_	Due to this, he ran with a strong template, so that it gave the impression that his legs were shooting out from under him.
_	Eisenhower was under the impression that Goodwood was to be a break out operation.
_	The boat then enters an area where the outside is exposed and the theme park can be seen, the boat moves towards this window and gives the impression that it may not stop and go over the edge.
_	As Director-General (a position he held till 1945), and combined with the presidency of the state's Medical Board (as well as with the medicine professorship at the University of Queensland), he firmly opposed the anti-polio methods of Elizabeth Kenny, although at first he had spoken politely enough of her work to give the impression that he favoured it.
_	Another event of 1933 was Rosenberg's visit to Britain, intended to give the impression that the Nazis would not be a threat and to encourage links between the new regime and the British Empire.
_	Time switches can be used for many purposes, including saving electric energy by consuming it only when required, switching equipment on, off, or both at times required by some process, and home security (for example switching lights in a pattern that gives the impression that premises are attended) to reduce the likelihood of burglary or prowling.
_	Their orders were "to inflict losses on the enemy and to convey the impression that we are about to advance again to Amman".
_	Since it has ever been the custom among the desert people for a man to marry the daughter of his paternal uncle (bint 'ammi), it is hard to avoid the impression that Lehi and Ishmael were related.
_	This smoke, streaming aft under the influence of the wind, and contrasting against the dark, low-lying cloud, may have given the impression that "Chicago" was moving, causing "M-24" to lead the target when firing its torpedoes, and consequently sending its torpedoes across the bow.
_	He also felt that Linson's "fanaticism for the subject he was trying to portray was undoubtedly there, and his sincerity, too", but felt that he was under the impression that the film was a runaway hit before he had even begun filming it and therefore refused to take any chances with the material.
_	Steele gave the impression that his partner left the band in September 2009, however, Littlemore resurfaced in the following month, citing his production work and a project with Cirque du Soleil as the reason for the lack of communication.
_	At the end of September or beginning of October 1655, Walter Rosewell, incumbent of Chatham, went to hear Coppin preach, and gained the impression that he affirmed the peccability of Christ and denied the resurrection of the flesh.
_	He is clearly under the impression that he is telling us something about the nature of man, and particularly civilized man's ability to survive primitive challenges[…]
_	The New York Daily News reported: "Elitcher left trial observers with the impression that his must have been a masterpiece of equivocation and temporizing, since the first pressure was put to him in 1944...
_	In 1424 Henry and Fernando de Castro besieged the Canary Islands, under the impression that they might be of use to further Portuguese expeditions around Africa's coast.
_	Previous work had left the impression that halochromic salts or free radicals (R3C•) required R to be aromatic.
_	Media reports at that time gave many the impression that this character was proposed for the American version of the program; some conservatives vigorously opposed the idea on the grounds that such a character could be "used to teach tolerance and acceptance of homosexuals".
_	Due to the visible steam of their breath, the video gives the impression that the band is in the cold outdoors.
_	A succession of petty Turkmen warlords controlled the area until Uzun Hasan of the Ak Koyunlu took over in 1459, perhaps under the impression that it was part of the dowry of his new Greek wife, the daughter of John IV of Trebizond.
_	On 27 September, the German commander of the Dardanelles fortifications unilaterally ordered the passage to be closed, adding to the impression that the Ottomans were pro-German.
_	If he tries to use my letter to create the impression that Mr. Cruise did have a gay affair, we will certainly sue … because the story is false.
_	The dog leg was introduced to give the impression that a different target was the destination in the hope that the Luftwaffe night fighter controllers would concentrate their forces in the wrong location.
_	This certainly gives the impression that Middle Eastern women have little or no economical role, until one notes that the statistics are based on non-agricultural labor outside the home.
_	He then found work as a waiter serving drinks on a day boat that travelled from Liverpool to North Wales, but his fear of conscription into military service led him to quit the job, not wanting to give the Royal Navy the impression that he was suitable for seafaring work.
_	Teachers can also feel hindered because the school environment is inhospitable to homosexuality; in Burston and Hart’s 2001 study, some even said that they were under the impression that the school would not allow them to teach LGBT sex education.
_	Doulcier has stated that "it gives the impression that you’re standing in a cathedral.
_	It is only with a chronicle written at St Albans in 1307-08 that we find the first positive remarks, and it is hard to avoid the impression that the chronicler was writing to flatter her son, Edward II, who had succeeded his father in 1307.
_	These films leave the impression that Clark Kent is really a "secret" identity that is used to enable Superman to serve humanity better, rather than just a role to help him assimilate into the human community.
_	Ebert had been under the impression that they would be donated to the Smithsonian.
_	She began with the impression that she'd work on cartoons (such as Wallace and Gromit) to appeal to commercial interests for jobs and work.
_	Mistakes and biases in cataloging records can "stigmatize groups of people with inaccurate or demeaning labels, and create the impression that certain points of view are more normal than others".
_	Critics often point out that when summarizing his findings, Gesell gave the impression that all children behave in exactly the same way at each age.
_	In order to give the impression that Troupe Progress was not a closed troupe, all of the children except for Marika, were given stage names.
_	Pacemakers may be used to avoid the tactics of deception that are possible in competition by those who, for example, race away from the start line (and are likely to subsequently slow down), giving the other runners the impression that they are far behind.
_	The Novaya Zemlya effect will give the impression that the sun is rising earlier than it actually should or the sun is setting later than it actually should.
_	It gives the impression that God, the giver of life, is reaching out to Adam who has yet to receive it; they are not on "the same level" as would be two humans shaking hands, for instance.
_	For instance, one criticism is that its literature sometimes deceptively excludes discussions or citations of other important works on urban issues, to give readers the impression that the L.A. school is more radical, original, and important than it actually is.
_	The title is also possible to play on just this, that the wars will continue indefinitely, even though the leaders in every conflict seeks to give the impression that a victory would bring permanent peace to the area or the world as a whole.
_	Prince, upon learning that the album did not have a title track, recorded a song for himself called "Shockadelica" and released it prior to Johnson's album, leaving the impression that Johnson had stolen the name.
_	Self pervades all levels, an ongoing lived relationship with Self—Self-realization—may lead anywhere on the diagram as one's direction unfolds (this is one reason for not illustrating Self at the top of the diagram, a representation that tends to give the impression that Self-realization leads only into the higher unconscious).
_	Instead of being dated "January 1981", the first issue under the new regime was dated "January 5, 1981", but this approach led to newsstands removing the magazine much more quickly, since the date gave the impression that it was a weekly magazine.
_	Lennon had the impression that the song "Too Many People" from Paul McCartney's "Ram" (1970) was a dig at him, something Paul later admitted.
_	Superintendent Arthur Poppy claimed that Delves Broughton had stolen the guns from himself to give the impression that he had no .32 pistol at the time.
_	The earlier laying of a commemorative cairn in 1953, unveiled by two of Bell's granddaughters, had previously led to the impression that the site had then been designated an official historic site —which was not the case as the cairn was meant to commemorate the invention of the telephone.
_	He [Kennedy] had a glamorous family, and conveyed the impression that you could actually do something in politics to improve the lives of citizens.
_	The failure of </nowiki>"Scoops" gave British publishers the impression that Britain could not support a science fiction publication.
_	The perpetrators drove Tay's car to Compton, California to give the impression that Tay had been carjacked.
_	Throughout the filming period, Phoenix remained in character for public appearances, giving many the impression that he was genuinely pursuing a new career as a rapper.
_	His nightly appearance at an anchor desk in London gave the impression that ABC News was more dedicated to foreign news than the other networks.
_	Dropping "Science" and "Scientific" from the titles may have been intended to avoid giving readers the impression that these were actually scientific periodicals.
_	The British propaganda placed in American papers regarding the offer gave the impression that Indian nationalists would turn it down.
_	He was very involved in the gang workings and even had a grenade casing and bomb mould designed which could be placed under a woman's dress, giving the impression that she was pregnant, thereby facilitating the planting of bombs.
_	The MoD has stated that there were no officials present at the meeting but that one of those present claimed to have received the impression that all of those in attendance had been security cleared.
_	Around 7:15 pm the Palestinian militants ceased fire, creating the impression that they had run away.
_	Alex is sick, she has the impression that her intelligence decreased.
_	Spiegelman recalls that Burroughs then recited the opening couplet of the poem, in a manner that gave Spiegelman the impression that Burroughs could have continued the recitation, perhaps even to the final lines.
_	In the initial album credits, Starr is listed as "Richie," as Dayron was under the impression that, being a Beatle, his name could not be used directly.
_	Earlier, under the impression that his father would possibly murder him after being paroled, Mac later receives a warm letter from his father, specifically requesting that Mac stay away from him.
_	At the Closing Ceremony, the Professor, left with the impression that Qwerty was "mysteriously locked in a Trophy Room throughout the games," presents a trophy to the user, since Botley informed him that the user was primarily responsible for the Sparks Team winning over the Galaxy Gladiators.
_	The information revealed caused controversy, particularly as they gave the impression that operations were widely based on "racial profiling" targeting particular ethnic groups.
_	Post gave the film 2 out of 4 stars stating "The film's subtle visual allure is all but stamped out by the impression that the director tries too hard to be an idiosyncratic auteur in the vein of Quentin Tarantino".
_	Instead, he let Delgado get away until the margin was one minute, giving Delgado the impression that he could safely save energy for the next stages, and at the last part of the stage gave it everything he had to reduce the margin.
_	Leon H. Wolf wrote "It is impossible to read "Dirty, Sexy Politics" and come away with the impression that you have read anything other than the completely unedited ramblings of an idiot."
_	The viewer is left with the impression that Lucero is Diablo and he ordered the hit of his own family and Sean (to escape prison).
_	"These unusual objects could not be mere airplanes because two of them were already pretty close to the moon," exclaimed 11-year-old Nica Canarias as she apparently had the impression that the objects were heading to the moon.
_	In November 2014, the American Bar Association issued a Formal Opinion, finding that it was unethical for prosecutors to allow these companies to use prosecutor letterhead, because it was "abusive" to convey "the impression that the machinery of the criminal justice system has been mobilized" against the consumer, who is led to believe that he or she may face jail time unless the collector gets paid.
_	A writer for VH1 said that part of the reason the video works is the comic sensibility between Spears and Marrs Piliero, explaining that "[it] point[s] to one of Spears's greatest talents: giving the impression that although she takes her career extremely seriously, she nevertheless doesn't take it too seriously."
_	This image also gave the impression that black women could not be rape victims because they always desired sex, thereby legitimizing sexual assault of black female slaves by white males.
_	Pietro Giovanni Guzzo, one of Pompeii’s past archaeological superintendents, explained, “I want visitors to have the impression that they are entering the same luxurious house in which the ancient Pompeian owners lived before it was destroyed by the eruption of Mount Vesuvius in AD 79.
_	In accentuating the direct competition between individuals for resources as the primary selection mechanism, Darwin (and especially his followers) created the impression that the environment was simply a static arena".
_	A CPJ spokesperson stated that "the refusal to launch a new investigation into the murder of Alisher Saipov only adds to the impression that the Kyrgyz authorities are concerned less with justice than in closing a diplomatically embarrassing case."
_	The Hebrew Bible gives the impression that the Jerusalem temple was always meant to be the central or even sole temple of Yahweh, but this was not the case: the earliest known Israelite place of worship is a 12th-century open-air altar in the hills of Samaria featuring a bronze bull reminiscent of Canaanite "Bull-El" (El in the form of a bull), and the archaeological remains of further temples have been found at Dan on Israel's northern border and at Arad in the Negev and Beersheba, both in the territory of Judah.
_	"Red Tails" portrays largely fictional events based on the exploits of the Tuskegee airmen, although many viewers were left with the impression that the film was entirely historically accurate.
_	The researcher did not, however, believe this was conclusive evidence of a link to CCD; "We don't want to give anybody the impression that this thing has been solved."
_	The listener gets the impression that he hears a “Gypsy violin” but that is not so.
_	""When they had hardly any provisions left, Gerald, who, as I have said, was a cunning man, created the impression that they were still well supplied and were expecting reinforcement at any moment.
_	"From the frequency of the horse motif in this tradition, one could easily get the impression that horses are as important as their masters.
_	Like its predecessor, "A Taste of Country" featured a recent photo of Lewis, a shrewd move that created the impression that these were recent recordings.
_	Anand is an orphan who was adopted by the family as a child and he has never been given the impression that he was an outsider.
_	It was intentionally leaked to the press that the tanks had been captured in Mozambique, and for several months the T-55s were driven around the country on transporters, giving the impression that Rhodesia possessed a much larger number.
_	It is hard to avoid the impression that the revelations had political purposes in Khrushchev's struggle with Molotov, Malenkov, and Kaganovich."
_	A "Wegekirche" is a church which is designed such that the location of the priest and congregation gives the impression that they are on their way to the Lord, facing the Christ, usually in the symbolic form of a cross or painting.
_	I told General Reardon that I was under the impression that most of these men caught the electric car that stopped at the shaft house so that such a plan would be impracticable.
_	Series directors are fond of long pauses that serve no purpose other than to give the impression that an actor forgot his next line."
_	In 2010, Massachusetts attorney and candidate for Congress Jeff Perry disclosed that he had paid Columbia State University "several thousand dollars," studied for alleged courses, and wrote papers under the impression that it was an accredited institution.
_	The film follows three groups of people, all of whom have found a video camera on their doorstep and begin filming under the impression that this is the key to winning money from a mysterious competition.
_	Germany pressured the Italian Navy to begin the operation, under the impression that they had disabled two of the three battleships assigned to the British Mediterranean Fleet.
_	The words "rua" (2) and "toru" (3) are still discernible in endings of the dual and plural pronouns, giving the impression that the plural was originally a trial (threesome) or paucal (a few), and that an original plural has disappeared.
_	It's too premature to give the public the impression that they have a licence, based on this preliminary research, which is exciting but not yet definitive, to say butter is back."
_	She is under the impression that she is there on his invitation; he says not but nevertheless allows her entry.
_	You do get the impression that it would benefit from embracing its wacky, larger than life side a little more, but it still stands as a refreshing alternative to some of the straighter soccer titles on the App Store."
_	In order not to give the impression that Pat was a thief or murderer (rather than simply a practical joker), Shearsmith was directed to chuckle while Pat set up his jokes.
_	Scargill’s role as chairman ‘undoubtedly gave the impression that the dice were loaded against... the appearance of bias was inevitable.’
_	Chris soon left Libby for Gabrielle under the impression that she was, 'the one'.
_	Whatever the form of the description of the historical solution, the case teacher must take care to avoid giving the impression that the historical solution is the "right answer."
_	That gives the impression that most of the Congo basin was formerly on a much higher land level and that it was rejuvenated by much of its lower course being removed.
_	He continued saying "One has the impression that the reason to attack these minorities is strictly and only their religious faith or their different ethnic membership," the nunciature note continues.
_	Additionally, most passages are printed in the same size type, in order not to lend the impression that some prayers are more important than others.
_	His idea was to give the impression that he knew everything and to let the prisoners confirm his thoughts during casual conversation.
_	The 'Oneness' theme had first been exhibited the previous Christmas for the channel's identity, hence giving the impression that those idents ultimately served as a preview to the new look that made its full launch on New Year's Day 2017.
_	Namely, that "the ignorant populace might beat, harass, rob them under the impression that they were spies from hostile villages."
_	LRT-2 stations have two restrooms, but LRT-1 restrooms have been the subject of criticism not only because of the provisioning of a single washroom at each station expected to serve all passengers (whether male, female, disabled or otherwise), but also because of the impression that the lavatories are poorly maintained and unsanitary.
_	In a collaboration track with Chase & Status titled "Heavy", Dizzee Rascal said, "Grime had a little time without me still no grime without me, No life without me, no risky roads, no grime daily" seemingly seeking to create the impression that Grime had petered out since he left the scene.
_	Entering through the hotel's front doors, guests encounter an interior designed to give the impression that the Hollywood Tower Hotel has been left untouched since the night of its closure.
_	By the autumn of 1559 several foreign princes were vying for the Queen's hand; their impatient envoys came under the impression that Elizabeth was fooling them, "keeping Lord Robert's enemies and the country engaged with words until this wicked deed of killing his wife is consummated."
_	In the weeks leading up to his escape, Chen gave his guards the impression that he was ill in bed, and stopped appearing outside the house, which allowed him several days before any absence would be discovered.
_	When King Boris III of Bulgaria met Hitler, Papen attended the German-Bulgarian summit as a senior adviser on the Balkans to give the impression that the long-standing Bulgarian claims to Thrace were on the agenda, which as planned frightened Turkey.
_	In 1907 a pile of her clothes was found on a beach in Brittany where she was on holiday, giving the impression that she had drowned.
_	However statistics such as that given by the Cooperative Bank (UK), stating that in 2003 they reviewed 225 potentially problematic financial opportunities and of these 20% were found to be in conflict with their ethical statements and were subsequently denied further business, costing the bank 6,887,000 pounds, give the consumer the impression that the banks’ proposed ethics, however ambiguous, are being taken seriously.
_	He thereby gave the impression that Halifax was solely responsible for British policy".
_	Suzanna, under the impression that Paul was speeding due to a patient crisis, does not understand why Paul does not gather witnesses to prove that he was speeding because of an emergency.
_	You will then get the impression that there is no svarga (heaven) and no naraka (hell) and that both heaven and hell are on earth.
_	He argued to Alexander that VI Corps did not have the strength to trap the German 10th Army and Alexander, instead of making his requirements clear, was conciliatory and gave the impression that a push on Rome was still a possibility if "Buffalo" ran into difficulties.
_	Even sixty years later, "The Newgate Calendar" crime periodical still bore testimony to the impression that Elizabeth Brownrigg's crimes had made on Georgian and Victorian England.
_	In "Nadja" (1928), André Breton called Nantes "perhaps with Paris the only city in France where I have the impression that something worthwhile may happen to me".
_	While White also found "the photography pretty as always", he concluded that "the overall effect was curiously patronising, serving to reinforce the impression that the great man was basically on a jolly and going through the motions".
_	Although Tomashek had been prepared to fight as a backup plan, some news reports created the impression that he had just been pulled out of the crowd.
_	Courtois succeeded in creating for viewers the impression that they were actually in the thick of the battle.
_	He was with Guidry, who was under the impression that she was his legal wife, until his heart attack in 1975.
_	Looking back from 2005, "All About Jazz" described the album as "the recording to announce that Joe Pass had arrived", and said that he had "accomplished, using standard guitar performance techniques, to play lead melody lines, chords, and bass rhythm simultaneously and at tempo, giving the listener the impression that multiple guitars were being played".
_	Nehru was furious and wrote to Rajagopalachari saying "the one thing we must avoid giving is the impression that we stick to office and we want to keep others out at all costs."
_	Randazza wrote that an individual would have to be a pathetic idiot to come under the impression that his client's website was directly affiliated with Beck, contending that the website's domain name could not be confused with the "Glenn Beck" trademark except to "a moron in a hurry".
_	Very often, such as with climate change, this leaves the public with the impression that disagreement within the scientific community is much greater than it actually is.
_	As early as 12 August 1835, the 3,882 m east peak was climbed by Oswald Heer, and Peter and M. Flury, with guides Johann Madutz and Gian Marchet Colani (the 'chamois king of the Bernina'), who were under the impression that this was the highest summit of the mountain.
_	Only the defiant person could wish that Job did not exist, that he could completely divest his soul of the last love still present in the wail of despair, that he could whine about life, indeed curse life in such a way that there would not be even an echo of faith and trust and humility in his words, that in his defiance he could stifle the scream in order not to create the impression that there was anyone whom it provoked.
_	He said "It would have been better to limit the number of topics up for discussion" and "We must not give the impression that the synod spent most of its time quarreling about the conditions for admission to the sacraments."
_	Colonel Pedersen promised to cancel his 1962 visit to Svalbard and he would not conduct work which would give the impression that he was working with airport plans.
_	The vigilante group was alerted with the impression that the students were the criminals disturbing the community.
_	UNESCO (the organization responsible for administrating the World Heritage list) has expressed a concern that the use of Carrying capacity can give the impression that a site is better protected than it actually is, it points out that although the whole site may be below carrying capacity part of the site may still be crowded.
_	Employing every ruse to give the Germans the impression that their positions were unchanged, the 1st Airborne Division began its withdrawal at 22:00.
_	On the character development, Newman stated that "the impression that about two hundred pages worth of characterisation has been compressed into cliché details like boozy Ronee Blakley demonstrating her renewed self-respect by throwing away a half-full bottle."
_	At first, Riall was under the impression that the American line was composed of grey-clad militia troops, whom the professional British soldiers held in much contempt.
_	The phrase "Hamnet Players" creates the impression that Harris intended to develop an online repertory company, and that such a company may have crystallized over time.
_	She stated that no dogs in her kennel were affected and seemed under the impression that early research focused only on affected dogs.
_	In "The Observer", Philip French observed, "Considine is outrageously funny and never steps out of character, but the film hardly adds up to an evening's entertainment," while Anthony Quinn of "The Independent" noted, "Throughout you get the impression that Meadows and his cast are having a lot of fun, which is unfortunately not the same thing as being funny.
_	Normally it is the EU that is assessing the state of affairs, which leads to the impression that the North is dictating the South what to do.
_	A more serious issue was the impression that Dreyfus' critique was incorrigibly hostile.
_	The schools were originally called the Canterbury Middle Schools, but in order to dispel the impression that the schools were socially exclusive (the pair were often collectively known as the "middle class school"), they were renamed in 1887 after Simon Langton, Archdeacon of Canterbury (previously the Archbishop of York, for a short period in 1215), who, after his death in 1248, had left behind endowments to the Poor Priest's Hospital (which were later bequeathed to the Simon Langton schools).
_	It is generally thought, although the evidence is not conclusive, that McNaughton was under the impression that he had shot Prime Minister Robert Peel.
_	Under the impression that Paolo is her destined bridegroom, Francesca falls deeply in love with him at first sight; he also falls passionately in love with her, although they do not exchange a single word.
_	On Australia Day, they were taken to a beach at Farm Cove, where they were told to run up the beach, to convey the impression that they were fleeing in fear from the British.
_	Even if one accepted the "Buckley" Court's reasoning, Stevens said, the two goals of reducing the influence of wealth as a criterion for office and reducing the impression that public office is available only to the highest bidder are important governmental interests which meet the majority's test.
_	Snider did not want people to get the impression that he was endorsing Trump or his campaign.
_	This often occurs because changes in structure are relatively easy to execute while creating the impression that something substantial is happening.
_	The EZLN was under the impression that further discussions with the Federal Government would eventually lead to more provisions that would be essential in addressing more issues that the indigenous population faced.
_	I get the impression that most people who are not history buffs will now want to read something about Lincoln."
_	The third edition of Fowler's "Modern English Usage", published by the Oxford University Press in 1996, noted that the form "espresso" "has entirely driven out the variant "expresso" (which was presumably invented under the impression that it meant 'fast, express')."
_	Blücher, because of poor intelligence sources, was operating under the impression that the French had 90,000 troops and was generally reluctant to have his troops launch any attacks.
_	The committee were left with the impression that the choice of therapeutic regime was based on the general whim of the naturopath and, since the suggested applications in the various textbooks and dispensations overlapped to an enormous extent, no specific indications were or could be taught.
_	The book series is about a siamese cat who is under the impression that he is a chihuahua.
_	He notes complaints about the authenticity of Islamic banking from strict Muslims (Taqi Usmani has argued that the industry has "totally" neglected the "basic philosophy", undermining its own "raison d'être"; so that non-Muslims and the Muslim "masses" have now gotten the impression that Islamic banking is "nothing but a matter of twisting documents ...")
_	Built at the top of a large cliff, the hotel looks out over the sea and gives the impression that a cruise ship has run aground.
_	A television documentary aired on 26 October 2008 on Canvas (public broadcasting) leaves viewers with the impression that BAM was imperturbably favouring its preferred route, and in the process ignoring any and all alternatives - all the while stating that it was involving itself in a broad societal debate.
_	The heralds proposing these offers went into the fortress at night time and the garrison commanders gave them a splendid dinner, so that they would get the impression that the enemy was well prepared for a lengthy siege.
_	On 7 November 2012, a segment was broadcast giving the impression that Asian people were taking over a shopping centre in Castle Hill, New South Wales.
_	Despite giving off the impression that he does not need anyone, Drew desperately wants love and acceptance.
_	Liquid nitrogen was poured onto the car for scenes after it had travelled through time to give the impression that it was cold.
_	(Some of the poles were intentionally placed at an angle and this gives the impression that the building is failing).
_	This was done to give the impression that the Talosians had focused their efforts on mental development to the detriment of their physical strength and size, and also to give that much more of an alien feel to the Talosians.
_	However, in 1895, Engels was deeply distressed when he discovered that his introduction to a new edition of "The Class Struggles in France", written by Marx in 1850, had been edited by Bernstein and Kautsky in a manner which left the impression that he had become a proponent of a peaceful road to socialism.
_	Neither the Class 21 nor the aborted Class 22 design was repeated in either its original or modified form, leaving the impression that they represented advanced thinking which appears to have been considered as too far and too fast by Watson's successors.
_	They enlist the reluctant Pratt to their cause, and show him how their scientific expertise and outlandish inventions (frequently based on ideas from Pratt's books) can bolster the impression that Pratt really is Nicodemus Legend.
_	Sahota stated that he was under the impression that Lohan chose to participate in the documentary "as a result of working in an adult world since she was ten, she feels childhood is precious, and when you lose one you can never replace those years".
_	Radar observations from Earth had given the impression that the area was covered in large boulders that would make it impossible to traverse with the Rover.
_	The government contended that Bronston intentionally answered the second of the series of questions by referring to the company's account in Zurich instead of his own personal one, as the questioner had implied, to leave the impression that he did not have and never had had an account in Switzerland, which was not true.
_	I really get the impression that Japanese culture is appreciated, so I hope that this kind of event will continue in the future.
_	Under the impression that the situation had "cooled down", the Bavarian Administrative Court permitted the gatherings again in 2001.
_	Meeks also expressed hope that fans wouldn't get the impression that "Enemy" stylistically represents the entire album.
_	The man had been under the impression that his parents were going to give him their house.
_	Jack Matlock, American ambassador to the Soviet Union during its final years, said that the West gave a "clear commitment" not to expand, and declassified documents indicate that Soviet negotiators were given the impression that NATO membership was off the table for countries such as Czechoslovakia, Hungary, or Poland.
_	The second, for Charibert, celebrates his rule, and gives the impression that this Frankish king is descended from and succeeded the Roman kings in an unbroken line.
_	They search the hotel for Chester but he is nowhere to be found, giving Stan, Ollie and Susan the impression that he was only using them to get the money for himself.
_	He never acknowledged others or corrected the impression that he wasn't the first in diving or underwater photography."
_	Although not far from the truth, this was not the impression that Japan wished to convey to the Western public.
_	It conveyed the impression that his happiness with the mundane routine of smoking Woodbine cigarettes, eating Paris buns and drinking lemonade was made possible by the promise that at the end of the day he could enter the world of books and records..."
_	Thus, a European in Australia who had become immune to the venom of the deadly Australian tiger snake ("Notechis scutatus"), manipulating these snakes with impunity, and was under the impression that his immunity extended also to other species, when bitten by a lowland copperhead ("Austrelaps superbus"), an allied elapine, died the following day.
_	It was alleged that he was tortured and beaten until he lost consciousness, followed by an injection that killed him, and that Mühsam's body was taken to a latrine in the rear of the building and hung on a rafter so as to create the impression that Mühsam had committed suicide.
_	He made himself amenable to her influence by telephoning her frequently, and also ask her personal secretary's advise on simple matters, conveying the impression that Prime Minister's views might be heard concerning an ongoing court-case.
_	U.S. 36th Division was sent on amphibious assault training and road signposts and dummy radio signal traffic were created to give the impression that a seaborne landing was being planned for north of Rome.
_	The reviewer said that the film "does a good job of placing the Eugenics movement into a larger historical context" but that "one gets the impression that the point [of the film] isn't so much about saving black people, but furthering a political agenda" against abortion, using emotional manipulation to do so.
_	This was to give the impression that Roo was pregnant, and as her pregnancy progressed more lentils were added to the bag to maintain continuity.
_	Shearman felt the episode was so similar to "The X-Files" that it gave the impression that "Millennium" had "lost its own identity".
_	His torn-open stomach was meant to give the impression that he could directly interact with his organs at will.
_	A celebrated fact was that Feola would sometimes take naps during training sessions and close his eyes during matches, giving the impression that he was asleep.
_	The Quarterly Meeting minutes of the Calvert Street Circuit do not give the impression that local Societies were even represented.
_	Ben Dutka of PSXExtreme found the music to be disconcerting citing that the atmosphere gave the impression that it was mocking the game.
_	[His imposing] rage [gives the impression that] he would spit [water] at people.
_	The three detectives took cover, Doyle pointing his pistol while Donnellan and Brennan pointed cupped hands to give the impression that they were also armed.
_	One example of his early magazine pieces, "Adding Fuel to the Fire", was an installation assembled from an old truck and several cars surrounded and subsumed by about 100 tons of magazines, individually arranged to create the impression that the vehicles were being caught in an explosion of flames and billowing smoke.
_	Olson the impression that he can be a good friend to her, he then comes on to her.
_	The video starts and ends with the impression that a television is being switched on and off.
_	In August 1883, during a series of discussions in Paris with the French foreign minister Paul-Armand Challemel-Lacour, Zeng used the good offices of the American chargé d'affaires E. J. Brulatour to convey Chinese proposals to the French, in an attempt to give the impression that the United States was more closely associated with China's diplomatic position on Tonkin than it really was.
_	"The Wall Street Journal" criticized Kennedy's approach, objecting to his harsh language that gave the impression that "90 percent of the American people are engaged in a bitter and unremitting oppression of the other 10 percent."
_	His private polls had given his fellow Republican Congress the impression that pushing the Lewinsky scandal would damage Clinton's popularity and result in the party winning a net total of six to thirty seats in the US House of Representatives in this election.
_	A number of former NWA World Champions often remarked that their primary goal was to make the top stars of each territory "look good" and give crowds the impression that those "local heroes" had the potential of being the champion by almost winning the title.
_	This statement alone would give fans the impression that his intent was to give all kaiju a distinct personality instead of just being a monster-on-the-loose.
_	The use of nudity in advertising tends to be carefully controlled to avoid the impression that a company whose product is being advertised is indecent or unrefined.
_	Waheed out of prison with Waheed being under the impression that it is a hostage exchange.
_	The transfer was kept secret to avoid the impression that the United States was arming Israel for an attack on Iran.
_	Shaw set three main criteria for the new alphabet: it should be (1) at least 40 letters; (2) as "phonetic" as possible (that is, letters should have a to phonemes); and (3) distinct from the Latin alphabet to avoid the impression that the new spellings were simply "misspellings".
_	Semigraphical characters are also characters in a font that are intended to give the impression that a system can support high resolution graphics, while in fact the system operates in text mode.
_	The Germans made a genuine effort, often to their own disadvantage, to leave the Albanian people the impression that they possessed at least some level of autonomy.
_	In order to give the impression that the coffins were next to "The Parlour", with the characters apparently going next door to visit the coffins, a real door was fixed to a blank wall in the downstairs room.
_	Because of the way Jo is introduced—threatening Dean with a rifle—Tal was under the impression that the character was an experienced hunter.
_	"Like kindred spirits System of a Down, Kittie want to give you the impression that they're just too tasty to fuk wit, too unhinged to view as normal folk, too pierced for the mainstream."
_	The public is often under the impression that all archaeology takes place in a distant and foreign land, only to collect monetarily or spiritually priceless artifacts.
_	Some obsolete names for the species are muriacite and karstenite; the former, an earlier name, being given under the impression that the substance was a chloride (muriate).
_	In August 1793 Joseph Priestley was under the impression that both Cooper and Walker would leave for America; in the event, Cooper went but Walker stayed in Manchester.
_	"If visitors have the impression that there was not a great difference between the suffering of Jews and those of homosexuals – exclusively German – it's a scandal."
_	This story arc is unusual in that disembodied thought balloons give the impression that Cerebus is speaking directly to the reader at times.
_	The two men, like most Europeans at the time, were under the impression that snow and ice could not exist so close to the equator, and failed to realize the significance of the mountain being 'topped with silver'.
_	For the scenes filmed at the various comedy venues, Apatow made Holmes perform material from his early stand-up career "four or five times" to the crowd of extras so they would get used to hearing it, thus giving off the impression that Pete is bombing on stage.
_	Such a comedy might leave the impression that the characters are either too foolish or corrupt to ever reform, hence Mrs. Hardcastle.
_	The District Court of Cologne forbade the magazine to create the impression that Wulff allegedly had a relationship with a music manager.
_	Some phoneticians argue that what happens here, in some cases at least, is that the highest part or 'peak' of the tone moves forward, giving the impression that the tone covers two syllables, a process called 'peak delay'.
_	Kenneth Turan of the "Los Angeles Times" stated: "Though the film's advertising gives the impression that McAdams is one among equals, the reality is that this is her show.
_	The poems which comprise this final work give the impression that the writer has at last found the tranquility he had for so long sought:
_	This initial appearance of Nanny gives the heroes the impression that she and the Orphan-Maker are robots.
_	Lilly and Arthur are offended, having been under the impression that Alice didn't have sex with Chris until they were wed.
_	You get the impression that their next album may have to be a bit more adventurous if they're to survive."
_	A review in "The New York Times" wrote that Talese "conveys the impression that being a mobster is much the same as being a sportsman, film star or any other kind of public 'personality.'"
_	Bharathi's mother, a past freedom fighter who is on her deathbed, is relieved to see her, and is under the impression that she is free now.
_	In an "emotional" episode Kirk finds her pregnancy test with Julie under the impression that she was pregnant.
_	Probably the drummer and the many lances and hats in the background were included to create the impression that the whole guard was present in the painting.
_	Raised from childhood by the machine, he is under the impression that a war is still going on in the world around him.
_	"A man may shoot at a striped stone, he says, under the impression that it is a tiger, or at a ripple on the water, under the impression that it is a crocodile.
_	The ideal courtier, however, should not give the impression that music is his main occupation in life.
_	A paper from the Center for Inquiry said that "Dissent From Darwinism" is one of the Discovery Institute intelligent design campaigns to discredit evolution and bolster claims that intelligent design is scientifically valid by creating the impression that evolution lacks broad scientific support.
_	He has said that "the impression that Africa is fatally troubled and can be saved only by outside help—not to mention celebrities and charity concerts—is a destructive and misleading conceit".
_	Over the course of several months Aitken attacked facilities in Portsmouth and Bristol, creating the impression that a band of saboteurs was on the loose in England.
_	From the multiple and delayed echos, the men got the impression that a substantial cave must extend beyond the entrance and decided to return for an exploration.
_	Duplex residences in the community were restricted to designated areas and were required to follow guidelines designed to give the impression that a structure was a single-family home.
_	This reinforced the impression that Catholicism was a foreign element, while the Armada's failure, largely due to unfavorable weather, convinced many Englishmen that God was supportive of Protestantism.
_	Eric Reece and the Hydro-Electric Commission's disinterest in complaints as to their manner of dealing with opposition to their plans gave the impression that they ran Tasmania without any checks.
_	Poor man’s Stockmann in his blog and gives the impression that the wrecking yard business in the area emerged more or less spontaneously, outside of urban planning, and possibly without any kinds of permits applied.
_	The plane, according to Speer, was merely circling over Germany containing an increasingly disconcerted Hanfstaengl, with false location reports being given to convey the impression that the plane was drawing ever closer to Spain.
_	Journalistic misuse of the term "stampede", says Edwin Galea of the University of Greenwich, is the result of "pure ignorance and laziness ... it gives the impression that it was a mindless crowd only caring about themselves, and they were prepared to crush people."
_	While she was under the impression that certain documentation had to be obtained, the second respondent's officials got hold of the docket and obtained a search warrant.
_	This conveys the impression that the Hittite kings were commensurate in importance and power with the Egyptian pharaohs.
_	Jeffrey H. Tigay suggests that Lugalbanda's association with the sun-god in the Old Babylonian version of the epic strengthened "the impression that at one point in the history of the tradition the sun-god was also invoked as an ancestor".
_	Skanderbeg then sent Gjergj(George) Pjetri to Rome as an ambassador to give the Pope the impression that Albania had been decisively conquered and that aid was necessary to force the Ottomans out of Albania.
_	Such an artistic technique gives the impression that the icon was dressed in a robe that resembles a delicate lace.
_	Background noise was added to the soundtrack to give the impression that the ship was busy with a full crew on board.
_	Genuine radio messages from 21st Army Group were first routed to Kent via landline and then broadcast, to give the Germans the impression that most of the Allied troops were stationed there.
_	German documents of the period give the impression that Ukrainian ultranationalists were indifferent to the plight of the Jews; they would either kill them or help them, whichever was more appropriate for their political goals.
_	Pole, who was under the impression that Nin had divorced her first husband Hugh Parker Guiler, asked Nin to accompany him to the West Coast.
_	In the second Democratic debate of the 2008 presidential race, Clinton said that she voted for the resolution under the impression that Bush would allow more time for UN inspectors to find proof of weapons of mass destruction before proceeding.
_	For him, the "funniest aspect of the episode" was the radio scene, in which "we get the impression that [radio jockeys] are immature, simple-minded idiots."
_	Taking advantage of a slight elevation of land which concealed his men but allowed their flags to be seen, Clark maneuvered his troops to create the impression that 1,000 men were approaching.
_	To give the impression that the convoy consisted of the powerful ships of the line that the Indiamen resembled, Farquharson ordered his ships to advance in line of battle.
_	The city sprawls into the hillsides and connects via bridge to a small neighboring town named Sidi Slimane, giving the impression that it is much larger than the census claims.
_	However, the Counter Guy (Peter Allas) turns and, under the impression that George is stealing money from the jar, refuses to sell him any more calzones and threatens him.
_	Zong Hua as she always has the impression that the death of their mother was caused by the excessive fights between Zong Hua and his step-father.
_	He's divorced, and at first Tikhon is under the impression that Anna is the new great love in his life.
_	Bowie himself was quoted in a 1998 interview as saying "I really did object to the impression that I did not write the songs on "The Man Who Sold the World".
_	This was later proved to be wrong, but, with Arimondi's mistaken estimation of Menelik forces, ingenerated in the brigadiers the impression that Baratieri was moving away from an easy victory.
_	Abumrad issued an apology for giving the impression that they "essentially condoned some pretty despicable ideology and behavior," while WNYC stated that they supported "Radiolab"'s decision to remove the podcast, adding that "Radiolab unambiguously rejects the beliefs and actions of the trolls, and deeply regrets doing anything that would imply differently."
_	Scientists and educators feared that by singling out biological evolution as very controversial, the amendment could create the impression that a substantial scientific controversy about evolution exists, leading to a lessening of academic rigor in science curricula.
_	According to Thomas Guarino, "one has the impression that it was written for undergraduates who have little or no idea of what was once the common world and parlance of Catholic culture."
_	The decks of the hellburners were piled with wood and small charges with slow fuses, which gave the impression that they were conventional fireships, causing the Spanish troops to try to extinguish the fire.
_	According to Silver, "I was doodlin' around on the piano, and it just came to me, but I also had the impression that there was an angel standing over me, impressing my mind with this beautiful melody and harmony."
_	Yellow was picked so as not to give the impression that something new was seriously wrong—they only wanted to express concern that they had not heard anything in a couple of hours.
_	He told Treves that he was an only child, and Treves had the impression that Merrick's mother, whose picture Merrick always carried with him, had abandoned him as a baby.
_	Although Kane initially rebutted Finger's claims at having created the character, writing in a 1965 open letter to fans that "it seemed to me that Bill Finger has given out the impression that he and not myself created the <nowiki>"</nowiki>Batman, t' as well as Robin and all the other leading villains and characters.
_	It is generally thought, although the evidence is not conclusive, that M'Naghten was under the impression that he had shot Prime Minister Robert Peel.
_	However, calling it a developer's dream kinda gives you the impression that it's easy to crank out a game like "Turok", and it's definitely not."
_	Abby makes a wish for her parents to understand her; her parents do understand her, but under the impression that she is an adult.
_	Dutch magazine "Vinyl" also expressed reservations, observing that early Section 25 "always had something paper-thin about it - a sound, or rather an absence of sound, giving the impression that the slightest breeze would blow it away."
_	In April 1683 some Scottish contacts of the Whigs arrived in London, as briefed by Smith, meeting Essex and Russell of the Monmouth cabal; they were either under the impression that the matter concerned Carolina, or gave this out as a pretext for their presence.
_	Many are under the impression that Lupe Tijerina and Rosendo Cantu are the only original band members still performing, but the truth is that Rosendo was not an original band member.
_	It should be of "powerful physique giving the impression that he is not built for speed but rather for hard work."
_	However, he was eventually persuaded to admit that, contrary to his true intention, a reader of his "Dialogue" could well have obtained the impression that it was intended to be a defence of Copernicanism.
_	Southwell concluded: "I accept as correct the submissions of Mr Tovey [for the complainant] that the complainant, when giving evidence of molesting, gave the impression that he was speaking honestly from an actual recollection.
_	However, the respondent, also, gave me the impression that he was speaking the truth.
_	Mirza Muhammad Hussain Dughlat was under the impression that he was about to be besieged by the Uzbeks so he prepared the fort.
_	At the base and frightened of being discovered he's a runaway, Tommy meets Steve Moore, the daughter of a Chief Petty Officer and gives her the impression that Mike is his father, especially after Steve saw Tommy see Mike off.
_	By the end of August 1444, the Karamanids were subdued, leaving Murad with the impression that his borders were secure.
_	It is explained that such an exchange would be considered as unequal and as giving the impression that one Biblical book is holier than another.
_	In German ID cards and passports, however, such names are spelled in two different ways: the correct way in the non-machine-readable zone of the document [Müller] and transcribed [Mueller] in the machine-readable zone of the document, so persons unfamiliar with German orthography may get the impression that the document is a forgery.
_	The music video frequently shows the girls interacting with the camera and with arms that sometimes extend from either side of the screen to give the impression that the girls are interacting with the viewer personally.
_	Alicia, now under the impression that Will does not have a plan, suppresses her feelings for Will, and the workplace environment becomes awkward when they are in vicinity of each other.
_	Bosanquet persuaded teammates to remain silent as he wished to maintain the impression that his off break was an accident so that batsmen were not expecting it.
_	In this case the material is fastened in such a way that gives the impression that it continues in the reverse side of the textile, although it doesn’t penetrate the fabric.
_	When they return in triumph, Desmonde discovers that Mignonette has quit after finding out that he lied about the house, and because she is under the impression that he has been sneaking into her bedroom and stealing kisses when she is asleep.
_	Indeed, his playing style often gave the impression that he was too relaxed, and with the Blackpool struggling in the Third Division, he was often made a scapegoat by supporters.
_	To preserve the impression that Soviet pilots were not fighting in Korea, they were prohibited from flying over non-Communist-controlled territory or within to of the Allied front lines.
_	Glover said the "rush hides not the enormity but the thinness of the measure; opposition outrage enhancing the impression that something big must be under way" and the Act "concedes no new powers of any importance".
_	Ships nearby were showered with débris and concussion led the captain of "Nathaniel Greene" to order abandon ship, under the impression that it had been torpedoed, until he realised his mistake; two injured gunners were taken off by a destroyer.
_	This reinforced the impression that inlet would benefit a select group while costing uninterested taxpayers money.
_	These lands were granted under the impression that they lay south of the agreed boundary line.
_	Arthur discovers this and teleports to Africa, killing Usutu and wiping Hiro's mind, leaving him under the impression that he is only ten years old.
_	A common theme in signature programs is to make the code so obfuscated that the outcome and purpose of the program is not apparent, at least to start with, or that the programs are masked to give the impression that the program performs one function when it actually does something completely different, sometimes with alarming or embarrassing outcomes.
_	Bennett's character "Irwin" gives the impression that "an entire career can be built on the trick of contrariness."
_	It was designed to give the French the impression that King Wilhelm I had insulted the French Count Benedetti, and to give the Prussian people the impression that the Count had insulted the King.
_	The A.V. Club panned the convention overall, commenting that it was poorly thought out and that the merchandise area gave "the impression that Twicon exists solely to get impressionable fans to pay for crap".
_	The extensive list she comprises creates an overwhelming effect that gives the reader the impression that Mena was a very prolific writer.
_	Turenne deployed a particularly large force on his right flank, giving the impression that the whole French army was arriving.
_	Even if the impression that there has been an agreement is not achieved, the impression that the misinterpretation was the correct interpretation is still powerful, as any attempt to explain the errors of the misinterpretation can be portrayed as being a retraction of the proposal, thereby allowing the responding party to call into question the sincerity of the proposing party.
_	Experts point to potential legal liabilities (depending on the jurisdiction) that the shooter may incur if using handloaded ammunition for defense, such as an implied malice on the part of the shooter, as the use of handloaded ammunition may give the impression that "regular bullets weren't deadly enough".
_	This creates the impression that the tool has sliced out a piece of the original image for selective transforms and edits.
_	"Boston Herald" writer Amy Amatangelo gained the impression that Day should have gone on further in the competition, after seeing his group medley performance in the season one finale.
_	The lead character, George Malley (John Travolta) develops the tumor, but at first it gives him genius-level intelligence and special powers, and this and other symptoms create the impression that he has been influenced by extraterrestrials, until the tumor is discovered by tests.
_	The new term gave the impression that "Spanish Americans" belonged to a true American political culture, making the established order appear all the more democratic.
_	Some researchers see the multiple-experiments requirement as an excessive burden that delays the publication of valuable work, but this requirement also helps maintain the impression that research that is published in JPSP has been thoroughly vetted and is less likely to be the result of a type I error or an unexplored confound.
_	Neve Gordon, surveying the opinions of several analysts in the Israeli press, cites, among others, Maariv's Ofer Shelah for the view that statements by the Minister of Defense, Ehud Barak gave the impression that Qaisi's assassination was not directly preemptive, since Barak explicitly said that what al-Qaisi was planning, and where the attack was to be launched, and whether an imminent attack had been foiled, was not clear, and that the attack was more about deterrence.
_	On the other hand, in the case of a massive ship flying through space the impression that it is a miniature model is probably not what the film makers intended!
_	MacLean testified that in his discussions with George Orsborne, he had formed the impression that the captain was part-owner of the vessel.
_	The resolution highlighted the fact that HSUS' promotional materials give the impression that animals are the main focus, even though only one percent of the money raised goes to pet shelters (and HSUS runs none itself).
_	'He gave the impression that his own undoubted capacity for imaginative running of his own show melted way when an august superior was breathing down his neck.
_	"Foreign Correspondent" replied to World Vision concerning child sponsorship showing contradictions between the organization's literature that creates the impression that donated money goes directly to the sponsor child and evidence of cases where supposedly sponsored children received little if any benefit.
_	Those consist of two large bowls, 30 - 50 cm in diameter, and a chalice - a bowl set on a high, fenestrated, base (creating the impression that the bowl is standing on several legs that are connected at the bottom).
_	This adds to the optical height of the dome and creates the impression that its drum is weightless.
_	The scene gives the impression that McNeill (who had been seeing things and hearing voices, just as all infected do) has transformed into the Necromorph and is attacking Lexine.
_	Although this was a lucrative deal for Christensen, it also gave people the impression that he made soft music.
_	Regardless of the impression that might be given by road maps, the road should not be considered to be a through road unless you are in a 4WD or have a lot of time.
_	The Fulton County Stadium crowd would commonly chant "BRUUUCE" whenever Benedict came up to bat at home, perhaps giving the impression that he was being booed.
_	By virtue of the gates to the Squares not being closed at any time and the lack of metal enclosures on others, there is the impression that these Squares and places are also open to the public at all hours.
_	At night, light is shone through the glass panels and is projected onto the MSPs' desks to create the impression that the chamber is never unoccupied.
_	Lim expressed "grave concerns" about the bill, saying that the bill will give the public the impression that the government is "using legal costs as a deterrent or prohibitive factor when it comes to litigation with the government".
_	While under the impression that husbands and male doctors were acting with their best interests in mind, women were depicted as mentally weak and fragile.
_	In reality, only a small percentage of those people have any interest in a person’s activities, and a maturing worldview will usually reduce the impression that this imaginary audience exists.
_	The effect of the open eyes and mouth has been described by the art critic Michel Onfray as giving the impression that "the viewer sees Christ seeing: he might also perceive what death has in store, because he's staring at the heavens, while his soul is probably there already.
_	The art critic Marion Spielmann described it as giving the impression that Shakespeare was pressing the cushion to his groin, "which, for no reason, except perhaps abdominal pains, is hugged against what dancing-masters euphemistically term the 'lower chest'".
_	Thus the impression that would be gathered from an exponential curve’s fade would sound as though the sound was rapidly accelerating towards the listener.
_	When encountered by the police, they manage to give the impression that they are a young family and are allowed to leave the building.
_	In contrast to Lazarus taxa, a living fossil in most senses is a species or lineage that has undergone exceptionally little change throughout a long fossil record, giving the impression that the extant taxon had remained identical through the entire fossil and modern period.
_	This work has been criticized since it gives the impression that African American soldiers liberated Buchenwald and Dachau, which is not historically accurate.
_	He gave the impression that he was under severe strain and was asking for help and advice.
_	Wide use of the term nanotechnology in recent years has created the impression that regulatory frameworks are suddenly having to contend with entirely new challenges that they are unequipped to deal with.
_	This gives the album a continuous flow, and gives the impression that it all came from one person's "mind".
_	The Green Line was then redrawn in blue ink on the southern map to give the impression that a movement in the Green line had been made.
_	The Novaya Zemlya effect will give the impression that the sun is rising earlier or setting later than it actually should (astronomically speaking).
_	McGee alters the crime scene to create the impression that Waxwell killed both Vivian and her husband, then phones in an anonymous report to the police.
_	"Butler's... indiscretions... gave the impression that he was not playing the game.
_	In "Pnin" Nabokov wrote satirically, "Literary departments still labored under the impression that Stendhal, Galsworthy, Dreiser, and Mann were great writers."
_	They also added minigames because they feared that Kirby's expanded set of moves would give players the impression that "Kirby's Adventure" was a difficult game.
_	The negotiations nearly broke down on this issue on the very first day, and so Peurifoy, who had remained in Guatemala City to give the impression that the US was not heavily involved, traveled to San Salvador.
_	Some indicators bolster the impression that Blake's illustrations in their totality would take issue with the text they accompany:
_	The highlight of Sum 41's discography is going to come when they fully embrace their metal influences and make a straight-up metal album, and sadly Chuck misses the mark", but also added "If you are still under the impression that Sum 41 is a joke band or a Beastie Boys-wannabe, give some of these songs a try, and you may be pleasantly surprised."
_	Though the jury heard the whole tape, during the closing arguments, the prosecutor did not play the portion of the audiotape where Skakel said "jerking off", giving the impression that he was confessing to the murder.
_	They rush to the studio, with Howard breaking the door to the recording booth, under the impression that the DJ has a Turbo-Man doll in the studio.
_	Rocko fails to retrieve the letter and gets the impression that the mail-lady would rather go out with Heffer.
_	The reader is left with the impression that the author lived a very interesting and varied life but not a happy one.
_	Most Koreans still believe that their population is of a single racial bloodline, and Korean media sometimes create the impression that foreigners are dangerous, including requiring HIV/AIDS tests for non-ethnic Korean foreigners who work in South Korea.
_	Vera is bemused by her pay rise because she is under the impression that she has never met Miller.
_	The total length over the buffers was , giving the impression that they could only just fit onto the turntable.
_	Many of these questions were "softball" questions (i.e., "Are you happy with FEMA's response so far?"), intentionally asked in a way that would evoke a positive response giving the impression that FEMA was doing everything right.
_	He left with the impression that Kaiser-Frazer had been excluding him, especially as Joseph Frazer's influence in the company had waned.
_	Kauffman would say later he used his middle name for the company to avoid the impression that it was a one-person operation.
_	Payne was under the impression that he was a Barbadian citizen, not knowing that he was born in Trinidad to Barbadian parents.
_	Reportedly, Coolio's label gave Yankovic the impression that Coolio had granted permission to record the parody, but Coolio maintains that he never did.
_	Cases such as the shooting of an 18-year-old man in July, 2009 Man shot in Västra Frölunda, recent stone throwings and burning of cars Oroligheter i natt - stenattack i Tynnered have given the impression that the area is dangerous and lawless.
_	Consequently, a large proportion of the vibratory energy is transmitted to the thoracic area, giving singers the impression that their voice is resonating in the chest.
_	The complex, like most of her buildings, gives the impression that every part of them is in motion.
_	Ludlow encountered frequent snide comments about the disintegration of the Union, with some Mormons under the impression that with the flood of immigrants to Utah fleeing the draft, and with the decimation of the male population in war time making polygamy seem more practical, the Mormon state would come out of the war stronger than either side.
_	This is designed to give the impression that product X is better than products A, B, and C in all respects, but doesn't actually make that claim.
_	Jeremy Corbyn is portrayed as a politician keen on giving the impression that he's a man who understands the plight of "the worker" whilst reveling in his newfound celebrity.
_	Gnade's first sergeant later said: "I must say that First Lieutenant Gnade gave me the impression that the entire business afforded him a great deal of pleasure."
_	You get the impression that Sly Dunbar is chained to a studio seat somewhere in Jamaica, but in fact what happens is that his drum tracks are so interesting, they get used again and again."
_	The first floor office where Harry Cross conducted his business gives the impression that he stepped out for a moment.
_	At Goodwood she finished third to Ahonoora and Abdu in the King George Stakes, giving the impression that he found the five furlong trip inadequate.
_	One had the impression that Kachalov was not merely speaking but thinking aloud, and that the words one heard were only a part of what he was seeing with his inner eye.
_	Moreover, Robespierre's increasingly extensive absences from the Committee due to illness (he all but ceased to attend meetings in June 1794) created the impression that he was isolated and out of touch.
_	Some batters are under the impression that they have seen a "rising" fastball, which starts with the trajectory of a normal fastball, but which as it approaches the plate rises several inches and gains a burst of speed.
_	In order to make it "blend into" the landscape, the square was not remodeled to be aligned with it in a general parallel plan, but the left-hand side of the facade was left partly hidden behind an older and smaller building, which was expected to give the impression that the opera house had been part of the area for a very long time.
_	Moore had not been playing badly, nor had he given the impression that he had been distracted by his contract dispute prior to the competition.
_	The ambient-influenced beginning gives the impression that "Nothing Really Matters" would be a ballad, but in the minute mark, it changes to a mid-tempo dance-pop song.
_	Hoxha said that "the cult of Mao was raised to the skies in a sickening and artificial manner" and further added that, in reading of its purported objectives, "you have the impression that everything old in Chinese and world culture should be rejected without discrimination and a new culture, the culture they call proletarian, should be created."
_	Prof. Sir Patrick Bateson who headed the Independent Inquiry into Dog Breeding stated, "One has the impression that some of the breeders simply have their heads stuck in the sand ... they are just not listening".
_	After discontinuing negotiations, Committee members were left with the impression that Disney would defer further negotiations to 1992.
_	The rapid assault had caught Valentyn unprepared since he was under the impression that the fort was under the protection of Fort Zeelandia.
_	The three-hand effect (or three-hand technique) is a means of playing on the piano with only two hands, but producing the impression that one is using three hands.
_	The gate of Jerusalem closely resembles the original Porta del Popolo outside of the basilica giving the impression that the procession is arriving on Via Flaminia.
_	Medarova's case also sparked discussions regarding the viability of a separate ministerial post for the organization of the electoral processes and caused some controversy due to creating the impression that protest network was applying undue pressure on the provisional government.
_	In the past, this has often left the door open to quackery perpetrated by individuals who had no training at all in the domain, but who wished to convey the impression that they did, for profit or other motives.
_	They used all manner of subterfuges to give the impression that Columbo was still alive, including faked letters from him and records used to simulate his radio program.
_	He raced with a 'daisy cutting' action which gave the impression that his feet were not touching the ground with each stride that he took.
_	The book has also been criticized for content such as chapters entitled "The Respectful Wife", with critics stating that the book was "an astoundingly unbelievable work of disrespect for women" and that "the book focuses so much on sex that it can create the impression that it's the most important element of marriage".
_	In some shots of AnnaSophia Robb's head, a facial prosthetic was worn to give the impression that her cheeks had swelled up as well.
_	The special lighting effects give the impression that the globe is rotating and displays the five continents of the world.
_	Nailatikau said that some government authorities, who she said were "hell-bent" on promoting the amnesty clauses of the legislation, were creating the impression that there was some connection between the coup perpetrators and themselves.
_	In his best known work "Geochronologia Sueccia", published in 1940, De Geer wrote "From the obvious similarity with the regular, annual rings of the trees I got at once the impression that both ought to be annual deposits" (1940, p. 13).
_	An observer commented that Byrne may not have been in the best of condition for the fight, as "his appearance failed to favour the impression that he possessed active vigour"; boxing historian Gilbert Odd describes the fight as "disgraceful".
_	We were always under the impression that we should feel honoured to be in the employ of the D’Oyly Carte Opera Company; it was patently obvious that the management held firmly to the policy that nobody is indispensable".
_	Rather than sounding preachy, he succeeds in leaving the impression that he simply wants other people to listen, understand, and take notes in hopes that children like his daughter won’t have to grow up in such a volatile environment (word to "Crazy World").
_	The movie departs from the novel and leaves the impression that Nathan is truly dead, and that the previous scenes were a wishful dream sequence of one of the two boy lovers, presumably Roy.
_	It states that Tony Blair's policy towards Iraq shifted because of the attacks of 11 September 2001, not because of Iraq's weapons programme, and that the government's language left the impression that there was "fuller and firmer intelligence" than was the case.
_	The disease rarely resulted in death and often went into remission on its own, giving the impression that the monarch's touch cured it.
_	Later Swedish and Danish tradition, while not reliable, bears witness of the impression that the cataclysmic battle made on posterity.
_	The South Africans were reportedly stunned by Meckiff's selection, giving the impression that they considered him an illegitimate bowler.
_	According to legend, in a marketing attempt a mock factory with a phony roof was built near the tracks, and when a train neared, tar paper was burned to give the impression that a booming industry existed in the community.
_	Don't buy these under the impression that you'll get more play per dollar by putting them all together."
_	David Lang, president of the team who created the advertisement commented that they desired to bring across the impression that they identify with youth culture and discourse.
_	The windmill sequence, in which Don Quixote is lifted into the air by the sails, gives the impression that Chaliapin himself has been caught up by the windmill, not a dummy or a stunt double.
_	Although it was far from clear what the disposition was in the latter two categories, the statistical data gave the impression that land reform had not transformed the former numerous farm sharecroppers and laborers into landowners.
_	He lets the cap fall into the street, drops his rifle and lets his left hand hang over the edge of the roof, giving the impression that he has been shot dead.
_	The flipper feedback kit uses two solenoids on a new lockdown bar which strike the metal whenever the flipper buttons are pressed to give the impression that the flippers are real.
_	Speaking anonymously, the president of one student union criticised Mustafa, stating that she was contributing to a campus environment in which white, cisgender males were given the impression that "they can't say anything for fear of retribution", resulting in life becoming "very difficult" for them.
_	Unfortunately for Jens, under the impression that he is dead, Barbara has started a relationship with Corporal Sam Yeager, a soldier responsible for guarding captured alien POWs.
_	He received the impression that the movie was reporting on slivers of light in the darkness of Nanking with the Japanese soldiers all being filmed in cheerful settings behind the front lines and with no trace of the nervousness of the Chinese people who were forced to remain silent.
_	In some respects he resembles Leopold Bloom, the hero of James Joyce's "Ulysses", and we have the impression that Fellini has read and contemplated this book.
_	It was one of Barrett's favourite books, and he often gave friends the impression that he was the embodiment of Pan.
_	General Murray had created the impression that the First Battle of Gaza had ended better than it had and the defenders had suffered more, with the Chief of the Imperial General Staff William Robertson in London.
_	However, he said this seemed unlikely since he had the impression that there was collusion between the Karnataka government controlled by the Bharatiya Janata Party, the Bajrang Dal and the VHP.
_	Pope Clement VII intended his relative Alessandro de' Medici to be the ruler of Florence, but also wanted to give the impression that the Florentines had democratically chosen Alessandro as their ruler.
_	Vicki Lutas of the BBC did not appreciate the first 30 seconds of the video, writing that "the dark, horror-type music, the pumping heartbeat, the equally spooky lullaby, the screech of an electric guitar", gave her the impression that she was watching "some [19]80s magician, with a Knowles soundtrack".
_	Simultaneously, deception signals would give the impression that "Vikrant" was operating somewhere between Madras and Vishakhapatnam.
_	Between March 3 and April 1, 200, Yuan Shao sent his general Yan Liang with Guo Tu and Chunyu Qiong across the river to attack Liu Yan's position at Boma, while Yuan himself stayed behind at Liyang with the main army with the impression that he was crossing the river.
_	Stations in other areas not served by CPR, like KDNK in Carbondale, complained that CPR would also send out fundraising solicitation letters to KDNK listeners leaving the impression that they could thank CPR for receiving popular NPR programs like All Things Considered or Morning Edition, sometimes resulting in misdirected donations.
_	Galt wrote that, despite Lincoln's assurances, "I cannot, however, divest my mind of the impression that the policy of the American Govt is so subject to popular impulses, that no assurance can be or ought to be relied on under present circumstances."
_	This was done in order to create the impression that the kingdom was too far inland to make invasion from the harbour feasible.
_	Although they did not crash, Hawk's actions left her with the impression that Hawk was a "psychotic weirdo".
_	John also began recruiting mercenary forces from France, although some were later sent back to avoid giving the impression that the King was escalating the conflict.
_	Their half inflated balloons on the property where the fabric was being processed looked like giant mushrooms and gave the impression that they were "growing balloons" on their farm as an unusual agricultural crop, hence the name "balloon farm."
_	It forces one to acknowledge the impression that such films may aggravate the mass social sickness euphemistically termed 'juvenile delinquency' ...
_	Mock hardware was created for "Bodyguard"; in particular, dummy landing craft were stockpiled to give the impression that the invasion would take place near Calais.
_	This was to give the impression that she has matured alongside Light, and was a good partner for him.
_	The Novaya Zemlya effect will give the impression that the sun is rising earlier than it actually should (astronomically speaking), and depending on the meteorological situation, the effect will present the Sun as a line or a square (which is sometimes referred to as the "rectangular sun"), made up of flattened hourglass shapes.
_	Magnus saw the young king singing, playing with a spear at Leith, and with his horses, and he was given the impression that the king preferred English manners over French fashions.
_	Samuel Saxton, a retired captain, explained that the American veterans and witnesses may have believed: "It would be unfair for the public to get the impression that we were all a bunch of rapists after we worked so hard to serve our country".
_	There was the impression that sending NATO armies into Eastern Europe was an appealing option, until someone gamed it out and figured out that this strategy was not effective against a much larger Soviet army in Eastern Europe, categorizing it as suicide.
_	Google Earth was used for the first time to give visitors to the website the impression that they were following Santa Claus' progress in 3-D.
_	The Spanish tried to create the impression that Maceo was trying to start a racial war against white Cubans, though their propaganda efforts did little damage to Maceo's reputation.
_	The exterior deliberately used strong verticals to give the impression that it was actually four, separate, attached houses.
_	Wilson was immediately enamored with the album, given the impression that it had no filler tracks, a feature that was mostly unheard of at a time when 45 rpm singles were considered more noteworthy than full-length LPs.
_	In this, the high point (peak) of a high tone does not synchronise exactly with the syllable itself, but is reached at the beginning of the following syllable, giving the impression that the high tone has spread over two syllables.
_	He thereby gave the impression that Halifax was solely responsible for British policy".
_	It was said by the "Sporting Life" that "no horse could have battled more heartily" and that the impression that he sometimes gave less than his best effort was created by the colt's oddly-set ears.
_	Nixon Elementary is named for local African-American physician and civil rights hero Dr. Lawrence Nixon and is often referred to as Dr. Nixon Elementary to avoid giving the impression that the school is named for disgraced United States President Richard Nixon.
_	He crossed the Euphrates near Hierapolis and moved eastward to Carrhae, giving the impression that his chosen route into Persian territory was down the Tigris.
_	Additionally, he indicated that, in 1980, the DIE had kidnapped him and kept him secluded for almost a month, with the intention of obtaining his collaboration, that his daughter was threatened with physical harm, and that, eventually, he was released in exchange for pledging to renounce his office in Geneva (and giving the impression that this was his own decision).
_	Coşea also stated that he was forced to wear an orthopedic cast over his leg, to give the impression that his disappearance was due to an automobile accident.
_	The former name "GNU Library General Public License" gave some the impression that the FSF recommended software libraries use the LGPL and that programs use the GPL.
_	Left with the impression that the inhabitants of the area were poor, he returned to Peru, later to be garotted following defeat by Hernando Pizarro in a Civil War.
_	Similarly, when two options are presented, they often are, although not always, two extreme points on some spectrum of possibilities; this may lend credence to the larger argument by giving the impression that the options are mutually exclusive of each other, even though they need not be.
_	Susan L'Engle had the impression that Anna was quite lonely though her jobs at the plantation kept her constantly busy.
_	In 2008, he labeled the Russia–Georgia War as a "Georgian attack" on "Russian peacekeepers" and ended his article with the statement that Finland should not discuss NATO membership because "it could create the impression that Finland is moving from cooperation to confrontation".
_	Similarly, a person looking up into the deep blue sky from the ground may have the impression that it is a very thick envelope of air surrounding the Earth, but an ISS astronaut looking at the atmosphere edge-on sees the reality that, compared to the Earth's diameter, it is roughly as thick as the skin on an apple.
_	Marilyn Stasio of the "The New York Times" positively noted the relationship between the "spare style and measured pace" of Birnbaum's translation and the "somber tone of Miyuki's theme" of individual value in a consumerist economy, while Cameron Barr of "The Christian Science Monitor" wrote that the book's treatment of privacy and data tracking would leave the impression that "personal privacy is a rickety antique."
_	The legacy of the abandoned brickworks also adds to the impression that the Marston Vale has been despoiled by decades of industrial activity and it is now searching for a new identity.
_	According to Touchstone's executive vice president for production Barry Jossen, who would eventually serve as an executive producer on the mobisodes, "They seem to be under the impression that we'll make millions of dollars and they won't".
_	This slot was normally reserved for the dourest of "Nebraska" material, and "Born in the U.S.A."'s appearance in it solidified the impression that its origins in those sessions had not been an accident after all.
_	The chronological tables found in chapters 13 of the "Shiji" represent all past rulers – legendary ones like Yao and Shun, the first ancestors of the Xia, Shang, and Zhou dynasties, as well as the founders of the main ruling houses in the Zhou sphere – as descendants of Huangdi, giving the impression that Chinese history was the history of one large family.
_	As a manga artist, Aso focused on the style of drawing that gives the impression that the drawn figures are going to pop out of the pages.
_	“You are correct that I did give an interview to John Jenkins for the article which appeared in your magazine in 1985; it may have been in part the impression that article made on me that led me to decide not to grant any such interviews in the future."
_	He was under the impression that he was heir-apparent to Brickhouse upon the latter's retirement; indeed, he later said that he had been "guaranteed in blood" that he would replace Brickhouse on Cubs television broadcasts in 1982.
_	They start a sexual relationship in "Loyalty in Death", with McNab still under the impression that she is also sleeping with Charles.
_	Most of Wilson's connections were still under the impression that he was working for the CIA and a wide network in the United States supported his actions.
_	The technique gives the impression that one stick is spinning very quickly while at the same time a rapid succession of notes is being played on the drum.
_	We all had the impression that no one was ever going to get into my stuff and that his one or two would be the ones to catapult us to fame."
_	The Brothers and the Board of Trustees have also been correcting the impression that the school would be charging higher tuition fees because of the inclusion of "La Salle" in its name.
_	Sarah immediately gets the impression that Chuck is a good guy after they meet, which leads her to protect him rather than suspect him of being a villain, and breaks protocol repeatedly (even risking her career and freedom) to help Chuck.
_	His personality contrasts sharply with that of his parallel universe counterpart, "Walternate"; the Secretary of Defense, who is cool, collected, serious, and has a clandestine way about him which gives others the impression that he is untrustworthy.
_	A Confederate scout observed Union soldiers resting in position, and moving about the hill unworried, whilst the disposition of the cannons around the hill's slope gave him the impression that the position was "almost impregnable".
_	Drew Taylor of Indiewire graded the film A− and said that it gives "the impression that you're witnessing something iconic and important unfold before you".
_	From the outside of this tower is still possible to make out the whitewash strips which were applied to the tiapa joints in order to give the impression that the tower was built from masonry.
_	The commercial was heavily criticised in Flemish media for giving the impression that the beer is French.
_	Khrushchev came away with the impression that a deal was possible over Berlin, and they agreed to continue the dialogue at a summit in Paris in May 1960.
_	John Wesley Powell visited Zion Canyon in 1872 and named it "Mukuntuweap", under the impression that that was the Paiute name.
_	He becomes friends with the Candidate whilst under the impression that the revolution was to be peaceful.
_	Spectacles of "low quality", including those of an erotic or pornographic nature, were however an exception—those were to be popularized to appease the population and to show the world the "real" Polish culture as well as to create the impression that Germany was not preventing Poles from expressing themselves.
_	In 1943, Albers was paid a huge sum of money to star in UFA's big-budgeted anniversary picture "Münchhausen" but was careful not to give the impression that he was endorsing the National Socialist regime, which was indeed, never asked of him.
_	Mathews said that he had the impression that Jack was a member of the order.
_	This title is what gave the impression that he was royal but that title does not mean that he was royal.
_	His figure fills the picture plane giving the impression that he is a confident, masculine young man.
_	By doing so they blurred the original concept, for the Army called Carden-Loyd’s carriers “Tankettes” and thus gave the impression that the Tank Corps and not the Infantry had a vested interest in them.
_	For example, when Switzerland switched to the European-wide blue parking disc system, the "blue zones" in Basel were marked with "1 hour" signs that previously read "1½ hours", giving the impression that the time was reduced, but in fact it had not been.
